


  p. 2048 (#997)                      #

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
P R x C E E D I N G s
Vol. No. 51, No. 11
NOVEMBER, 1925
WHOLE No. 273
Contents
2049
.......
2101
THE THREE CRAFTSMEN. BY MIDSHIPMAN (Now ENSIGN)
ERNEST M. ELLER, U. S. Navy......
THE ATTEMPTED MUTINY ON THE U. S. BRIG "SOMERS." By
REAR ADMIRAL LIVINGSTON HUNT, (SC), U.S.N., RET. 2062
ENGINEERING ECONOMY ON AUXILIARY VESSELS. BY COM-
MANDER R. R. Smith, U. S. Navy.......
STANDING ONE. BY LIEUTENANTS GEORGE K. WEBER AND
C. W. STYER, U. S. Navy.........
2110
Post TREATY NAVAL DESIGN. BY HECTOR C. BYWATER AND
MAURICE PRENDERGAST.......
............... 2125
Vest Pocket BALLISTICS. BY LIEUTENANT W. L. WRIGHT,
U. S. Navy.......
........ 2138
THE NAVIGATOR'S NOTEBOOK. By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER
P. V. H. WEEMS, U. S. Navy............... 2139
Radio VISION. BY C. FRANCIS JENKINS...
2150
DISCUSSION ........
2156
PROFESSIONAL NOTES......
2175
NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
2212
BOOK REVIEWS
...... 2218
SECRETARY'S NOTES
...... 2229
The writers only are responsible for the contents of their respective articles
..
.
.
.
.......
.....
2 ISO
Editor, Captain H. A. Baldridge; Assistant Editor, Lieutenant Com-
mander R. S. Field.
Published monthly at 450 Ahnaip St., Menasha, Wis.
Executive, Editorial, and Business 'offices, ú. S. Naval Institute,
Annapolis, Md.
Entered as second-class matter at the post-office at Menasha, Wis.,
April 4, 1922, and at the post-office at Annapolis, Md., under Act of Aug. 24,
1912. Acceptance for mailing at the special rate of postage provided for
in section 1103, Act of Oct. 3, 1919, authorized Mar. 13, 1922.
Membership dues (including Proceedings), $3.00 a year.
Subscription Rates, $5.00 a year. (Foreign postage extra.) Single
copies, 50c.
Copyright, 1925, by U. S. Naval Institute


  p. 2048 (#998)                      #

OFFICERS OF THE INSTITUTE
President
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy
. Vice-President
VICE ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. NAVY
Secretary-Treasurer
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy
Board of Control
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
BRIGADIER GENERAL GEORGE RICHARDS, U. S. MARINE CORPS
CAPTAIN W. T. CLUVERIUS, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN W. G. DUBOSE, (CC), U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN P. B. DUNGAN, U. S. Navy
COMMANDER BYRON MCCANDLESS, U. S. Navy
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. G. GREENMAN, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
PAST PRESIDENTS
ADMIRAL DAVID 5. PORTER, U. S. Navy, 1873
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN L. WORDEN, U. S. Navy, 1874
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1875-78
COMMODORE FOXHALL A. PARKER, U. S. Navy, 1878-79
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1879-82
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1882-83
REAR ADMIRAL THORNTON A. JENKINS, U. S. Navy, 1883-85
REAR ADMIRAL EDWARD SIMPSON, U. S. NAVY, 1885-87
REAR ADMIRAL STEPHEN B. LUCE, U. S. Navy, 1887-98
REAR ADMIRAL WM. T. SAMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1898-1902
Rear ADMIRAL H. C. TAYLOR, U. S. Navy, 1902-04
REAR ADMIRAL C. F. GOODRICH, U. S. Navy, 1904-09
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD WAINWRIGHT, U. S. Navy, 1909-11
REAR ADMIRAL BRADLEY A. FISKE, U. S. Navy, 1911-23
REAR ADMIRAL WILLIAM L. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1923-24


  p. 2048 (#999)                      #



  p. 2048 (#1000)                      


('ourtexy of the Metroli oldurun Pictures Corporation
THE NAVAL ACADEMY CHAPEL AT NIGHT


  p. 2049 (#1001)                      

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
PRO CE E DINGS
Vol. No. 51, No. 11 November, 1925 Whole No. 273
THE THREE CRAFTSMEN
AND THE PART OF THE NAVAL ACADEMY IN THE
MOULD OF A MAN
By MIDSHIPMAN (Now ENSIGN) ERNEST M. ELLER, U. S. Navy
If midnight study and instruction of the greatest and most learned sea
officers have given me advantages, I am not without them.
JOHN PAUL JONES
IN THIS, the mechanical age of the world, when steel and iron
and machinery of a thousand myriad shapes unite to form the
network of life, we are like to believe that man is made up of
a thousand parts and by a thousand workmen. But in our super-
ficial glancing, we mistake the many touches of a master hand for
that of different workers—there are but three skilled craftsmen
who fashion this intricate mind of ours; we say mind, for in the
face of the unchained soul the body is no more than the globe that
frames a light, necessary in its function but only the servant of the
magic force it holds. The first of these is commonly called
Heredity—varying, unseen, silent in his work, his part in the
building is little known and less understood. The second, and
probably the leader of the three, is study or Reflection-strong,
powerful, daring, he opens a vista that leaves the frame of life
limited only by the distant shadows in which even the imagination
becomes lost. And the last, Environment, surroundings, or what
you will, is a queer fellow, for he seems to work fitfully and in
strange starts. At times he will reach even higher than his great
leader, and at others, he will no more than touch the structure of
a human life.


  p. 2050 (#1002)                      

2050
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The first craftsman, of whom our knowledge is so small, is little,
if at all, controllable; the latter two are willful, but the strong
mind can bend them to his wishes. And here—can you not see
it?-lie once and for all the limits that bound a man's soul. If
a man shall stand before the two servants and force them resolutely
and unswervingly to his own will, then there are no heights which
he cannot reach, no end he cannot attain. Whereas, if he turns
himself into the servant and sways to their every whim, then
he becomes that pitied creature, the plaything of fate. Between
we have the many steps, as there must be from emperor to craven,
and each is a factor determined by the amount one controls these
two workmen; not by one's ability, for ability is built up by these
craftsmen guided by the will.
That success in any line of endeavor is measured by a man's
rule over these two servants is true, but it is particularly true to
an officer who must depend upon control of circumstances not
only for his own success but for his very life, and more, for
the lives of thousands of others. And it is the realization of this
that has been the distinguishing mark between Napoleon or Nelson
or Jones, and their host of minor contemporaries.
It is the impression of the average layman that great military
leaders are but heaven- or devil-sent wizards who have only to
wave their magic wands to sweep everything before them. He
fails to read their own words in history, or the most striking
comments of their greatest biographers. He has not understood
the significance of the Iliad to Alexander the Great, who, it is said,
passed a part of every day in reading from this great poem. He
has not realized the privation and study that featured Hannibal's
life from his earliest youth, in the preparation for his superb
attempt against the power of Rome. Strangest of all, he has not
grasped the one factor that made Napoleon supreme among the
commanders of the world. Beginning in his boyhood, he studied
diligently and cheerfully the lives and campaigns of all of the
great leaders up to his time—studied them, and dreamed over
them, and compared them, and probably he pictured from them the
greater success that would have fallen to him had he been the
commander.
However, it might not be so strange that the average person
has failed to note the part biography has played in the lives of
all great leaders, since few men make more than a careless or


  p. 2051 (#1003)                      

1925]
2051
The Three Craftsmen
passing stab at history. Yet, we can hardly realize that it would
be possible for anyone to fail to grasp it from the exact words of
the men themselves. Read the words of John Paul Jones set
down at the first of this chapter; read the biography of Porter,
or muse over these words from Mahan: “The average man
is not a coward; but neither is he endowed by nature with the rare
faculty of seizing intuitively the proper course at the critical
moment. He gains it, some more, some less, by experience or
reflection." Having finished these, turn to the works of a hundred
other men and you will find them, in their different manners, ex-
pressing this unvarying sentiment. Is it not, then, doubly odd
that so few have caught the vision of the effect that the study of
the lives and actions of others has upon their own success? If
one wants to learn of mathematics, he seeks knowledge in books
that represent the life works of men from Aristotle up to the
latest nineteen-twenty-five prodigy. Yet, when he seeks knowl-
edge of life, or character, of the will, he calmly disregards the
hard-earned lessons of the millions who have lived in the ages
before, and, in his peaceful ignorance, starts again at the very be-
ginning. Would it not be better to learn from those who have
found the pinnacle of success in the profession he has chosen, to
read their biographies, to learn their principles, and to select the
best for his own purposes ? For example, the first principle of war-
fare is that in the offensive lies victory--it appears in the works of
every historian, it stands out in the life of every great warrior;
yet how many leaders have sunk into oblivion because of their
failure to recognize this fact. Another, that is almost as obvious,
is that a new weapon in skillful hands practically assures victory.
The Carthaginians were among the greatest seafarers of the
world; their fleets controlled the Mediterranean, and the few
Roman galleys lay hidden in the coves of the Adriatic. Then, in
the space of a few short months, the Romans built fleets and swept
the Carthaginians from the seas. Because they were better sail-
ors? No. Because they resorted to the utterly foolish and un-
heard of step of loading their galleys with infantry, hinging on
the side a great flat gangway with a spike in the raised end, and
dropping the gangway when closed with the enemy, making it
impossible for him to escape, and placing his vessel at the mercy
of the Roman legions. A war and a country lost over such a
little matter! And it was the lubberly idea of having the rigging


  p. 2052 (#1004)                      

2052 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Nov.
filled with sharpshooters that enabled John Paul Jones to clear the
upper decks of the superior Serapis, and to sail his shattered
hulk alongside to victory and fame.
Yet another principle is preparation—but it is not necessary
to continue down the short list, a list that is just as effective and
unchanged today as it was a hundred and a thousand years ago.
Strategy does not change; the fundamental principles of surprise,
initiative, and concentration remain the same; and the leaders do
not change, they are still the ones who plot and plan and study
while their brothers are brawling—nothing changes except the
clothing, the tactics, the external methods of carrying on war. It
was the realization of this that led Napoleon, a century and a
half ago, to devote the greater part of his life to study and prep-
aration. Well was he served, too, and greatly moulded by his
control of the second craftsman; could we not hope for as much if
we bent him as rigidly to our bidding ? The means are not simple,
which is the reason for but one Napoleon, but they are clear:
unceasing study and reading of biography and history; long hours
spent in poring over the strategy and tactics of campaigns; longer
ones in reflecting over these, separating the seed from the chaff,
carefully analyzing every problem of warfare; and the careful
formation of plans with the constant and repeated thinking out to
their very essence of the problems of the past, so that the principles
of strategy become truly a part of the mind-these, and these
alone, bring the all encompassing intellect that sees to the heart
of every situation, the mind that can foretell the greatest number
of combinations, the brain that is ever a jump ahead of the op-
ponent.
Beyond all of this, in studying the biographies of great leaders,
one absorbs the spirit that inspired them. Reading fashions
thoughts, thoughts form ideas, ideas spring into actions, and ac-
tions shape our lives. It would, then, be well for a young naval
officer carefully to study all of the lives of successful commanders,
to choose the one which fits best of all with his ideals and char-
acteristics, and from that moment to make his life a study of this
one man. He could not hope that living in an atmosphere of Lee
or Washington alone would raise him to the sphere in which they
circled, but he could expect to gain from it the fire to light the
torch of his own life, and, once lighted, who can tell the intensity
with which it would light the pathway of his future?


  p. 2053 (#1005)                      

1925]
The Three Craftsmen
2053
If the study of examples of history and biography has served as
a beacon in the life of every great man; if the same instruction is
all-important in the moulding of our leaders today, and if our
future is to be shaped by the men we are building now, should
not the same study occupy an important place in the training here
at the Naval Academy, where the sole purpose is the moulding of
men who will be capable of honorably and fitly representing the
flag of the United States upon any of the seven seas? To be
true, the curriculum is crowded and the English course is already
strained to breaking in the short space allotted to its work; but
where the will is strong enough, there is always a means—two
of which we might suggest herewith. The first of these is based
upon the ability of the Trident or The Naval Institute to secure
funds for an annual prize of a set of biographies (to be selected,
within certain limits, by the winner) to be given to the midship-
man of the second or third class who submits the best essay on the
life of some American naval or military commander. Or, better,
and this would reach the whole and not the few, to require once
each year from every man in the first, second, and third classes an
essay similar to the above of at least 1,000 words in length. The
results would be manifold. The essay itself would be short enough
to take only a small amount of any man's spare time, but the re-
search work he would be required to carry out would be a be-
ginning. After the second or third essay, he would begin to realize
the importance of that particular type of study, and if but a single
man in an entire class were to accept biography at its greatest
worth, would not the Navy and the country profit inestimably
thereby?
Reflection and study! the component parts of the second crafts-
man, they not only teach and train the mind, but they also build
about us an environment colored by the life of the man we study.
And it is in this last clause that we find the link between the second
and the third workmen-a link but not a sameness, for their tasks
are widely separated. Indeed, Environment, the third craftsman,
fills an entirely different niche in his services to mankind.
With the first breath of life, he begins his work, shaping and
forming the character within. Until the fourteenth or fifteenth
year, however, a person is hardly more than a cast of plaster in the
hands of a sculptor, easily impressed, but soft and plastic, and
easily changed. In the next period, until he has reached the early
.


  p. 2054 (#1006)                      

2054
(Vor.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
twenties, changes begin to become permanent, the cast commences
to harden. Afterwards, the form is finished and a change is no
more the deft touch of the sculptor's finger, but a long chipping
process with a chisel and a hammer.
It is in this middle and most important period that a boy is re-
ceived into the Naval Academy. Is the finished form at gradua-
tion as nearly perfect as can be made ?
Again we ask, is it? Certainly it makes all of us happy to be-
lieve that the Naval Academy produces a type of men as a whole
more highly trained and more uniform in character than any other
great school in the world. Let it ever be so! But, are we not like
the swift runner who looks over his shoulder at the other con-
testants close behind, and merely runs to win by a narrow margin
when he might have swung the world to its feet in a wild cheer of
praise? Our training is built in ways unknown to most colleges,
but we leave untouched, or half touched, the qualities that give to
them their greatness. The continued supremacy of Yale, and
Oxford, and Cambridge, and similar colleges in civilian training
lies not so much in their superior brand of teachers—for in the
closer contact of smaller colleges better teachers are often found-
but it does lie in the traditions that are a part of the school itself, a
part of its life, a part of its walls, a part of every man who grad-
uates. The memory of great athletes: of an uphill game when the
unquenchable courage of one man led a defeated team to victory;
of great crews and superhuman endurance, and of men, who had
run as never man had run before, spurting when it seemed the
heart must burst! The traditions of great students and of men who
have gone out to bring fame to the Alma Mater which fostered
them! One can feel these things in the ivy-covered dormitories,
in the classroom, in the chapel, in the spirit that pervades the cam-
pus—and, to a certain extent, so is it here, but so little developed !
Developed 'most, probably, in football :—It is a dark autumn
morning, a few dim lights glow in the background, the trees loom
as but lacy shadows, there is a shouted word, and long dark
lines of hushed men swing as darker shadows in the night. Now
a shrill voice breaks into the stillness, "Left hand—Salute!" and
a hundred shadowy arms sweep up in humble reverence to the
grotesque Indian chief silhouetted by their side. .... The band
strikes up a note and 2,000 heads are bared as the swing of
Anchor's Aweigh surges out defiance to the enemy hurled back


  p. 2055 (#1007)                      

1925]
:
The Three Craftsmen
2055
at the one-yard line. . ... The game is won, the mule buried,
and a multitude of bodies crush and laugh about the Japanese
bell, in grim determination to strike their one note of victory from
its too long silent throat.
Football, the sport of the kings! it means much to the morale
of the Academy. More, though we hesitate in saying it, than
the finely chiseled Tripoli monument that is little more than a
name to most midshipmen; more than the quiet dignity of the
Herndon monument, of which even the best informed of us can
speak but vaguely; and even more than the tomb of the Father of
our Navy, who is best known to the average midshipman as the
hero in the one-act play, Jones is Dead!
These customs, with a very few more in our daily life, and these
monuments, with several more, we have; but with them alone there
is something lacking, something missing from the definite touch.
The atmosphere in which we live does not breathe of the great
heroes of our Navy, of Porter, of Farragut, of Dewey—or even
of the ones of more recent times, such as Kalk, and Drexler, and
Selfridge. The grounds, the walks, the buildings, and even the
roads are named after these men, but what has been done in the
mess hall, in the corridors of Bancroft Hall, in the classroom?
The place in which to touch a man's life is within the walls, within
the routine that surrounds him every day. The most inspiring
object at the Naval Academy is Perry's banner inscribed with the
dying words of Lawrence, “Don't Give Up The Ship!” which
hangs high up on the overhead in Memorial Hall. One thought-
ful moment before it is worth more than the most fiery dissertation
on patriotism ever delivered; yet think of the added influence
similar banners or flags of our other great commanders would
have if placed in each battalion where they would be seen every
day. One of the best parts of the system here is the naming of the
grounds and the buildings after Farragut and Mahan and the
other great men of our Navy; yet if we had the choice of naming
them after some little-known celestial bodies and using their
previous names to designate the different companies, the change
would be made today.
You do not think the change would have much value? Go, then,
to the Naval College of the world's oldest naval nation and feel
for yourself the inspiration that comes from living and eating and
talking with a group of boys who work and play and sleep as


  p. 2056 (#1008)                      


DONT GIVE UP
THESHIP
White Studio
By Courtesy of the 1926 Lucky Bag
Door of MEMORIAL HALL SHOWING PERRY's Motto FLAG
"Don't Give UP THE SHIP"


  p. 2057 (#1009)                      

1925]
2057
The Three Craftsmen
Rodneys or Drakes or Grenvilles for four years of their lives.
Then say if you do not think our companies should likewise be
named after Jones, Porter, Hull, Lawrence, Maury, Mahan, Far-
ragut, and Dewey-eight of the greatest men any navy has pro-
duced. Could not their anniversaries be celebrated by printed
notices to the regiment, or by special smokers with the commandant
and the superintendent present? Would it be too much of a sacri-
fice to give up a little of the mathematical Company One and
Company Two and a little of the official time, in order that
stronger characters may be built? “Tommyrot ! an idle dreamer
—we want practical men,” someone says. And again we ask,
is it the purpose of this Academy to form men of the character
of Jones and Porter, men who may likewise lead the Navy in
giant deeds ? or is it to make them in the main only navigators and
engineers and shipwrights?
But this is only one of the many things we have left undone,
but one of the many leads we have left untouched. One that has
received as little attention is that deep thrill that comes at rare
moments to the regiment as a whole: The last rays of the setting
sun are glancing off the tawny dome of the Chapel ; the shadows
are already forming deep caverns in “Lover's Lane”; the long
lines of the battalions drawn up in the soft stillness for evening
formation have swept into marching columns, and then a cool,
sweet bugle note floods the yard. The dusky swinging lines stiffen
and turn as a single man toward that symbol in the sky. Erect and
proud they stand, while into the eye of even the most thoughtless
there creeps a starry vision that seems to speak of the spirit of
honor, and of courage, and of loyalty hovering around that stream-
ing flash of color as it flutters to the earth. Smoke and flame and
sullen waters, and a mast and flag slowly disappearing beneath,
but a flag unsullied and an honor unstained. .... Colors end, and
the dark lines resume their marching, sobered and thoughtful,
each man feeling a bit bigger, a bit closer to the ideal of the flag.
How many times a year does this occur; possibly ten or twelve,
if the weather is agreeable. Have we forgotten the value of the
flag in forming an ideal ? Would it not be wise to amend the regu-
lations so that colors could be at 6:45 at the Naval Academy
during the months of outside formation? The change would be
small, but its influence would be immeasurable upon the man who


  p. 2058 (#1010)                      

2058
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Nov.
will have lived this same moment for three or four months of
every year of his stay at the Academy.
We honor our heroes by removing our hats upon entering
Memorial Hall—would it not be a similar fine custom to rechristen
“Smoke Hall” the Bonhomme Richard; to enshrine her flag in
the battle with the Serapis above the reading table, and to salute
the flag upon entering or leaving, as is done on boarding or leaving
any ship.
In the dark vault of the Chapel, above the tomb of this ship's
heroic captain, hangs his sword, polished as brightly as in the days
when he grasped its hilt. It would be far wiser to remove it
from its oblivion and to encase it outside the main office under the
words of his immortal letter to Congress!
During the past few weeks, while entering Maury Hall, many
a midshipman has risked the report sheet by falling out of ranks
to read a white faced inscription on an old weather-beaten boat-
the gig of the Saginaw, whose every splinter bears a tale of
unending heroism and devotion to duty. Is it not made to sit on
a rough hewn pedestal in the center of Memorial Hall, along with
its inspiring story of suffering and courage ?—and that, some-
thing more than a nicely carved tablet filled with a few dates and
numbers and half told facts.
Besides this one object, there are buried in the museum of
Maury Hall hundreds—and maybe thousands, for we have had
only one swift, wistful inspection far back in plebe summer-of
relics and treasured memories. How little value these now have in
their effect upon the environment of the Academy! yet how strong
might be their influence if but a few were placed in glass cases
on the walls in the different corridors of Bancroft Hall.
And now we come to something that will mean more than all
of these other things: the placing in the corridors and around the
walls of the mess hall of tablets and panels to our naval heroes. If,
for instance, we were in the Porter company, on one part of the
deck we could find an etching of the Essex with an account of
her many adventures during her long cruise in the South Pacific.
Farther along we might see an extract from Porter's own memoirs
of the cruise, inscribed next to his portrait, and on yet another
spot, an engraving of the Essex's last fight, which is itself but
another chapter in the history of naval courage and determination.


  p. 2059 (#1011)                      

1925]
The Three Craftsmen
2059
The value of traditions thus indoctrinated into the average mid-
shipman would be well nigh priceless, but we have failed to
mention the most noble memorials which should be erected—the
memorials to those graduates of recent years who have already
given their lives as a sacrifice upon the altar of duty and honor
and loyalty. If you were a plebe, or even a rolling first classman,
would you not thrill to find above your door, engraved in lasting
bronze, these words :
This was the room occupied his last year by Henry Clay Drexler.
Hardly five months from the Naval Academy, he upheld the highest tradi-
tions of the naval service and gave his life, not alone in the performance
of his duty, but in the pursuit of that higher dream of honor, of loyalty,
and of service.
On October 20, 1924, the new scout cruiser, Trenton, stood out for the
Southern Drill Grounds to her initial target practice which was to prove the
quality of her armament. Powder was just being drawn up, when suddenly
there was a rush of black smoke, a bursting flame, and a deafening roar
as one of the turrets stood shattered in its base. Drexler was not in the
turret, but engaged in work near by. Recovering from the shock of the
explosion, he hesitated not a moment, but rushed of his own accord into
the inferno. He returned with the body of a man. Again he entered, and
again did he return with a body. A third time he entered and returned.
But that was not enough! Impelled by some inner spirit he started for
the fourth time, but, overcome by the gas and flames, he fell dead at the
entrance. He saved the lives of three men, he performed his duty as he
saw it—a greater love and a greater death than this hath no man.
Or one to Lieutenant Selfridge who performed heroically in the
same accident but escaped with his life. Or another to Lieutenant
Kalk who left a raft from the torpedoed Jacob Jones that a sea-
man might have his place-exchanging seats with life and death
that another might live. Or one to Commander King who slashed
a life belt from his body that it might float a stunned bluejacket,
and then stood on the bridge of his trawler as the waters of the
North Sea closed over her—and him. Somehow we feel that with
a name such as one of these above our door we could sit down to
a lesson in navigation or ordnance with a greater purpose, a
stronger determination, and a deeper concentration, in order that
we, too, might prepare ourselves for a service as great.
These are but a few of the many things that could be done
to place an atmosphere of example, and of duty, and of loyalty
around the life of every man. Tablets in the Armory, in the
Chapel, in the yard, in Memorial Hall—all these are wonderful,


  p. 2060 (#1012)                      

2060
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
they help to complete the whole-possibly even so much as one
tenth or one twelfth of a midshipman's time is spent in more or
less remote contact with these. But the place to build a man, the
place to reach his soul, is where he eats and sleeps and laughs and
studies; and where else can that be but in the corridors and rooms
of Bancroft Hall? Walls are more than glazed surfaces to keep
the wind and the neighbors, and the watch officers from one's
presence. They are the boundaries of our lives—let them be not
bound too narrowly. The Naval Academy has a great mission,
greater than any college in the country, greater even than the
Military Academy at West Point. On the Navy, on its men, and
on its officers will depend the safety of this country that is iso-
lated from the rest of the world by two vast but not impassable
bodies of water. The Naval Academy realizes that the naval
officer could not be this bulwark if his whole knowledge con-
sisted of seamanship, and navigation, and ordnance, and engi-
neering; so each year has seen her branching out into broader
and more fertile fields—but where could one be found that would
be more productive than the drawing closer of the lines of tradi-
tion that bind the past with the present, any that would offer
greater gains from a little thought and less effort ? Forever hold
a bird imprisoned and it will never learn to fly, but open the cage
and some day you will marvel to see this bird, that has neither
sung nor flown, lifting a vanishing melody into the heavens.
Bound a man by gray walls, and nothing else, and you bind him
in a cage—but bound him with gray walls outside and walls of
honor and of courage and loyalty within and you have freed a
great spirit that will soar unto untold limits. Our training is a
hard one, may it ever be such, for only hardy souls bend true on
the rough path—but never take from it the traditions and mem-
ories of its great heroes, for from these does the spirit find its
strength. And the spirit is the man! Break and crumple and
wound the body if you will, but put within that human fire that is
but a little lower than the angels, and the man will rise to heights
that are but a little under heaven itself.
*
*
*
*
Reflection and Environment! The two great brothers of the
first craftsman, Heredity. Theirs is the power to mould and to
fashion the life of man into shapes so nearly perfect that the


  p. 2061 (#1013)                      

1925)
The Three Craftsmen
2061
world has not yet gazed upon their master works. But they do
not work alone, neither do they build without guidance; they are
the servants and man is the master. Are their powers being di-
rected in the true course in your own life? Are their abilities
being used to the greatest extent in the building of character and
men in our Naval Academy?


  p. 2062 (#1014)                      

THE ATTEMPTED MUTINY ON THE
U. S. BRIG “SOMERS”
By REAR ADMIRAL LIVINGSTON HUNT, (SC), U. S. N. RETIRED
I ET us go back in our minds to the Navy of eighty-three
L years ago, and try to use our imaginations clearly and ac-
curately so as to feel that we are in the naval atmosphere of
the time. To picture the little United States brig Somers plow-
ing the moonlit sea of the mid-Atlantic on the night of Novem-
ber 25, 1842, with a northeast trade behind her, in latitude north
13° and longitude west 41°, requires little mental effort, but to
comprehend the character and temperament of the officers and men
on board of her, to judge their actions with understanding and,
if necessary, with leniency, is a very difficult task to us of this day,
who have grown so different from our forefathers. The naval
officer of that time was in all respects a worthy type, but we of
today call the type limited and crude. We think him brave, but
ignorant. Certainly he was a less complicated and cultivated
official than his successor of today, but he could not help this as
he was the product of his times. In the year 1842, when the
Somers was on her trip from Cape Palmas in Liberia to St.
Thomas in the West Indies, the institutions of duelling and
slavery, and of flogging in the Navy were all extant in our country.
Piracy, which had even had men of education in its numbers,
had flourished like a green bay tree all over the West Indian
waters up to the year 1825, and still flourished on other oceans.
Aristocracy lingered on shore, and tyranny and roughness of
manners toward subordinates reigned aboard ship. In the eigh-
teen-forties and thereabouts there was a difference of clay be-
tween the enlisted man and the officer which has disappeared.
Even the unconsidered midshipman who was treated without
respect by his superiors was, though only a boy, regarded as a
divine authority by the grizzled seamen under him; and the reader
of this story should always keep in mind that mutiny, or mutinous
conduct (the former in foreign navies and the latter in our own),
was more common or more recent in those days than in 1925.


  p. 2063 (#1015)                      

1925]
2063
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers"
On board the Somers there were at this time seven midshipmen
ranging in ages from sixteen to twenty years, and it was one of
these lads who was to play the most important part in the events
about to take place on the little brig. Her captain was Commander
Alexander Slidell Mackenzie, of New York, an officer then thirty-
nine years old, with a record of unusual ability in his profession
and also out of it, for he was a successful and agreeable writer.
Washington Irving and English critics had praised him for his
books describing his travels in England and in Spain. His
biographies of John Paul Jones and Oliver Hazard Perry had ap-
peared the year before, and are creditable, well-written books.
He was a man of attractive presence, rather tall, with thin and
slightly auburn hair, of whom Richard Henry Dana, of Boston,
wrote a few months later: "He is quiet and unassuming. He is
unusually interesting and creates a feeling of personal affection
toward him in those whom he meets.” Commander Mackenzie
had been christened Alexander Slidell, his father being John
Slidell, Sr., an esteemed merchant and manufacturer of New
York, prominent in society and politics, and his brother the noted
John Slidell, Jr., afterward U. S. Senator from Louisiana, who
was appointed a Confederate commissioner to France and England
and was captured from the English vessel Trent by Captain Wilkes
of our Navy in 1861. Commander Mackenzie's mother was a
Miss Mackenzie, and about five years before our story opens, he
had, at the request of his mother's brother, added her family name
to his own of Slidell. With his proved reputation for courage
and efficiency, no officer was more highly esteemed, or had been
more successful in winning life's prizes up to the present time.
Such was he to the world; what he was to himself, what he was
to his Maker, is less easily discovered, but perhaps this story
will help us to know him better.
The brig Somers sailed from New York for the west coast of
Africa on September 13, 1842, with a crew of 120, consisting of
thirteen officers, about eighty apprentice boys, and the rest petty
officers, cooks and stewards, about five of them being only twenty
years of age. She was on a practice cruise with orders to pick up
Madeira, Teneriffe, and Porto Praia on the way to Liberia, then
to return to New York via St. Thomas. In pursuance of these
orders she left Cape Palmas in Liberia on November 11 and
was proceeding westward on her uneventful, trade-wind journey,


  p. 2064 (#1016)                      

2064
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
with nothing whatever to call the attention of history to her until
November 25. Her wardroom officers were four in number,
First Lieutenant Guert Gansevoort, P. A. Surgeon Leecock,
Purser Heiskill, and Acting Master M. C. Perry, all of them
crowded into a wardroom of which the "country" was only ten
feet wide by six feet long. In the steerage, which was forward
of the wardroom and which was fitted to accommodate only five
people, being fourteen feet wide by four feet long, were the seven
midshipmen already mentioned : namely, Messrs. Rodgers, Thomp-
son, Hayes, Deslondes, Tillotson, Spencer, and Captain's Clerk O.
H. Perry, who did midshipman's duty. The captain's cabin,
abaft the wardroom, was only eight feet wide at the broad end,
and four at the narrow, with a length of eight feet. All of these
quarters were on the berth deck, which had a height of four feet
ten inches between decks; and the crew occupied all of the amid-
ships and forward part of this deck. The only entrance to the
wardroom was through the steerage by a door in its after bulkhead.
The brig herself was one hundred feet long between perpendi-
culars, with an extreme width of twenty-five feet, seven inches,
and her tonnage capacity was 266 tons. She carried ten car-
ronades on her spar deck, her only other deck, although she was
pierced for twelve guns.
On the evening of November 25, the brig being then 1,700 miles
distant from St. Thomas, about the middle of the second dog-
watch, Midshipman Philip Spencer walked forward on the spar
deck and addressed some remarks about the weather to Purser's
Steward J. W. Wales, who was standing near the bitts. Midship-
man Spencer, who was nineteen years old at the time of this story,
and who is described as "a tall, pale, delicate looking young man,”
was not a favorite with his messmates. He was a member of a
distinguished family; his grandfather was Ambrose Spencer,
LL.D. who had been Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of New
York, and his father was John Canfield Spencer, the editor and
commentator of de Tocqueville's Democracy, and at the time of the
cruise of the Somers, Secretary of War in the Cabinet of Presi-
dent John Tyler. But Spencer's messmates, among whom we
recognize some typical naval names, did not approve of him on ac-
count of his general deportment among the ship's company before
the mast. He was a constant offender in a matter in which a self-
respecting officer may never offend; he was always trying to


  p. 2065 (#1017)                      

1925]
2065
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers"
bridge the unbridgeable distance in rank between man and officer
-a distance which was first discovered to be necessary about the
time when navies and armies first came into existence.
After a few minute's conversation with the purser's steward,
young Spencer invited him to come amidships and get up on top
the "booms” with him—the “booms” being the place where the
brig's launch, cutters and spare booms were stowed—remarking
that he had something very important to say to him. It was against
the rules of the ship to use this place as a loafing spot, but that
made little difference to Spencer; and besides, it was after dark,
so that discovery was improbable. In a very few minutes he made
known to the astounded Wales that he had a plan of mutiny in his
head, well thought out and arranged in all of its minute details.
He began by solemnly asking Wales if he was afraid of death, and
if he would dare to kill a man if necessary. To one reading
Wales' testimony as given later before the court-martial, it is
evident that Wales was thoroughly frightened, not only by the
question but by the fact that he was alone with Spencer. I give
the exact words of Wales for what followed :
I was very much surprised at these remarks (i.e., whether he (Wales)
feared death, and so forth), and looked up to see if he was in earnest. I
found that he was serious and very much in earnest in what he said. I re-
plied that I was not particularly anxious to die quite yet, that I had no
cause to fear a dead person, and that did a man sufficiently abuse or insult
me, I thought I could muster sufficient courage to kill him if necessary.
Mr. Spencer replied, “I don't doubt your courage at all; I know it. But,”
said he, "can you keep a secret and will you keep one?" "If so,” he added,
"take the oath.” He then dictated an oath, of which I cannot recollect the
whole, but the purport of it was that I should never make known to any
person the conversation which was about to take place between us. I took
the oath as directed by Mr. Spencer. The oath was merely administered
by word of mouth, no Bible being used. He then went on to state that he
was leagued with about twenty of the brig's company to take her, murder
all of her officers and commence pirating. The plan and stations of the
men, he said, he had all arranged in secret writing done up in his neck-
handkerchief. He requested me to feel of his neck-handkerchief. I did so
and there was a rumpling which showed that there was a paper in the back
part of it. He went on to state to me the plan he should pursue. Some of
his men would get into a fight on the forecastle. He (Spencer) was to
bring them up to the mast and call Mr. Rodgers, the officer of the deck, to
pretend to settle the difficulty. As soon as Mr. Rodgers had got to the
gangway they were immediately to seize him and throw him overboard.
They would then have the vessel in their possession. The keys of the arms


  p. 2066 (#1018)                      

2066
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
chest he could lay his hands on at any moment. The arms chest was to be
opened and the arms distributed to his men. He was then to station his men
at the hatches to prevent any one from coming up on deck, and he should
proceed to the cabin and murder the commander with the least noise
possible. He should then proceed with some of his men to the wardroom, and
murder the wardroom and steerage officers.
Further features of the scheme included throwing overboard
such members of the crew as would not suit Spencer's purposes,
and the development of the brig and her crew into a fully equipped
pirate ship. She was to proceed to the Isle of Pines and there take
on board one who was familiar with the trade of piracy and who
wanted to join them. They would then cruise the seas for prizes,
would capture and scuttle ships, take money, commit murder,
capture women and enslave them, and so forth.
For over half an hour Spencer poured into the frightened ears
of the dissembling Wales one item after another of his mutinous
scheme. He never stopped talking in this time, and was so eager
and excited as to give Wales no chance to reply. He then inter-
rupted himself by calling out to a seaman named Elisha Small to
come to the booms. To this man, who came up, he made a remark
in Spanish. Small understood Spanish, although Wales did not,
and Small's face showed surprise at what Spencer had said to him.
Spencer then said to Small in English, “Oh, you need not be under
any apprehension of fear on his (Wales') account, as I have
sounded him pretty well, and find he is one of us.” Small showed
pleasure at hearing this and remarked that he was glad of it.
Small was here called away on duty, and Wales continues with his
testimony:
Small then left. Spencer made overtures to me, saying that if I would
join them he would give me the post of third officer in command. He then
went on to state that the commander had a large amount of money on board.
This, he said, with what the purser had, would make a pretty little sum
to commence with. He then asked me what I thought of the project. I
thought it prudent to dissemble as much as possible in order to gain further
information and told him that I was favorably disposed toward it. My
duty then called me away. Spencer remarked that we would have another
interview on the morrow, when he would show me the plan he had drawn
up. He followed me to the gangway saying that if I lisped a syllable
of what he had communicated to me I should be murdered; that if he did
not do it himself those connected with him would ; that go where I might.
my life would not be worth a straw. I said, “No, I would not make any
mention of it.”


  p. 2067 (#1019)                      

1925] Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers” 2067
It was almost two hours before Wales could shake off Spencer
and escape from the ordeal of pretending to share in his murder-
ous ideas. That the young officer was terribly in earnest and
meant all that he said there was not a shadow of doubt in Wales'
mind. To us of this day, listening for the first time, in 1925, to
Midshipman Spencer's scoundrelly and bloody schemes as laid be-
fore Wales, it is uncertain whether to view them as grotesque non-
sense, or to see in them real dangers to the security and the lives
of the people on board the Somers. Should one laugh at them
or be transfixed with horror? We recall again the fact that piracy
was until about that time a very common trade. When Commo-
dore C. G. Ridgely was ordered in 1826 to command the West
India squadron his orders included directions to "suppress piracy”
in those waters. Young Spencer had told Wales that he was
leagued with about twenty of the Somers' crew to take possession
of the brig and turn her into a pirate. Could this be true? Why
not? Although mutinies were almost unknown in our Navy, yet
there had once been one on board the Essex under Porter at the
Marquesas Islands in 1813. Was it wholly impossible for a mutiny
to occur, especially with an officer to lead the disaffected ? To
Wales' frightened mind anything seemed possible; and he was con-
vinced of the necessity of immediate action on his part without
paying any attention to his oath of secrecy to Spencer. He came
up on the quarter-deck after Spencer had gone below, and hovered
about the entrance to the cabin with the intention of carrying the
news directly in to Commander Mackenzie, but he perceived that
his movements were watched by Small and he dared not carry out
his design. He then went below with the idea of reporting the mat-
ter to the first lieutenant, Mr. Gansevoort, in the wardroom. To
do so he would have had to pass through the steerage to the door
in the after bulkhead which was the only entrance into the ward-
room, but Midshipman Spencer was already in his hammock for
the night, and his hammock was slung close to this door. Spencer
noticed Wales coming into the steerage, and raising up his head
wanted to know “Why in the devil he was cruising about that
place at that time of night, and why he had not turned in.” Wales
made no reply but pretended to be busy about something, and got
out of the steerage onto the berth deck where he remained for an
hour, hoping that Spencer would go to sleep so that he could get
into the wardroom to speak with the first lieutenant. But lights


  p. 2068 (#1020)                      

2008
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
were put out, and there was nothing to be done until next morning,
so Wales had to turn in and to lie awake the whole of the rest of
the night. In the morning he got into the wardroom on the first
opportunity and made the matter known to Purser Heiskill; he
then went on deck and told Mr. Gansevoort that the purser
wished to speak with him immediately. Wales says in his testi-
mony that while he was speaking to the first lieutenant he was
being watched by Small and by a boatswain's mate named Crom-
well, and two men named Wilson and McKinley. He assumed
that all of these men were among the intending mutineers, aná
that they observed that he was playing them false. Mr. Ganse-
voort went below to the wardroom about ten o'clock in the morn-
ing where he received from Purser Heiskill the momentous news
that there was a mutiny on foot on board the U. S. brig Somers.
He listened to enough of this information to feel thoroughly
alarmed and did not wait to hear all of the details, but hurried to
the captain's cabin, where he laid the matter before Commander
Mackenzie. I give the exact words of the first lieutenant in de-
scribing this interview: “I immediately entered the cabin and men-
tioned the circumstances. He (Commander Mackenzie) received
it with great coolness; said that the vessel was in good discipline
and expressed his doubts as to the truth of the report. I asked
him if I should see Mr. Wales myself and get the information
from him. He said no, he did not wish me to do or to say any-
thing about it. He assigned no reason at this time for this, but
ordered me to keep a strict lookout upon Mr. Spencer and the crew
generally.” On this, Mr. Gansevoort left the cabin.
The plot, or whatever it was, was now the property of the direct-
ing mind of the ship, and from this mind a new and strange con-
sciousness, as of danger, was soon to spread itself through the
ship's company of the Somers. A disorder had come into the
ship's organism, and it had to work itself out, either for good
or bad. Mr. Gansevoort, in obedience to orders, began watching
Mr. Spencer, and watching everyone in the crew. About two
o'clock in the afternoon, observing that Spencer was not on deck,
but had gone into the foretop, he went up there himself to see
what he was about. He found him sitting on the lee side of the
top, with his chin resting on his breast and in such deep thought
that he did not see Gansevoort until the latter had got into the
top and was standing erect. Spencer then got up in confusion and


  p. 2069 (#1021)                      

1925] Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers” 2069
asked Gansevoort some questions about the rigging, which the
latter answered and came down puzzled by the young man's
demeanor and strongly inclined to see something suspicious in it.
A little later an apprentice named Green went into the top to join
Spencer, and to prick a design in India ink on his arm. Mr.
Gansevoort ordered Green to come down, which he did, but
Spencer remained on the top until later, when he came down and
Gansevoort observed him sitting on the Jacob's ladder on the
starboard side forward. Now occurred an important incident in
this story. "I turned my eye toward him," says Gansevoort, "and
immediately caught his eye which he kept staring upon me for
more than a minute with the most infernal expression I have ever
seen upon a human face. It satisfied me at once of the man's
guilt."
Now Lieutenant Guert Gansevoort was not the type of man we
should expect to imagine dangers where they did not exist. He
was thirty years of age, had been at sea since the age of twelve
when he had entered the Navy as a midshipman, and his judgment
of a fellow seaman deserves consideration even if based, as this
one undoubtedly was, on intuition only. It was about four o'clock
in the afternoon of this day, November 26, that, in consequence of
this malignant glare from young Spencer, he mentally ranged
himself alongside Wales in the belief that the midshipman was
plotting to be a mutineer.
Meanwhile, what was Commander Mackenzie thinking about?
He had received with apparent ridicule the fearsome news that
there was treason on board his ship; it hardly seemed possible that
he would change his views. Yet that is exactly what happened.
To understand this we turn to his own account of it, as related in a
report to the Secretary of the Navy written three and a half
weeks later. From the manner of his narrative it is evident that
the large number of facts relating to Spencer which it contains
could not all have been learned by Commander Mackenzie on the
afternoon of November 26; but this does not invalidate his reasons
for acting toward Spencer as he did later in the day, since the
facts which he learned afterwards corroborated those which he
had learned before.
He remarks that although he at first felt that Mr. Spencer must
have been amusing himself with the purser's steward, he yet
decided that it was joking on an improper theme and should be


  p. 2070 (#1022)                      

2070
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
stopped. It was in case there might be a shadow of reality in
Spencer's project that he had ordered Mr. Gansevoort to watch
him. In the course of the afternoon Gansevoort had reported
that Spencer had been in the wardroom examining a chart of the
West Indies and making inquiries about the Isle of Pines, which
was the place where he had told Wales he was going to take the
Somers. He also learned that Spencer had been in secret and
nightly conferences with Boatswain's Mate Samuel Cromwell,
and Seaman Elisha Small; that he had given money to Small and
several of the crew, and had the habit of distributing tobacco
among the apprentices, contrary to orders; that he had corrupted
the wardroom steward and caused him to steal brandy from the
wardroom mess; that he had occasionally been drunk himself
when removed from observation; that he had given brandy to the
crew; that he had "the habit of amusing the crew by making music
with his jaw”; that he had once drawn a brig with a black pirate's
flag, and had repeatedly asserted that the Somers could be easily
taken; that he had been dismissed with disgrace from the Brazi-
lian squadron and compelled to resign for drunkenness and scan-
dalous conduct; and, finally, that he, while on the Somers, had little
intercourse with the officers and was very intimate with the crew.
As the day wore on, much thinking of these discreditable facts
gradually accomplished the feat of changing Commander Macken-
zie's ridicule of the morning into a mood so serious in the after-
noon that he took the resolution which we shall soon record.
Gansevoort, after the incident of the hateful gaze turned upon
him by Spencer, reported it to Commander Mackenzie, and gave
it as his opinion that Spencer ought to be confined. Mackenzie
replied that he did not wish to act hastily, and that by evening
quarters he would decide what it was best to do. Just before that
time arrived Commander Mackenzie himself asked Mr. Gansevoort
what he would do in the present situation of affairs, were he,
Gansevoort, the commanding officer of the Somers. "I told him,"
says Gansevoort, “that I would bring that young man aft and iron
him and keep him on the quarter-deck.” The minds of the two
men met in the same conclusion. In his report to the Secretary of
the Navy, Commander Mackenzie, after enumerating the instances
of bad conduct on Spencer's part already described, states :
These various recollections, added to what had been revealed to me, de-
termined me to make sure at once of his person, though I had meditated


  p. 2071 (#1023)                      

1925)
2071
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers"
allowing Mr. Wales to have another interview with him that evening for
the purpose of ascertaining more of his plans, as had been agreed upon
between them. If he was really in earnest, enough was already known. At
evening quarters I ordered through my clerk, O. H. Perry, doing the duty
also of midshipman and aid, all of the officers to lay aft on the quarterdeck,
excepting the midshipmen stationed on the forecastle. The master was
ordered to take the wheel, and those of the crew stationed abaft sent to the
mainmast. I approached Mr. Spencer and said to him, “I learn, Mr. Spencer,
that you aspire to the command of the Somers?” With a deferential, but
unmoved and gently smiling expression, he replied, “Oh, no sir.” “Did you
not tell Mr. Wales, sir, that you had a project to kill the commander, the
officers and a considerable portion of the crew of this vessel and convert her
into a pirate?" "I may have told him so, sir, but it was in joke." "You
admit then that you told him?" "Yes, sir, but in joke.” “This, sir, is
joking on a forbidden subject; this joke may cost you your life. Be pleased
to remove your neck-handkerchief.” It was removed and opened, but
nothing was found in it. I asked him what he had done with the papers
containing an account of his project which he had told Mr. Wales was in
the back of his neck-handkerchief. “It is a paper containing my day's
work, and I have destroyed it.” “It is a singular place in which to keep
day's work." “It is a convenient one,” he replied with an air of deference
and blandness. I said to him, “You must have been aware that you could
only have compassed your designs by passing over my dead body, and after
that, the bodies of all of the officers; you had given yourself, sir, a great
deal to do; it will be necessary for me to confine you, sir." I turned to
Lieutenant Gansevoort and said, “Arrest Mr. Spencer, and put him in double
irons !” Mr. Gansevoort stepped forward and took his sword. He was
ordered to sit down on the stern post, double ironed, and, an additional
security, handcuffed. I directed Lieutenant Gansevoort to watch over his
security, to order him to be put to instant death if he was detected speaking
to or holding intelligence in any way with any of the crew. He was himself
made aware of the nature of these orders. I also directed Lieutenant Ganse-
voort to see that he had every comfort of which his safekeeping would admit.
The intended mutiny was now an established fact—made so by
the action of the commanding officer in openly securing the person
of the ringleader. The revelation was a thunderclap to everyone ex-
cept the intending mutineers, whose number we may now state,
was small. How changed the quiet career of the little brig of
twenty-four hours before, homeward bound and glad to be so,
and now with some evil spirit lurking in every breeze that
whispered along her deck! Midshipman Spencer was placed on
the port arms chest of the quarter-deck, close to the roundhouse,
and as the sun went down the officer of the deck, by order, was
armed with a cutlass and pistol. Just after the arrest, the locker
1 "Day's work,” the navigational computations for the day.


  p. 2072 (#1024)                      

2072
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Nov.
of Midshipman Spencer in the steerage was searched by Lieu-
tenant Gansevoort and Midshipman Henry Rodgers. Among his
possessions were found two papers which contained startling
proofs of his intention to start a mutiny. They consisted of a
list of about thirty names of men in the ship, classified under the
headings of "Certain," "Doubtful,” and “To be kept nolens
volens," with explanatory notes attached. In order to make his
program secure from discovery, he had written every name and
every word of it in the Greek character. The notes stated that
some of the “doubtful” men would be “induced to join," and
some others would have "to be forced.” The number of names
under the caption “Certain” was only four, including himself;
under "Doubtful” there were ten names. The distribution of
certain men at the wheel, arms chest, and other places on the
deck was also put down all in Greek. Midshipman Henry
Rodgers was the only officer able to read these Greek characters
and to transliterate them into English, which he did, and took
the results to Commander Mackenzie. Proof upon proof seemed
to be piling up that the ship was in danger; but even before the
discovery of the Greek papers the captain had given orders to
the watch officers to make frequent rounds of both decks that
night, in order to see that the crew were in their hammocks and
that there were no suspicious gatherings anywhere.
The following day was Sunday, November 27, inspection day,
and at ten o'clock in the morning all hands were assembled at
quarters, with Commander Mackenzie determined, as he tells us,
to observe minutely the person and bearing of Cromwell and of
Small. Boatswain's mate Samuel Cromwell was the tallest man
in the crew, wore a big beard and a large pair of whiskers; was
violent, profane, and able. He was cruel to the boys, and he swore
(under his breath) at the captain. He appears to have had a past
career of no gentle kind, having served on a slaver, and bore on
his scalp several scars that showed that he had been in bloody
fights. In appearance at least he might have been a suitable first
mate for the pirate ship which young Spencer was planning to
make of the Somers. How far he was involved in these schemes,
if at all involved, and what the subject of his private talks with
Spencer was, will never be known. His truculent appearance
seems to have assisted toward a belief in his collusion with the
young officer. On that morning carpenter's mate Dickerson, who


  p. 2073 (#1025)                      

1925)
2073
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers"
was one of the loyal petty officers, had said to Mr. Gansevoort, in
speaking of Cromwell, “that big fellow forward is more dangerous
than the rest; he ought to be confined." This was the man whom
Commander Mackenzie observed closely while he stood at quar-
ters, erect and pale, with eye fixed and grasping resolutely his
battle-axe.
The result of the examination was that Commander Mackenzie
decided that he had a "determined and dangerous air." Elisha
Small presented a very different appearance from Cromwell; he
was a short, little man with a white, frightened face, shifting from
one foot to the other, passing his battle-axe from one hand to the
other, and avoiding the eye of his captain. Both men, though
for opposite reasons, impressed Commander Mackenzie as men
who were not to be trusted. After quarters, church was held, and
the crew was uncommonly devout and attentive to the service. A
general muster followed and Commander Mackenzie states that
he examined every countenance in the crew with the result that he
discovered none which disturbed him. This statement, of course,
must have intended to except Cromwell and Small. In the after-
noon, the wind having moderated, skysails and royal studding
sails were set, but the operation was hardly completed before the
main-royal mast was carried away. Occurring at this time, this ac-
cident immediately took on a sinister appearance both to Com-
mander Mackenzie and his first lieutenant, whose minds at once
rushed to the conclusion that it was intentional. Gansevoort
dashed to the deck from below and took charge of clearing the
wreck, fearing lest conspirators would take advantage of the con-
fusion to get possession of the ship. Later, when the main-top-
gallant mast was about to be swayed from the deck, he states
that he “heard an unusual noise—a rushing on deck and I saw a
body of men in each gangway rushing aft toward the quarter-
deck. I said to the Commander, ‘God, I believe they are coming.'
I had one of Colt's pistols, which I immediately drew and cocked;
the commander said his pistols were below. I jumped onto the
trunk and ran forward to meet them. As I was going along I
sang out to them not to come aft. I told them I would blow the
first man's brains out who should put his foot on the quarter-
deck. I held my pistol pointed at the tallest man I saw in the
starboard gangway, and I think Mr. Rodgers sang out to me that
he was sending the men aft to the mast rope. I then told them that


  p. 2074 (#1026)                      

2074
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
they must have no such unusual movements on board the vessel ;
what they did they must do in their usual manner; they knew the
state of the vessel and might get their brains blown out before they
were aware of it.”
The state of mind of Gansevoort seems to have seen unmistak-
able mutiny in the crew before him. Commander Mackenzie,
whether influenced by this or not, found cause for alarm that
afternoon in the fact that five or six men, including Cromwell,
Small, and a sailmaker's mate named Wilson, had collected about
the mainmast head and in the crosstrees, where some of them were
out of their stations. After consulting with Gansevoort, he made
up his mind to arrest Cromwell, first taking the precaution to order
all officers to be armed and stationed about the spar deck, ready
for action in case of attack. When Cromwell descended the
rigging he found facing him, with cocked pistol, the first lieu-
tenant who told him that the captain wished to see him, and took
him aft. Here Commander Mackenzie questioned him as to a
secret conversation he had held with Mr. Spencer, but Cromwell
replied, “It was not me, sir, it was Small.” He was then informed
that there were reasons for many suspicions about him; there-
fore, it was necessary to arrest and confine him in the same way as
Mr. Spencer, and to take him home for trial where, if found
innocent, he would be set free, and if found guilty, would be
punished. Cromwell replied, "Yes, sir, but I don't know anything
about this; I assure you, I don't know anything about it." He
was put in double irons and placed on the starboard arms chest
directly across the quarter-deck from Spencer.
As Cromwell had named Small as the person who had con-
ferred secretly with Spencer, Commander Mackenzie, after con-
sulting with Gansevoort, had Small called aft, and put him also
into double irons. He charged him with having listened to
Spencer's plot of mutiny, to which Small answered, “Yes, sir,"
and made no objection to being confined. He was told that he
also would be legally tried at home, and he was placed on the
starboard quarter-deck abaft the after gun. Purser's steward
Wales was armed and detailed to keep watch over the three
prisoners. “Increased vigilance,” says Commander Mackenzie,
"was now enjoined upon all the officers; henceforward, all were
perpetually armed; either myself or the first lieutenant was always
on deck, and generally both of us were."


  p. 2075 (#1027)                      

1925]
2075
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers”
The following morning, Monday, November 28, the routine
of the ship's day included the punishment of two men for offenses
reported by the master-at-arms. One of them was Henry Wal-
tham, the wardroom steward, who had recently stolen brandy from
the wardroom mess and given it to Mr. Spencer. The whole ship's
company, officers and men, were called on deck by the boatswain's
cry of "All hands witness punishment,” and Waltham's hands
were tied, his shoulders stripped, and the lash laid on. After this
(what must seem to us) brutalizing ceremony, Commander
Mackenzie made a speech to the crew. He disclosed to them the
general nature of Spencer's plot, while not mentioning that he had
a list of the names of those implicated in it, and impressed upon
them that many of them had been marked for murder by Spencer.
He exhorted them to think of their homes and kindred and to
rejoice at the prospect of being with their families again in about
three weeks. Commander Mackenzie states in his report to the
Secretary of the Navy, that the effect of his speech upon the crew
was various: “it filled many with horror at the idea of what they
had escaped ; it inspired others with terror at the dangers awaiting
them from their connection with the conspiracy. The thoughts of
returning to that home and those friends from wom it had been
intended to have cut them off forever caused many of them to
weep. I now considered the crew tranquillized and the vessel safe.”
Nothing happened that Monday afternoon to destroy this
tranquillity which, it must be remembered, was founded on and
maintained by the conspicuous presence of twelve armed officers,
each with cutlass and pistol ready for instant use. In addition to
this guard against an uprising, Commander Mackenzie had di-
rected that the three prisoners should be turned with their faces
aft, as he had once or twice observed Mr. Spencer attempting by
signs to hold intelligence with the crew. Tuesday the twenty-
ninth came, and in the morning all hands were again called to
witness punishment, and another "catting” took place. Again
Commander Mackenzie thought it advisable to address the crew,
urging them to obey the laws of the ship and to keep down the
number of punishments, so that the record of the ship, when
sent in to the Secretary of the Navy, would make a creditable
showing. At this point of Commander Mackenzie's narrative we
are hardly prepared for his next remark. After mentioning this
speech to the crew, he says, “But the whole crew was far from


  p. 2076 (#1028)                      

2076
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings (Nov.
being tranquillized.” It was only twenty-four hours before that
he had told us that they were tranquillized. What had caused
this sudden change? Had his first belief been an error based on
hasty judgment ? Evidently so, for he goes on to tell the Secre-
tary of the Navy that the suspected mutineers "began once more
to collect in knots,” and that during the previous (Monday)
night "seditious words had been heard through the vessel, and an
insolent and menacing air assumed by many." He became pos-
sessed, from reports made by certain of the loyal men, with the
idea that the conspirators were planning to make a rush aft and to
rescue the three prisoners confined in irons on the quarter-deck.
It seemed to him that, so far from the three arrests having quelled
the spirit of mutiny, they had tended to increase it. Purser's
steward Wales reported that sailmaker's mate Wilson had acted as
if he intended to kill him with a handspike. After hearing this,
Commander Mackenzie remained continuously on the spar deck.
At midnight of Tuesday when the watch was called, two men,
landsman McKinley and apprentice Green, missed their muster
and gave lame excuses for doing so. At four o'clock on Wednes-
day afternoon the same slackness was again evinced by some other
men. In Commander Mackenzie's mind, the danger of a rescue of
the prisoners grew from hour to hour. For over forty-eight hours
all officers had now carried arms, and none of them had secured a
requisite amount of sleep. Each new symptom of disaffection
produced an angry reaction in their tired minds. As Commander
Mackenzie states: “Where was this thing to end? Each new
arrest of prisoners seemed to bring a fresh set of conspirators
forward to occupy the first place. With fine weather and bright
nights, there was already a disposition to make an attack and
rescue the prisoners. When bad weather should call off the at-
tention of the officers . . . . how great the probability of a rescue!
.... Hitherto, I had consulted the first lieutenant only, and had
been justified in everything I had done by finding his opinions
identical with my own. In so grave a case, however, I was
desirous of having the opinion of all of the officers, and was partic-
ularly anxious that no shadow of doubt should remain as to the
guilt of either of the prisoners, should their execution be deemed
necessary."
Their execution! Surely Commander Mackenzie was traveling
fast. Was there not a law which stated that any person in the


  p. 2077 (#1029)                      

1925)
2077
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers"
Navy making or attempting to make any mutinous assembly, shall,
on conviction thereof by a court-martial, suffer death? Where
was the court-martial which alone could justify him in thus con-
sidering the necessity of an execution? How could he overlook
the law and rush to the thought of an execution ? His own story
will tell us how, and why. On the morning of Wednesday the
thirtieth, he addressed this letter to the four wardroom officers
and the three oldest midshipmen, omitting the four acting mid-
shipmen who were only boys.
U. S. Brig Somers,
November 30, 1842
GENTLEMEN:
The time has arrived when I am desirous of availing myself of your
council in the responsible position in which, as commander of this vessel,
I find myself placed. You are aware of the circumstances which have
resulted in the confinement of Midshipman Philip Spencer, Boatswain's
Mate Samuel Cromwell, and Seaman E. Small, as prisoners, and I pur-
posely abstain from entering into any details of them, necessarily ignorant
of the exact extent of disaffection among a crew which has so long and
so systematically and assiduously been tampered with by an officer. Know-
ing that suspicions of the gravest nature attach to persons still at large,
and whom the difficulty of taking care of the prisoners we already have,
makes me more reluctant than I should otherwise be to apprehend, I have
determined to address myself to you, and to ask your united council as to
the best course to be now pursued, and I call upon you to take into deliberate
and dispassionate consideration the present condition of the vessel, and the
contingencies of every nature that the future may embrace, throughout the
remainder of our cruise, and enlighten me with your opinion as to the
best course to be pursued.
"I am, very respectfully, gentlemen, your most obedient,
Alex. SLIDELL MACKENZIE,
Commander
To Lieutenant Guert Gansevoort, Past Assistant Surgeon R. W. Lee-
cock, Purser H. M. Heiskill, Acting Master M. C. Perry, Midshipman
Henry Rodgers, Midshipman Egbert Thompson, Midshipman Chas. W.
Hayes.
Before handing in this letter to the officers concerned, Com-
mander Mackenzie had made four more arrests on the morning of
Wednesday. Wilson, already suspected on account of the hand-
spike incident; McKinley, one of those on Spencer's list as "Cer-
tain"; Green, who had missed muster at mid-watch; and Alexand-
er McKie, a close friend of Cromwell's, and also an absentee at
muster, all were put in irons. There were now seven prisoners in


  p. 2078 (#1030)                      

2078
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
double irons on the quarter-deck, incidentally in the way of every-
body, and interfering seriously with the working of the ship.
The officers addressed met in council at once in the wardroom
and began the examination of witnesses. This business lasted all
day long without their adjournment even for food, and was not
finished at nightfall; during this time Commander Mackenzie re-
mained in charge of the deck with the young acting midshipmen.
He then ordered the adjournment of the council until next day,
and he drew up a special watch-bill for the night in which he took
charge of the starboard watch himself and put Mr. Gansevoort in
charge of the larboard. He states that he was determined not to
pass another such anxious night as the previous one. But there
was not much sleep that Wednesday night, and on the morning
of December 1, about nine o'clock, the following letter was handed
to him from the council of officers by Mr. Gansevoort:
U. S. Brig Somers,
Sir:
December 1, 1842
In answer to your letter of yesterday, requesting our counsel as to
the best course to be pursued with the prisoners, Acting Midshipman
Philip Spencer, Boatswain's Mate Samuel Cromwell, and Seaman Elisha
Small, we would state, that the evidence which has come to our knowledge
is of such a nature as, after as dispassionate and deliberate a consideration
of the case as the exigencies of the time would admit, we have come to a
cool, decided, and unanimous opinion that they have been guilty of a full
and determined intention to commit a mutiny on board of this vessel of a
most atrocious nature; and that the revelation of circumstances having
made it necessary to confine others with them, the uncertainty as to what
extent they are leagued with others still at large, the impossibility of
guarding against the contingencies which a day or an hour may bring
forth,' we are convinced that it would be impossible to carry them to the
United States, and that the safety of the public property, the lives of
ourselves, and of those committed to our charge, require that (giving
them sufficient time to prepare) they should be put to death, in a manner
best calculated as an example to make a beneficial impression upon the
disaffected. This opinion we give, bearing in mind our duty to our God,
our country, and to the service.
"We are, sir, very respectfully, your obedient servants,
GuERT GANSEVOORT, Lieutenant
R. W. LEECOCK, Past Assistant Surgeon
H. M. HEISKILL, Purser
M. C. PERRY, Acting Master
Henry RODGERS, Midshipman
EGBERT THOMPSON, Midshipman
Chas. W. Hayes, Midshipman


  p. 2079 (#1031)                      

1925)
2079
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers”
“Put to death!" and "put to death in a manner best calculated
as an example to make a beneficial impression!” The minds of
Commander Mackenzie and of his officers can truly be said to have
run in the same channel. As if the verdict had been expected and
foreseen by him, he states that he "at once concurred in the justice
of the opinion and in the necessity of carrying its recommenda-
tions into immediate effect.” He tells us that he selected the three
mutineers, Spencer, Cromwell, and Small, from the rest, for ex-
ecution, because they alone were capable of navigating and sailing
the ship. With them out of the way there would remain no fur-
ther reason for the rescue of prisoners or for converting the ship
into a pirate. As to the momentous decision itself, the decision
to execute, he believed that he was driven to it by circumstances.
He says—and in this saying is the whole reason for his subsequent
actions—“In the necessities of my position I found my law, and
in them also I must trust to find my justification.”
We are now at the last act of this drama on the high seas. What
happened cannot be as well described by another as by Com-
mander Mackenzie himself in his report to the Secretary of the
Navy.
I gave orders to make immediate preparations for hanging the three
principal criminals at the main yard arms; all hands were now called to
witness punishment. The afterguard and idlers of both watches were
mustered on the quarter-deck at the whip intended for Mr. Spencer; the
forecastle men and foretop men at that of Cromwell, to whose corruption
they had been chiefly exposed; the maintop men of both watches at that
intended for Small, who for a month or more had held the situation of
captain of the maintop. The officers were stationed about the decks ac-
cording to the watch-bill that I had made out the night before, and the
petty officers were similarly distributed, with orders to cut down whoever
should let go the whip with even one hand, or fail to haul on it when
ordered. The ensign and pennant being bent on and ready for hoisting, I
now put on my full uniform and proceeded to execute the most painful
duty that has ever devolved upon an American commander—that of announc-
ing to the criminals their fate.
Let me interrupt his narrative for a moment in order to quote
a remark by Charles Sumner in regard to the scene which was
now about to take place: “The annals of the world,” says Mr.
Sumner, “do not afford a more impressive scene than that of the
young commander of a small ship, away from his country, at sea,
in the exercise of what he believes to be a solemn duty, ordering


  p. 2080 (#1032)                      

2080
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the execution at the yardarm of a brother officer, the son of a dis-
tinguished minister of state.”
Returning to the Mackenzie report, it continues as follows:
I informed Mr. Spencer that when he had been about to take my life,
and dishonor me as an officer when in the execution of my rightful duty,
without cause of offence to him, on speculation, it had been his intention
to remove me suddenly from the world in the darkness of night, in my
sleep, without a moment to utter one murmur of affection to my wife and
children, one prayer for their welfare. His life was now forfeited to his
country, and the necessities of the case, growing out of his corruption of
the crew, compelled me to take it. I would not, however, imitate his
intended example, as to the manner of claiming the sacrifice. If there
yet remained to him one feeling true to nature, it should be gratified. If
he had any word to send to his parents, it should be recorded and faith-
fully delivered. Ten minutes should be granted him for this purpose,
and Midshipman E. Thompson was called to note the time and inform me
when the ten minutes had elapsed.
This intimation overcame him entirely. He sank, with tears, upon his
knees and said that he was not fit to die. I repeated to him his own
catechism, and begged him at least to let the officer set, to the men he had
corrupted and seduced, the example of dying with decorum.
This immediately restored him to entire self-possession; and, while he
was engaged in prayer, I went and made in succession the same communica-
tion to Cromwell and Small. Cromwell fell upon his knees completely
unmanned, protested his innocence, and invoked the name of his wife. Mr.
Spencer said to me, “As these are the last words I have to say, I trust that
they will be believed. Cromwell is innocent." The evidence had been
conclusive, yet I was staggered. I sent for Lieutenant Gansevoort and
consulted him. He said there was not a shadow of doubt. I told him
to consult the petty officers. He was condemned by acclamation by the
petty officers. He was the one man of whom they had real apprehensions ;
the accomplice at first, and afterward the urger on of Mr. Spencer, who
had trained him to the act by which he intended to benefit.
I returned to Mr. Spencer; I explained to him that remarks had been
made about the two not very flattering to him and which he might not
care to hear, which showed the relative share ascribed to each of them
in the contemplated transaction. He expressed great anxiety to hear
what was said. One had told the first lieutenant “In my opinion, sir, you
have the damned fool [meaning Spencer) on the larboard arms chest, and
the damned villain (meaning Cromwell] on the starboard; "another had
remarked that after the vessel should have been captured by Mr. Spencer,
Cromwell might allow him to live, provided he made himself useful; he
would probably make him his secretary. I remarked, “I do not think this would
have suited your temper." This effectually aroused him; his countenance
assumed a demoniacal expression; he said no more of the innocence of
Cromwell. * * * * Small alone, whom we had set down as the poltroon of
the three, and on that account had at first determined not to iron, received


  p. 2081 (#1033)                      

1925)
2081
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers"
the announcement of his fate with composure. When asked if he had any
preparation to make, any message to send, he said, "I have nobody to care
for me but my poor old mother, and I would rather that she should not
know how I have died.”
I returned to Mr. Spencer and asked him if he had no message to send
to his friends; he answered, “None that they would wish to receive."
When urged still farther to send some words of consolation in so great
an affliction, he said, “Tell them I die wishing them every blessing and
happiness; I deserve death for this and many other crimes—there are
few crimes that I have not committed; I feel sincerely penitent, and my
only fear of death is that my repentance may be too late." I asked him if
there was anyone whom he had injured to whom he could yet make repara-
tion-anyone who was suffering obloquy for crimes which he had com-
mitted; he made no answer, but soon after continued; "I have wronged
many persons, but chiefly my parents;" "This will kill my poor mother.
* * * *" Afterward he said to me, “But have you not formed an ex-
aggerated estimate of the extent of this conspiracy?" I told him, "No,"
that his systematic efforts to corrupt the crew and prepare them for the
indulgence of every evil passion, since the day before our departure from
New York, had been but too successful. I knew that the conspiracy was
still extensive—I did not know how extensive. I recapitulated to him the
arts which he had used; he was startled by my telling him that he had made
the wardroom steward steal brandy and had given it to the crew; he said,
“I did not make him steal it"; I told him that it was brought at his request-
that he knew where it came from-it was, if possible, more criminal to
seduce another to commit crime than to commit crime one's self; he
admitted the justice of this view. He turned again to say to me: “But are
you not going too far-are you not fast? Does the law entirely justify
you?" I replied that he had not consulted me in making his arrangements-
that his opinion could not be an unprejudiced one—that I had consulted
all of his brother officers, his messmates included, except the boys, and I
placed before him their opinion. He stated that it was just, that he
deserved death; he asked me what was the manner of death; I explained
it to him; he objected to it and asked to be shot; I told him that I could
not make any distinction between him and those whom he had corrupted ;
he admitted that this also was just; he objected to the shortness of the
time for preparation, and asked for an hour; no answer was made to this
request, but he was not hurried, and more than the hour for which he
asked was allowed to elapse. He requested that his face might be covered ;
this was readily granted, and he was asked with what it should be covered ;
he did not care; a handkerchief was sought in his locker; none but a black
one found and this brought for the purpose.
I now ordered that the other criminals should be consulted as to their
wishes in this particular; they joined in the request and frocks were
taken from their bags with which to cover their heads. Mr. Spencer asked
to have his irons removed; this could not be granted; he asked for a
Bible and a prayer book; they were brought, and others ordered to be


  p. 2082 (#1034)                      


MUTINY ON BOARD THE UNITED STATES BRIG “SOMERS”
EXECUTION OF SPENCER, CROMWELL, AND SMALL
From the "Piratical and Tragical Almanac" for 1846; Philadelphia


  p. 2083 (#1035)                      

1925]
2083
Attempied Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers"
furnished to his accomplices. “I am a believer," he said; "do you think
that repentance at this late hour can be accepted ?" I called to his recol-
lection the case of the penitent thief who was pardoned by our Savior upon
the cross. He then read in the Bible, kneeled down and read in the prayer
book; he again asked if I thought that his repentance could be accepted-
that the time was so short, and he did not know if he really was changed.
I told him that God, who was all-merciful as well as all-wise, could not
only understand the difficuties of his situation, but extend to him such a
measure of mercy as his necessities might require. He said, “I beg your
forgiveness for what I have meditated against you.” I gave him my
hand, and assured him of my sincere forgiveness; I asked him if I had
ever done anything to him to make him seek my life, or whether the hatred
he had conceived for me, and of which I had only recently become aware,
was fostered for the purpose of giving himself some plea of justification.
He said, “It was only a fancy—perhaps there might have been something
in your manner which offended me." * * * * When Mr. Wales came up,
Mr. Spencer extending his hand to him, said, “Mr. Wales, I earnestly hope
you will forgive me for tampering with your fidelity." Mr. Spencer was
wholly unmoved, Mr. Wales almost overcome with emotion; he replied, "I
do forgive you from the bottom of my heart and I hope that God may
forgive you also.” “Farewell,” exclaimed Mr. Spencer, and Mr. Wales,
weeping and causing others to weep, responded “Farewell.” Mr. Spencer
now passed on; about this time he asked for Midshipman Rodgers, but he
had no orders to leave his station: I was only afterward aware of the
request. At the gangway Mr. Spencer met Small with the same calm
manner, but with a nearer approach to emotion; he placed himself in front
of Small, extended his hand and said, "Small, forgive me for leading you
into this trouble.” Small drew back with horror—“No, by God! Mr.
Spencer, I can't forgive you.” On a repetition of the request, Small ex-
claimed in a searching voice, "Ah, Mr. Spencer, that is a hard thing for
you to ask me; we shall soon be before the face of God, and there we shall
know all about it.” “You must forgive me, Small—I can not die without
your forgiveness." I went to Small and urged him to be more generous-
that this was no time for resentment. He relented at once, held out his
hand to take the still-extended hand of Mr. Spencer, and said with
frankness and emotion, “I do forgive you, Mr. Spencer; may God Almighty
forgive you, also !" Small now asked my forgiveness; he was the one of.
the three who was most entitled to compassion; I took his hand and ex-
pressed my complete forgiveness in the strongest terms that I was able;
I asked him what I had ever said or done to him to make him seek my
life, conscious of no injustice or provocation of any sort: I felt that it was
yet necessary to my comfort to receive the assurance from his own lips.
If any wrong had been done him-if any word of harshness, in the impa-
tience or excitement of duty, had escaped me, I was ready myself to ask
the question before he exclaimed, “What have you done to me, Captain
MacKenzie? What have you done to me, sir?-nothing, but treat me
like a man.” I told him, in justification of the course which I was pur-


  p. 2084 (#1036)                      


an
THE U. S. BRIG-OF-WAR "SOMERS"
From a contemporary print. The two bodies are those of Cromwell and Small. Spencer's body was on the port
yard-arm.


  p. 2085 (#1037)                      

1925] Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somersomers" ”
it, this: "You arebisher duty to his or re
2085
suing, that I had high responsibilities to fulfil—that there were duties
that I owed to the government which had intrusted me with this vessel-
to the officers placed under my command—to those boys whom it was
intended either to put to death, or reserve for a fate more deplorable:
there was yet a higher duty to the flag of my country. He was touched
by this: “You are right, sir ; you are doing your duty, and I honor you for
it; God bless that flag and prosper it! Now brother topmates,” he said,
turning to those who held the whip, "give me a quick and easy death." He
was placed on the hammocks forward of the gangway, with his face in-
board. Mr. Spencer was similarly placed abaſt the gangway, and Crom-
well also on the other side.
Mr. Spencer, about this time, sent for Lieutenant Gansevoort, and told
him that he might have heard that his courage had been doubted; he
wished him to bear testimony that he died like a brave man. He then
asked me what was to be the signal of the execution. I told him that being
desirous to hoist the colors at the moment of execution, at once to give
solemnity to the act and to indicate that by it the colors of the Somers
were fixed to the masthead, I had intended to beat the call as for hoisting
the colors, then roll off, and at the third roll fire a gun. He asked to be
allowed himself to give the word to fire the gun; I acceded to the request,
and the drum and fife were dismissed. * * * * Time still wearing away
in this manner, Small requested leave to address the crew. Mr. Spencer
having leave to give the word, was asked if he would consent to the
delay. He assented, and, Small's face being uncovered, he spoke as follows:
"Shipmates and topmates, take warning by my example; I never was a
pirate, I never killed a man; it's for saying that I would do it that I am
about to depart this life; see what a word will do. It was going in a
Guinea-man that brought me to this; beware of a Guinea-man." He turned
to Mr. Spencer, and said to him, “I am now ready to die, Mr. Spencer, are
you?”
Cromwell's last words were; "Tell my wife I die an innocent man:
tell Lieutenant Morris, I die an innocent man.” But it had been the game
of this man to appear innocent, to urge Mr. Spencer on, to furnish him
with professional ideas, to bring about a catastrophe, of which Mr. Spencer
was to take all of the risk, and from which he, Cromwell, was to derive all
of the benefit. He had taken a great many precautions to appear innocent,
but he had not taken enough. I now placed myself on the trunk in a
situation from which my eye could take in everything. I waited for some
time, but no word was given.
Even after eighty-three years we seem to fix our eyes upon the
young culprit and wait from moment to moment, amid the silence
of the crowded deck, for the word which will hang him, to issue
from his own lips. One minute passes, then another and another,
but he cannot utter it, and turning to a boatswain's mate named
Browning, asks him to tell the captain that he is unable to speak
the word, and that he wishes the captain to give the word himself.


  p. 2086 (#1038)                      

2086
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Commander Mackenzie then called out, “Stand by. Fire!" The
first lieutenant sang out, "Whip!" and the three men were run up
to the yard, Spencer on the port side, Small and Cromwell on the
starboard.
The crew were then called aft and Commander Mackenzie ad-
dressed them at length. He spoke of the tragedy of Spencer's
young life being ruined by his own ill-regulated ambition and his
infamous aims; how he had disgraced his honored parents and
thrown away the chance to win success in his profession; he spoke
of the future of his hearers and told them how it was entirely in
their power to win competence and rank by their own character
and industry; he told them that their conduct must be founded on
truth, honor, and fidelity; and he illustrated his remarks by anec-
dote. The rest of the day is thus described by him:
The crew were now piped down from witnessing punishment, and all
hands called to cheer the ship. I gave the order, “Stand by, to give three
hearty cheers for the flag of our country"; never were three heartier
cheers given. In that electric moment, I do not doubt that the patriotism
of even the worst of the conspirators, for an instant, broke forth. I felt
that I once more was completely commander of the vessel that was
intrusted to me, equal to do with her whatever the honor of my country
might require. The crew were now piped down and piped to dinner. I
noticed with pain that many of the boys, as they looked at the yard arm,
indulged in laughter and derision. I still earnestly desired that Mr.
Spencer should be buried as officers usually are, in a coffin. I ordered one
to be forthwith made from a portion of the berth-deck; but Lieutenant
Gansevoort, having offered to relinquish two mess chests, used instead of a
wardroom stores room, they were soon converted into a substantial coffin.
When the hour usually given to the crew's dinner was over, the watch
was set and the bodies lowered from the yardarms and received by the
messmates of the deceased, to be decently laid out for burial, the midship-
men assisting in person. When all was ready, the first lieutenant invited
me to accompany him to see that these duties had been duly performed.
Mr. Spencer was laid out on the starboard armschest, dressed in complete
uniform, except the sword, which he had forfeited the right to wear.
Further forward, the two seamen were also laid out with neatness. . . . .
At this moment a sudden squall sprung up, making it necessary to reduce
sail; it was attended by heavy rain, and tarpaulins were hastily thrown
over the corpses. The squall over, the sailors were sewed up in their
hammocks—the body of Mr. Spencer was placed in the coffin. The three
corpses, arranged according to rank, Mr. Spencer alt, were placed along
the deck. All hands were now called to bury the dead; the procession was
formed according to rank; . ... the ensign was lowered to half-mast.
Before the corpses had been placed on the lee, hammock-sails were ready
for lowering overboard. The night had already set in; all of the battle


  p. 2087 (#1039)                      

1925]
2087
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers”
lanterns and the other lanterns in the vessel were lighted and distributed
among the crew. Collected, with their prayer books, on the booms, in the
gangways, and lee-quarter-boat, the service was then read, the responses
audibly and devoutly made by the officers and crew, and the bodies were
consigned to the deep.
Night closed in. The little brig was free at last of the dangers
of the past six days. An immediate change in the demeanor of
the crew took place; where slowness and sullenness had prevailed,
were now alacrity and obedience. That night for the first time in
several nights sleep again visited the pillows of the officers. The
ship continued on her way to New York via St. Thomas, with the
four remaining prisoners kept in manacles to await trial on their
arrival in the United States.
Thirteen days after the execution, or on December 14, she
sailed past the lower end of Manhattan Island up the East River,
and dropped anchor off the Navy Yard, Brooklyn. It became evi-
dent that there was something mysterious about the ship, for her
officers did not come ashorė on leave, and visitors were not allowed
to go on board of her. A brother of Lieutenant Gansevoort was
denied admission to the ship. Commander Mackenzie, on coming
to anchor, had sent one of his officers ashore, Midshipman O H.
Perry, with instructions to proceed to Washington and deliver to
the Secretary of the Navy a letter containing a brief report of the
attempt at mutiny and the subsequent events, and requesting a
court of inquiry. Then he ordered all of the ship's company to
go ashore with him; and with himself at their head marched sol
emnly to the nearest church, where he gave public thanks to
Almighty God for the recent miraculous preservation of his ship
and her company from the horrors of capture and murder by
mutineers. This ceremony completed, they returned to the ship.
A tendency toward religious exaltation on the part of Commander
Mackenzie is noticeable in several instances while he was handling
the mutiny on board his ship, and it should be regarded as a trait
in his character.
On December 19, Commander Mackenzie supplemented his first
brief report to the Secretary of the Navy by a very long one giving
a full account of the attempted mutiny, together with the reasons
for his own actions in relation to it. It is from this report that
quotations have already been made in this article. It was pub-
lished in Washington by authority of the government and was
copied by newspapers in all parts of the country. A sure theme


  p. 2088 (#1040)                      

2088
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of conversation in every gathering of people was the mutiny on
board the Somers. The social prominence of the actors in it, the
terrible outcome of the scheme, made the subject a burning one.
Soon the influence of political feeling on opinion was shown by
those persons who were Henry Clay Whigs and detested Presi-
dent Tyler, for to them the fact that Midshipman Spencer's father
was a member of Mr. Tyler's Cabinet was an incentive to believe
that Commander Mackenzie had probably dealt justly with the
son of his father. The personal attraction of Commander Macken-
zie, the excellent reputation that he enjoyed as an officer, and his
popularity as a literary man—all helped to make the majority of
educated people both in New York and Boston disposed to believe
that in suppressing the mutiny he could not have avoided perform-
ing the disagreeable duty of over-riding the law. Nevertheless,
there was a minority of thinking persons who refused to take this
attitude, and awaited, with great interest the court of inquiry
which had been ordered by the Navy Department and which was
to meet in open session on December 28, on board the U.S.S.
North Carolina at the Navy Yard, Brooklyn. Even among his ad-
mirers there was general regret at the style and tone of his long
statement to the Secretary of the Navy. As Mr. Philip Hone,
who was friendly to him, remarks in his diary: “The truth is,
there is much to be seen in this statement of the pride of author-
ship.”
The numbers of the court of inquiry were the following dis-
tinguished veterans: Commodore Charles Stewart, who had
fought the famous action of the Constitution with the Cyane and
Levant twenty-seven years before; Commodore Jacob Jones, who
on the Wasp took the Frolic in 1812; and Commodore Alexander
J. Dallas, who had fought under Rodgers in the President. The
judge-advocate was Mr. Ogden Hoffman, District Attorney of
New York, who had formerly been in the Navy, and Mr. John
Hone was allowed to assist Commander Mackenzie in his defense.
The court was ordered to report to the Navy Department its opin-
ion as to the right and propriety of the conduct of Commander
Mackenzie in ordering the execution of Midshipman Spencer and
Cromwell and Small. It sat from December 28, 1842, until Jan-
uary 19, 1843, examining in this time all of the officers of the
Somers and the majority of the crew. As it was only a court of
inquiry and was destined to be followed by a court-martial of


  p. 2089 (#1041)                      

1925) Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers."
2089
Commander Mackenzie, its findings have not quite the same
weight as those of the later and more thorough investigation, but
every word of its proceedings was followed from day to day by
the whole country. “All the world," writes Richard Henry Dana
on December 29, “is talking about the Somers mutiny and the
execution of Spencer. The prevailing opinion (I have not met an
exception), is that Mackenzie will justify himself. I have little
doubt of it.”
The findings of the court under the date of January 20, 1843,
were as follows (I quote only the last clause) :
That Commander Mackenzie under these circumstances was not bound
to risk the safety of his vessel, and jeopardize the lives of his crew, in order
to secure to the guilty the forms of trial, and that the immediate execution
of the prisoners was demanded by duty and justified by necessity. The
court are further of opinion that throughout all of these painful occur-
rences so well calculated to disturb the judgment and try the energy of the
bravest and most experienced officer, the conduct of Commander Mackenzie
and his officers was prudent, calm, and firm, and he and they honorably
performed their duty to the service and their country.
(Signed) CHARLES STEWART,
President of the Court
While the court of inquiry was still sitting, and before its find-
ings were arrived at, the Navy Department, either at the instiga-
tion of Secretary of War Spencer, or on its own initiative, decided
that a court-martial of Commander Mackenzie was required by
the circumstances. In this decision it was probably expressing the
growing opinion of the thinking public. On February 2, there-
fore, an impressive court-martial composed of thirteen officers,
eleven captains and two commanders, with Captain Downes as
president, met on board the U.S.S. North Carolina. The judge-
advocate was Mr. William H. Norris, of Baltimore, and the coun-
sel for the accused were Messrs. John Duer, George Griffin, and
Theodore Sedgwick, distinguished lawyers of New York. Two
other equally distinguished lawyers, Charles O'Connor and B. F.
Butler, also of New York, were, for some unknown reason, de-
nied the right to be present at the sessions of the court to rep-
resent the interests of the dead midshipman and his comrades.
On February in the court transferred its sittings to the little
chapel in the Navy Yard, Brooklyn, where it continued to meet
every week-day until its final verdict on March 28. During all of
this time the controversy of the public over the conduct of Com-


  p. 2090 (#1042)                      

2090
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
mander Mackenzie never ceased to rage. It even reached Eng-
land where the reviews strongly condemned Mackenzie and called
him murderer and other names. Our own New York Herald used
similar language toward him. Every day of the trial visitors would
come over from New York to Brooklyn to attend it. “My daugh-
ters," writes Philip Hone in his diary, "went over with Mrs.
de Peyster, Mrs. John Hone, and Emily. I also formed one of
the delighted audience, prejudiced, I acknowledge, in favor of the
accused.”
The charges against Commander Mackenzie at this court-
martial were five in number, as follows: murder, oppression,
illegal punishment, conduct unbecoming an officer, and cruelty.
Of these, the last two were abandoned for want of proof. On
April 14, 1843, the verdict was promulgated. As all of the world
knows, it was one of acquittal, though the word "honorable" was
not included before the word "acquittal”; and the finding was
simply “confirmed and carried into effect without any expression
of approbation or disapprobation on the part of the President, no
such expression being necessary.”
The proceedings of the famous trial are almost as interesting
now as when they took place. We devour the testimony with a
determination to digest it and to know where we stand in regard
to a decision on the facts as they appear to us. With such a motive
the present writer will note and comment on a few of the salient
points of the trial, weighing the testimony from the viewpoint of
one who has a knowledge of later facts additional to those brought
out in the trial. To begin with, the crew of the Somers included
89 sailors under age out of 108 persons; and the age of no fewer
than 83 of these boys ran from only 13 years to 19 years. There
were only 18 men of over 21 years of age. If any proof of the
boyishness, not to say childishness, of a part of the crew were
needed, it is furnished by the recital in Commander Mackenzie's
letter to the Secretary of the Navy, of the shocking levity of these
lads just after the hanging of the three prisoners. “I noticed with
pain,” he says, "that many of the boys, as they looked at the yard-
arm, indulged in laughter and derision." The first thought that
occurs to one in reading of this youthful crew is that the mutiny
must have been confined to a small group of grown men on the
ship. Assuming that half of the grown men would be loyal, and
adding to them the eleven officers, there would seem to be a for-


  p. 2091 (#1043)                      

1925)
2091
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers"
midable band of about twenty people to handle the remaining
grown men and the boys. This does not appear at first sight a
dangerous situation, but let us read on and see what Richard
Henry Dana says about it. He went on board the Somers when
he was in New York and noted her "single narrow deck flush fore
and aft," and that there were only two exits to this deck from
below for the officers—one from the cabin and the other from
the steerage. “The officers,” he says, “would have to come up the
steps and through the small companion scuttles, at which a couple
of men could easily have cut them down or shot them as they
appeared.” Continuing, he says, "one must either have been at
sea or be willing to receive something on faith for those who have,
to judge fairly of this case.” He adds that the facts "are such as
can never come to us with the same force and meaning with which
they came to him (Commander Mackenzie) at the time.” Mr.
Dana writes thus in a letter to the Boston and New York papers
of January 11, 1843, before the trial by court-martial was begun,
and having already prejudged the case in favor of Commander
Mackenzie. On reading him today one asks oneself why the con-
ditions which he describes as possible in regard to the subjection
of all of the officers by only two armed mutineers, might not be
equally applicable if all the mutineers were below and only two
armed officers stood ready to cut them down as they poked their
heads above the lower deck.
We are told that Midshipman Spencer had a mania for piracy;
in fact, he tells us so himself. The impression received of this
young man, both from the testimony about him in this trial and
from other knowledge of him, is that he was a silly, vicious-
minded and insubordinate person, but only a lad of nineteen, and
possibly not yet developed as to character. Yet, in spite of his
youth, he might have been both a traitor and a villain. That Com-
mander Mackenzie regarded him as fully grown is shown by the
following statement he made to the court of inquiry:
I am prepared to prove that more than a year ago it was one of the
amusements of Mr. Spencer to relate to the young children of one of the
professors of Geneva College, in whose family he was domesticated,
murderous stories and tales of blood; that the chief and favorite theme of
his conversation was piratical exploits and the pleasures of a pirate's life; •
that the great object of his ambition was renown as a pirate; that the
book which he oftenest read, and which, on leaving Geneva College to
embark in a whaler, he presented to the students' library, was the Pirate's


  p. 2092 (#1044)                      

2092
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Own Book, and that it still remains there with his name in it; that, on
stepping into the stagecoach to leave Geneva, the last words he said to a
friend who took leave of him were that he would next be heard of as a
pirate.
The paper in Greek characters is evidence of how obsessed with
a desire to mutiny was the mind of young Spencer; yet there is
something decidedly childish and silly, first, in using Greek at all ;
second, in committing his scheme to paper; third, in calling the
attention of Midshipman Tillotson to the fact that he was at work
on a very mysterious paper which he could not allow anyone to
see; fourth, in putting down no less than twenty names as men
to be coerced, although the coercion was to be done by only four
who were “Certain" and perhaps by some of the “Doubtful."
Both his childishness and his ambition to be a pirate are also
shown by his drawing on one occasion a picture of a brig with a
black flag bearing a skull and crossbones, and then inviting the
attention of Midshipman Hayes to it. There is too much testi-
mony to doubt that this poorly developed young man would have
liked to mutiny, and the evidence also seems to show that he in-
duced Elisha Small to promise to follow his lead in case a mutiny
were put into effect. I am unable to fasten with certainty the
motive of mutiny on Samuel Cromwell. He was a desperate and
insubordinate man, but he was too able to be led by the nose in
any foolish and uncertain scheme. He had enemies before the
mast on account of his tyranny, and his intimacy with an officer
probably brought him more. But, the score of reasons given by
Commander Mackenzie for putting him in irons seems but neg-
ligible as legal testimony, and merely resolve themselves with one
general offense: namely, “the badness of his general character
and conduct.”
As there was no evidence of ill treatment by the officers of the
crew, but on the contrary there was a regard for their welfare and
comfort shown by Commander Mackenzie, there was not the
slightest excuse for a mutiny among the score of grown-up sailors
on the Somers. The apprentice boys were too young to be con-
sidered as material for the making of a mutiny. Therefore, it
was only a desire to roam the seas, to capture booty, to murder
men, and to enslave women, which appealed to the undeveloped
Spencer and to the weak-minded Small, and made them hope to
lead others along the same alluring way.


  p. 2093 (#1045)                      

1925) Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers”
2093
That discontent and sullenness existed among the crew after
leaving Madeira seems to be proved, but this might well have been
due to the bad examples of subordination shown by Spencer and
Cromwell. In any event, it never was considered dangerous until
the officers examined it in retrospect and connected it in their
minds with the subsequent symptoms of mutiny. Lieutenant
Gansevoort himself testifies that he had no suspicion of a mutiny
before November 26.
The sincerity of Commander Mackenzie's belief in the existence
of a plot to mutiny is conspicuous in every act of his during the
six days from November 26 to December 1. The same may be
said of Lieutenant Gansevoort. Belief in the mutiny, even if un-
founded, unquestionably justified the act of the commanding offi-
cer in putting the supposed ringleaders in irons; but, belief in a
plot to rescue the prisoners and to take possession of the ship
could only justify the law-breaking act of the execution of the
prisoners if founded on a reasoned certainty that the mutineers
could really effect a rescue, could really overcome the officers, and
could become the masters of the ship. There is nothing in the
evidence to prove that such a rescue was even meditated, or, if
attempted, could have succeeded. The imaginations of Com-
mander Mackenzie and his first lieutenant led them to create
greater dangers than existed. Their error in interpretation of the
facts before them led them into doing wrong. To put men in
irons is merely to take precautions; to hang them is a very grave
matter and may be to commit a crime.
The imagination of 1843 as exercised by the minds of sensible
men on the subject of piracy cannot be understood by us moderns
unless we remember that piracy had been as I have already re-
marked the "scourge of nearly every sea" until only recently, and
especially of the West Indies. Bearing this in mind we should
not be amazed at the language of Mr. Charles Sumner, who wrote
a long article on this trial, strongly favorable to Commander
Mackenzie, in the North American Review in 1843. Following
the lead of Mr. Griffin, the counsel of the accused, who had in-
dulged his fancy in imagining the Somers as having turned pirate
and captured some passenger ship plying between New York and
Europe, "freighted with the talent and beauty of the land,” Mr.
Sumner joins him in raising hands of horror at the subsequent
treatment of the fair passengers by the pirates, picturing the latter


  p. 2094 (#1046)                      

2094
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
as "bearing to foreign shores wives in the fresh morning of a
husband's love, and maidens the light and joy of happy house-
hold hearths,” and subjecting them to horrors indescribable. With
similar pictures in his mind, and, in addition, with a rooted con-
viction that the mutineers of the Somers were only waiting for
the proper moment to take possession of his ship, what else could
Commander Mackenzie do but hang the three would-be pirates
who were known to be the only ones among the mutineers who
could navigate and handle a vessel ?
As about half of the petty officers of the Somers were loyal and
were trusted by the commanding officer to the extent of his arm-
ing them against the mutineers, there does not seem to be any good
reason for supposing that the loyal men could not have prevented
the others from effecting a rescue of the prisoners until such time
as the brig might arrive at a port. The inconvenience, or the im-
possibility, of working the ship with seven prisoners in irons
encumbering the deck can hardly be considered as a reason for
hanging some of them in order to get them out of the way. Com-
mander Mackenzie kept four men in irons, McKinley, Green, Wil-
son, and McKie, all the way to New York, and as soon as he
dropped anchor there, put three more men and five big boys in
irons, for he suspected them all of having been concerned in the
mutiny, and not without some reason, for most of them had been
on Spencer's list - the “Doubtful.” Nothing could better illus-
trate his belief in magnitude of the conspiracy against his ship
than this confineinent of twelve persons, after executing three
others. Yet it is an extraordinary fact that a court-martial last-
ing forty days could not bring out sufficient evidence against these
twelve men and boys to make Commander Mackenzie, after con-
ferring with one of his lawyers, Theodore Sedgwick, decide to
bring charges against a single one of them. Well might it be com-
mented, as it was at the time: “If no offense could be discovered
which would subject the offenders [the twelve above mentioned]
to a trial before a court-martial, what becomes of all these charges
of mutinous conduct which compelled the commander to put three
helpless prisoners to death?” So wrote Mr. William Sturgis, of
Boston, an eminent ship master and practical seaman himself,
whose published remarks on the Somers case were in direct oppo-
sition to the opinions of his young friend and protegé, Richard
Henry Dana.


  p. 2095 (#1047)                      

1925)
2095
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig "Somers”
The report of December 19, on the attempted mutiny, by Com-
mander Mackenzie is the most important document in this trial in
his defense, but its length of sixteen double-column printed pages
prevents its complete inclusion in this article. An estimate of the
general character of this paper as an argument in his favor, and
of the impression it makes on a reader of today, will now be
attempted by one who at least has endeavored to make an impartial
study of it. The first thing to be said of the report is that it is
too long. It is filled with remarks that tend to be irrelevant; or
if necessary to the story, they are treated with a weight that they
do not deserve. The whole report is emotional, written in a key
of exaltation that is at times religious, at times invoking in high-
sounding phrase the reverence for country and for flag which we
all feel. Its sincerity is evident, but so is its rhetoric, its impor-
tance, its confidence, its pride. There is blindness to its own
trivialities and to its inconsistencies in appraising the details of
the tragedy which it describes. One is amazed to read in this re-
port of Commander Mackenzie that among the defects of conduct
of Midshipman Spencer-defects which included drunkenness and
scandalous conduct—he lists the fact that Spencer had the "habit
of amusing the crew by making music with his jaw." "He had
the faculty," says Commander Mackenzie, "of throwing his jaw
out of joint, and by the contact of the bones, playing with accuracy
and elegance a variety of airs." This trivial, irrelevant, and child-
like announcement in the midst of his rel: of a profound
tragedy is not understood by the common-sense mind. It makes
us wonder if, with all his long report, he felt that tragedy as
deeply as it deserved to be felt. There are other examples of
uneven treatment of fact in his assignment of suspicion to the
various acts of some of the mutineers. He details at length unim-
portant traits of personality; he finds reason to see danger in
actions which appear to us to bear little or no evidence of guilty
motive. These he classes with other actions that are of real im-
portance. Prolix, self-conscious in its eloquence, occasionally un-
dignified, his report yet tells a story which of itself makes one read
every word of it; and it must be added that one rises from the
reading with a perplexed feeling as to just how deep the roots of
mutiny struck in the personnel on board the Somers. Was it as
deep as depicted by Commander Mackenzie ?


  p. 2096 (#1048)                      

2096
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The literature brought into being by the Mackenzie trial was
voluminous and in some cases of a high quality. The long review
of the case by Charles Sumner is pitched in the intellectual key
that we should expect. He states among other things that it is
absurd to say that the Somers was "not at least in apparent dan-
ger, when all the officers join in testifying to its existence," but
he adds that all question of the guilt or innocence of Spencer,
Cromwell, and Small is irrelevant. Providing the commanding
officer, seeing this apparent danger, acted in good faith in causing
the executions and believing them to be necessary to the safety
of his ship, then the commanding officer is entitled to receive the
protection of the law. This is, indeed, intellectual to the ordinary,
sea-going, ship-handling mind, which balks at the proposition that
whatever the commanding officer thinks to be danger, and what-
ever fearful interpretation he may put on acts that may merely be
somewhat out of the ordinary, nevertheless, he is justified in going
as far as he likes in combating the evil that he sees in his mind's
eye. To the common-sense reader of the testimony in this case
the facts of the situation do not appear to have been either accu-
rately or sensibly interpreted by the commanding officer and by
his first lieutenant, and therefore did not justify the sequel. Mr.
Sumner does not pay as much attention to weighing these facts as
he does to propounding law, which, of course, he knew as a master
and which we humbly accept from his lips. His review has literary
attraction, with its history of famous mutinies of the past, though
they do not seem to bear closely on the Somers' case. His estimate
of the value of Commander Mackenzie's services to the nation is
logical, even if excessive in its appraisal. Here it is: "He
[Mackenzie) has done more than gain a battle, and deserves more
than the homage of admiration and gratitude with which we greet
the victor returning from successful war. We thank him, and the
country thanks him, that he did not hesitate.” Commander
Mackenzie could ask no better friend and advocate than this, but
he had another endorser almost as admiring in Richard Henry
Dana, whose favoring letter to the New York and Boston papers
has, in the opinion of Charles Francis Adams, a permanent in-
terest, "for it is the judgment of a man whose judgment carried
weight in this painful episode in our naval history, in regard to
which opinions then were, and probably always will remain di-
vided.” Mr. Dana states the most important point in the case


  p. 2097 (#1049)                      

1925)
2097
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers"
when he says that it is necessary for Commander Mackenzie to
prove that the arrested persons could not be taken into port in
irons. “For this," he adds, “must be made out, or the execution
is unjustifiable.” Mr. Dana wrote this letter during the court of
inquiry, but there is no record that his favorable conclusions of
that time were afterward altered by anything brought out in the
testimony of the court-martial. Mr. Adams is right in attributing
weight to the opinions of Mr. Dana. To the sea-faring student
of this case, Mr. Dana's reasoning, touched as it is with sympathy
for Mackenzie, carries such weight that he turns again to re-
examine the testimony of the officers of the Somers, and especially
of Sergeant Garty, Gunner's Mate Collins, Quartermaster Rogers
and other witnesses for the defense. Again he feels that although
there was undoubtedly a spirit of unrest and lawlessness existing
in a few minds on board the brig, yet he cannot read into these
signs as much as did Mr. Sumner and Mr. Dana. At this point
one should read the pungent articles of Mr. William Sturgis
already referred to, whose technical objections to Mr. Dana's con-
clusions in this case are convincing to one reader at least. Among
the interesting observations of Mr. Sturgis on the testimony of the
trial is the following: “Cromwell, I firmly believe had no more
intention to capture the Somers and turn pirate than had Com-
mander Mackenzie himself.”
But there is no article or review called forth by this remarkable
trial more analytical, more illuminating as to technicalities, than
the eighty-page review of it by James Fenimore Cooper, published
in New York in 1844. It is masterly in its keenness of observa-
tion of the motives behind the various acts of the chief persons
in the drama. Even a psycho-analyst would be satisfied with it.
The literary powers of the author are conspicuous, and those ad-
mirers of Cooper who collect his works are not aware that their
collections are seriously incomplete, if lacking the rare volume
known as The Mackenzie Case, with a review by J. F. Cooper.
There is no incident of importance in the whole six days' story
which he does not examine and interpret. The proved courage
of Commander Mackenzie is a matter of history, but we cannot
disagree with the general statement of Cooper when he remarks
that "brave men, those who are ready to risk their lives on all
suitable occasions, often see danger where there is truly none."
The substance of all of Mr. Cooper's reasoning and arguments


  p. 2098 (#1050)                      

2098
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
is to be found in the last four words of his review which attribute
the tragedy, among other causes, to a "lamentable deficiency of
judgment.”
Before the Cooper review was published the facts relating to
the division of the votes of the twelve officers who comprised the
court-martial at its close, appear to have been drawn out on
authority, and it was said that nine of the members of the court
had voted "not guilty” on the charge of murder, and three
"guilty”; on the charge of illegal punishment, eight had voted
“not guilty," and four "guilty.” The report that Commander
Mackenzie had not received a unanimous acquittal did not tend to
quiet the contention that raged around his name among civilians.
Among his colleagues it was different; for “the feeling was so
strong,” says G. R. Clark in his History of the Navy, "that it be-
came a point of etiquette among naval officers never to discuss the
mutiny on the Somers.” This silence, both among themselves and
especially toward the outside world, was continued for scores of
years. Captain William H. Parker, writing in his interesting
Recollections, as late as 1883, speaks of the mutiny on the Somers,
but adds that he declines to express any opinions concerning it.
That Commander Mackenzie still carried the majority of the
public with him just after the verdict of the court was made
known, is probable. On May 11, 1843, Mr. Philip Hone, of New
York, writes thus in his diary: "A letter is published signed by
three hundred merchants and others of our most respectable citi-
zens, addressed to Commander Alexander S. Mackenzie, express-
ing their approval of his conduct in the unhappy affair of the
mutiny on board the Somers and their congratulations on his
honorable acquittal by the court of inquiry and court-martial.
His answer to this high compliment is much better written and in
better taste than his unfortunate statement to the government on
his arrival. ...." Commander Mackenzie received a similar letter
of congratulation from citizens of the same class in the city of
Boston. The trial was now over-a thing of the past—and his-
tory, aided by time, was to deal with the mutiny on the Somers.
Thirteen years later the public was interested to read from the
pen of Senator Thomas H. Benton, of Missouri, a long review of
the whole tragedy in his book called the Thirty Years View. It
was strongly condemnatory of Mackenzie, but it probably ex-
pressed the prevailing civilian point of view as it had gradually


  p. 2099 (#1051)                      

1925)
2099
Attempted Mutiny on U. S. Brig “Somers”
shaped itself. The article is by an able mind, but too severe on
the officers of the Somers, and not so accurate in its facts or in-
ferences as the review by Fenimore Cooper. It is in strong con-
trast to the views held by the senator's colleague at the time of
writing, Mr. Charles Sumner, to whom he does not even refer
except to say that Mackenzie had been “encomiastically reviewed
in a high literary journal.” There does not appear to be any fur-
ther writing of note on the mutiny in this country until 1889 when
Miss Abigail Dodge, better known as “Gail Hamilton," wrote for
a magazine a full story of the tragedy in three instalments accom-
panied by illustrations, more or less accurate, of incidents in the
story. She called her article "The Murder of Spencer," and a note
of shrill denunciation of Commander Mackenzie and of some of
his officers runs through it, leaving them little character. Miss
Dodge calls aloud for the restoration of the three victims to the .
right to bear a good name. Her story is too blind in its judgments
to be valuable. It was impossible for Mackenzie to be as bad as
she painted him.
The naval histories have dealt with the mutiny on the Somers
either scantily, though favorably to Mackenzie, or else not at
all. Fenimore Cooper's third volume of his naval history, coming
down to 1852, was written by another hand than his own, and its
account of the mutiny, mildly favorable to Mackenzie, does not
reflect the opinion of Cooper himself. In 1900 Mr. Park Benjamin
in his History of the U. S. Naval Academy gives an account of
the mutiny, quotes with approval Charles Sumner on it, and vehe-
mently decries the efforts of those mistaken people who desire the
"canonization" of the "three miscreants” who had been, in his
opinion, rightly hanged. A similar view, though less pronounced
in its partiality to Mackenzie, is expressed in the history of the
Navy by G. Ramsay Clark and others, but its account of the occur-
rence is neither full nor very accurate.
But, let us get back to 1843 and the last chapter of this sad story.
There is no tragedy complete without women, and there were
three of them to suffer when the Somers dropped anchor off
Brooklyn. The mother of Spencer, shocked beyond relief, was
to die not long afterwards, believing sacredly in the innocence of
her son to the last. Even the rude Cromwell had a wife who cared
for him, and she tried, though in vain, to bring punishment
through the civil courts on the one she held responsible for her


  p. 2100 (#1052)                      

2100
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
bereavement. I find no record of the humble mother of the weak,
hard-drinking Small, but we know that she sent him to sea with a
Bible, and that a letter of affection from her aged hand was found
in it on the day that he was strung up.
As for the chief actor in this tragedy, there can be no better de-
scription of his plight, even after acquittal by his brother officers,
than the words which Mr. Sumner applied to him, quoting from
Plato: "He who has slain a man, however justly, is not to be
envied.” Commander Mackenzie was not happy in his remaining
years. How could he be, for the attacks upon him for his conduct
in the mutiny never wholly ceased ? In less than six years, dur-
ing which period he distinguished himself in the land attack on
Vera Cruz in the war with Mexico, he died at the comparatively
early age of forty-five. The brig Somers herself passed out of
existence in 1846, going down in a gale off Vera Cruz and carry-
ing three midshipmen and thirty-seven of her crew with her.
In writing of this painful event in our naval history the author
has been moved more by a desire to explain than to condemn. Our
judgment of the occurrence should include a knowledge of the
times as well as of the individuals.


  p. 2101 (#1053)                      

ENGINEERING ECONOMY ON AUXILIARY
VESSELS
By COMMANDER R. R. Smith, U. S. Navy
URING the year 1924-25, the engineering competition was
extended to include all auxiliary vessels in regular commis-
sion, 123 vessels being added. With the exception of ves-
sels of the gunboat class, all vessels in previous competition classes
have been of a more or less uniform military type with corre-
sponding similarity of duty. In the gunboat class a similarity of
duty existed without similarity of type. The arrangement of
auxiliary vessels into classes presented many difficulties, due to the
wide variation in type and duty performed. A vessel doing the
duties of a tender, for example, uses considerably more fuel than
a sister ship acting as a supply vessel. It was not practical to class
these vessels according to type, and the grouping was therefore
based upon duties performed. The original assignment to duties
involves similarity of type to some extent.
Three new classes were established as follows: transport class,
tender class, and mine sweeper class. The transport class, as the
name indicates, includes those vessels engaged in the service of
supply, and which would normally steam a great number of miles;
the tender class includes destroyer tenders, submarine tenders,
aircraft tenders, repair ships, aircraft carriers, and mine layers;
the mine sweeper class includes the mine sweepers of the bird class
and all commissioned ocean tugs. Surveying vessels were added
to the gunboat class.
The establishment of some form of engineering performances
for these vessels was felt essential in the interests of economy.
The widely varying expenditures of sister vessels indicated a lack
of economical operation which required remedial measures. Gen-
erally speaking, wide variations of fuel consumptions between
similar vessels for similar tasks, or between the different perform-
ances of any one vessel, indicate a lack of uniformity, which, in
turn, indicates an absence of standard engineering methods, and
consequently inefficient operation of the plant the greater part of


  p. 2102 (#1054)                      

2102
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the time. The construction of a fuel consumption curve, using
fuel consumption per hour against speed, and plotting each record
of fuel consumption separately, shows graphically the spread or
range of fuel consumptions at any one speed. Ships showing uni-
formity of expenditures generally burn considerably less fuel than
ships showing large variables. Likewise, the consumption of fuel
in port shown by some auxiliary vessels was extremely high.
Many vessels of the tender class burn twice the fuel used by a
battleship, but for other vessels not engaged in cargo operations,
fuel consumptions at anchor should be far below battleship con-
sumption. In many cases, however, battleship consumption was
equalled or exceeded by these vessels.
The first step in any attempt to reduce fuel consumption is to
establish standards for the various operations and then to com-
pare the fuel consumptions to the standards. The comparative
figures or unit scores for each condition of operation serve as a
basis for comparing the work of the different vessels. It is quite
safe to use the consumptions of the best performer as a prelimi-
nary standard for the others, providing the machinery installation
does not vary greatly.
The problem of establishing port allowances for auxiliary ves-
sels presented many angles for solution. To give each vessel an
allowance for each hour, based on its average duty and average
needs, was not considered desirable because there exists a great
inequality in the number of assigned tasks and their duration, and
secondly, because it was not desired to encourage a curtailment
of work, which might result with a constant fixed allowance. The
alternative was to grant each vessel a basic hourly allowance at
anchor, predicated only on the normal ship needs without a work
load with additional allowances for service tasks. In the case of
an oil tanker, for example, the normal condition exists when the
cargo pumps are not in operation, and for a tender the normal
ship load is carried only when the ships are not in operation. The
method of assigning allowances for task units was therefore
adopted after service opinion was canvassed. Allowances for
intermittent work performed were made to cover the following
tasks:
Transport Class
Oilers-Discharging oil per 1,000 gallons.
Discharging water ballast per 1,000 gallons.
Cargo and ammunition Ships-Loading or discharging cargo per 100 tons.


  p. 2103 (#1055)                      

1925)
2103
Engineering Economy on Auxiliary Vessels
Colliers-Discharging coal per 100 tons.
Store Ships--Loading or discharging cargo per 100 tons.
Refrigerating cargo space 100 tons per hour.
Manufacturing ice per 100 lbs. for issue to other vessels.
A special allowance was made each vessel in this class for going along-
side a dock or another vessel to compensate the vessel for the uneconomical
underway performance occasioned by such maneuvers.
Tender Class
Electricity used by shops-per KW hour.
Electricity used to charge submarine batteries.
Supplying steam to other vessels-based on a percentage of the supplied
vessel's allowance per hour at anchor.
Mine Sweeper Class
An allowance for towing, equal to a percentage increase of the allowance
for the speed made was assigned vessels of this class for towing various
standard craft such as targets and barges. These percentages were es-
tablished by actual reports of towing operations for long periods at sea and
are probably correct and equitable.
A "tugging" allowance was established for work about closed harbors.
It is essentially arbitrary, bul. being the same for all vessels of this type, it
is basically equitable.
The mechanics of the competition for auxiliary vessels are not
as simple as for the military types. This is unfortunate, too, be-
cause an even simpler form would be desirable owing to the fewer
officers attached to these vessels and to their usual aversion to
"paper work." The onerous details are unavoidable if anything
in the nature of a real competition is to be established.
Why a competition for auxiliary vessels at all? The reductions
in fuel consumptions which are bound to result will be of such
major benefit that all objections are at once swept away. The
application of this competition to auxiliary vessels covering all
engineering performances both underway and in port compels an
attention to the condition of the plant, its hours of operation, its
methods of operation, and its fuel consumptions that will even-
tually insure, (1) reduced fuel consumptions, (2) better material
condition of the plant, (3) increased steaming radii, and (4) a
specific logistic knowledge of the capabilities of our auxiliaries by
the fleet commanders, which has heretofore not obtained. The
comparative performances of vessels of similar type will serve
squarely to indicate the efficient and inefficient vessels. There has
been a laissez faire in the matter of engineering performances of


  p. 2104 (#1056)                      

2104
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
these vessels which is soon to pass, and which, from all indica-
tions, is soon to be replaced by active and searching interest on
the part of those most concerned with the performances of these
vessels. One of the substantial benefits of the analyses which are
being made and which will continue to be made, is the informa-
tion placed in the hands of feet and unit commanders and com-
manding officers concerning these vessels. With such informa-
tion, they may point out defects and demand improvements.
One annual full power trial is required of each vessel. The
most frequent comments which appear on the reports of these
trials are: “This is the first full power trial held by this vessel
since the acceptance trials”; or, “This is the first full power trial
held of which there is any record.” There frequently appears com-
ment attesting to the lively interest displayed by the crew. The
surprising feature of these trials is the number of vessels making
successful trials. Several vessels have asked to have the required
speed increased, while one vessel laconically remarked that they
had to slow down from their normal cruising speed to make the
full power run. In some cases the speeds required were probably
too high. All of these things were, of course, to be expected, con-
sidering the lack of specific knowledge of the capabilities of the
vessels. They only serve again to indicate the necessity for closer
supervision.
In extension of the previous remarks concerning the widely
varying performances of similar vessels, there have been selected
several outstanding examples of performances by vessels of the
same types. The types of vessels are for obvious reasons omitted.
First Group
(Five sister vessels in group)
Vessel Vessel Vessel
No. I No.2 No. 3
Gallons of fuel used per hour not underway during
first month of competition ..... .... 118.2 233.4 126.4
Gallons of fuel used per hour not underway dur-
ing seventh month of competition ........... 84.1 133.4 107.5
Reduction in fuel consumption effected ........ 28.84% 42.84% 14.95%
The above table shows a marked fuel reduction not underway
for three of the vessels in a group of five, covering a period of
seven months. It also shows the wide difference in fuel consump-


  p. 2105 (#1057)                      

1925)
2105
Engineering Economy on Auxiliary Vessels
tions for vessels of the same type and an approach to a uniform
fuel consumption. The underway performances are difficult to
compare without producing curves because of the various speeds
at which they steamed during different months. Vessel No. I
steamed at a speed of 11.42 knots in the first month, using 57.1
gallons per mile, while vessel No. 2 steamed at a similar speed
(11.5 knots) in the sixth month, using 64.2 gallons per mile.
Assuming that the second vessel had made some improvement
underway during these six months, as was actually the case when
not underway, the difference is still more marked.
The amount of make-up feed used per mile underway and per
hour when not underway should reflect increased economy, both
because of reduction in power loss and reduction in the amount
of steam required to be generated. The data on make-up feed are,
unfortunately, nearly always inaccurate because water used under-
way and not underway is not properly recorded by ships. A
simple solution is to require that while underway or at anchor,
feed tanks be left at a standard level at the end of each watch,
thus requiring the amount used by the watch to be made up and
the amount so taken recorded in the log. Before getting underway
or coming to anchor, a similar procedure should be adopted, thus
charging the water to the proper performance. These data are ex-
tremely valuable, if accurate. Another example is shown:
Second Group
(Three sister vessels in group)
Vessel No. 1 Vessel No.2 Vessel No. 3
Gallons of fuel used per hour not under-
way during first month of competition.. 61.7
80.3 87.6
Gallons of fuel used per hour not under-
way during the seventh month of compe-
tition ................................
..... 52.
1 52. I 49.
9
62.5
Reduction in fuel consumption effected 15.55% 37.85% 28.65%
In the above example all of the vessels in the group showed a marked
improvement.


  p. 2106 (#1058)                      

2106
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Third Group
(Consists of a large number of sister vessels)
High Group
Low Group
Vessel Vessel Vessel Vessel Vessel Vessel Vessel Vessel
No. 1 No.2 No.3 No. 4 No. 5 No.6 No. 7 No. 8
Gallons of fuel used
per hour not under-
way during first
month of competi-
tion............. 22.1
23.1
26.
2
37.3
33.4
36.
52.1
54.2
Gallons of fuel used
per hour not under-
way during seventh
month of competi-
ion............. 18.8 20.0 *37.8 23.6 | 33.4 49.2 36.4 49.6
* This vessel was "standing by” for a period of over ten days, which accounts for
the apparent increase.
The above group shows the four best performers and the four
poorest performers in a large group of sister vessels. The first
and second vessels indicate a uniform standard of excellence
which all of these vessels should reach. The fourth vessel has
done so, but the low group illustrates the extent to which wasteful
fuel consumptions may take place. The seventh vessel shows some
improvement, while the sixth vessel shows a large increase. This
table is instructive in showing the widely different results which
are obtained. It may safely be stated that the causes of the excess
fuel consumption in the low group are generally poor engineering
performances and poor condition of the plant. The other vessels
of this group show gradually increasing figures lying between the
figures shown for vessel No. 4 and those shown for Vessel No. 5,
these figures indicating the relative efficiency of the engineering
performances of these vessels. The application of the standard of
performance of the first vessel to the work of the last vessel is a
lever, the corrective value of which should be used to the utmost
by those charged with the administration of these units.
It is believed that sufficient comparisons have been made to show
that heretofore fuel consumptions have been excessive and unregu-
lated, and that if the large improvements indicated by some ves-
sels have been made in the short space of six months, continued
improvement may be expected from these vessels and from vessels


  p. 2107 (#1059)                      

1925) Engineering Economy on Auxiliary Vessels 2107
which are far below the standard of these vessels and which have
not as yet taken corrective measures.
It is unfortunate that direct comparisons without the presenta-
tion of elaborate curves cannot be made between the underway
performance of similar vessels, owing to the different average
speeds made which do not permit of direct comparisons. It will
be of interest, however, to note the improvement in the underway
performance of one vessel attributed by the commanding officer
to the stimulus of the competition and official scrutiny of results
obtained. Only the months showing similar speeds are used.
Steaming Performance of U.S.S. "
Cruising Radius Gallons of
Average Gallons of Fuel per 100,000 gals. Make-up Feed
Speed per Mile
of oil
per Mile
62.
First month.... 12.42
1613
20.4
Fourth month.. 12.62
63.8
1567
22.0
Sixth month... 12.83
49.9
2004
12.2
Eighth month.. 12.91
55.2
1812
12.2
Notwithstanding the slight increase in speed, the average
cruising radius for the sixth and eighth months shows an increase
of exactly 20 per cent over the average cruising radius of the first
and fourth months. The make-up feed per mile also shows a
marked reduction. These results are based on a mileage of over
30,000 miles and are therefore substantial evidences of the im-
provement possible in our auxiliary vessels.
Another example is that of a ship showing a marked reduction
of fuel consumption for all performances. A period of nine
months is covered in this tabulation, commencing with the first
month in which the vessel engaged in the competition. The en-
gineer officer of this vessel was a chief machinist's mate, which
makes the results attained the more notable.
It will be noted that in the ninth month this vessel steamed at an
average speed 1.8 knots greater than the average speed during the
fourth month, using but 63 per cent of the fuel per mile. The
similarity of percentages of reduction of fuel consumption both at
anchor, standing by and underway would indicate that the im-
provement was a permanent one and chargeable to fire-room
operation.


  p. 2108 (#1060)                      

2108
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Underway
Not Underway
Gallons
Fuel Oil
Per Mile
Average
Speed
At Anchor Standing by
Gallons Gallons
Fuel Oil Fuel Oil
Per Hour Per Hour
Gallons
Fuel Oil
Per Hour
42.6
31.7
24.2
80.2
63.7
37.3
26.6
25.3
First Month ...
Second Nonth..
Third Month... | At navy yard
Fourth Month..
Fifth Month... 8.64 28.2
Sixth Month... 8.12 22.5
Seventh Month 8.58 12.2
Eighth Month / 10.89 *18.75
Ninth Month... 9.50 16.77
29.0
36.2
50.6
41.2
17.9
32.88
28.13
24.1
10.9
21.0
21.56
66.0
62.2
49.7
23.9
49.4
53.35
Reduction in fuel consumption from
1st to 9th month...
33.28%
32.00%
33.48%
* Towing.
The attention of those interested in the subject of steaming
logistics is invited to the careful and elaborate compilations in the
Report of Engineering Performances (U. S. Navy), 1923-24
(Confidential). The same publication for the year 1924-25, when
issued, will record for the first time the logistics of our auxiliary
vessels in analyzed form.
In conclusion, it is desired to cite one of the most pointed ex-
amples of immediate beneficial results in the case of a tender
which successfully completed a 15 knot full power trial. The case
of this vessel is commented upon in a letter to the Department
which is quoted in part:
1. Until the completion of the last navy yard overhaul, the ........
.... was unable to make the speed of 10 knots in company with
the fleet. Various aspects of the unsatisfactory material condition of
....and the efforts to remedy them, have from
time to time been reported to the Department in separate corre-
spondence.
2. The commander ........ .......... fleet, considers it a great
credit to the commanding officer and to the engineer officer of the
....., who ascertained the causes of the unsatisfactory
performance of the .......... ...and initiated the necessary
steps to remedy them.
3. .....
the :


  p. 2109 (#1061)                      

1925)
2109
Engineering Economy on Auxiliary Vessels
4. It is probable that had the ......... .......... been in the
engineering performances as at present, and had been required to make
a full power run once a year, the very unsatisfactory condition would
have developed sooner and would have attracted wide and immediate
attention. It is even conceivable that had the ..
been in the engineering performances, the condition which has recently
been corrected might never have arisen.
5. The commander ..... ............ fleet, considers that the
inclusion of auxiliary vessels in engineering performances has already
produced and will continue to produce excellent results.
The reaction of the commanders afloat to the application of
competition to vessels of this type has been enthusiastic. To these
officers the benefits are, of course, obvious. The reaction of the
ships themselves has been excellent. The distribution of prize
money, letters of commendation, and awards of the “Navy E,”
will serve to increase the active interest of the personnel of the
service in the engineering performances of auxiliary vessels. A
large saving in fuel consumption should result, as the present fuel
consumption of auxiliary vessels amounts to thirty per cent of the
total fuel used by the forces afloat.


  p. 2110 (#1062)                      

STANDING ONE
LIEUTENANTS GEORGE K. WEBER AND C. W. STYER, U. S. Navy
THE objective of competition in engineering is to obtain
from the machinery installation the maximum efficiency,
having due regard for the kind of service performed, and
consequent restrictions and regulations imposed by the nature of
that service. The most unmistakable method of securing the best
results is thoroughly and intelligently to follow the procedure,
insofar as applicable, laid down in the Bureau of Engineering
Manual. To quote from the Rules for Engineering Performances,
1924-25:
Creditable attainments and gratifying performances are certain to
result from the policy of engineer officers exacting strict compliance
with the department's instructions regarding the methods of operation,
routine inspections, and tests.
Diligent study and application of the latest standard practices,
careful analysis of performances of all units of the engineering plant,
and patient, faithful training and instruction of the personnel will
contribute to progress, to economy, to efficient operation, to improved
material conditions, and to higher scores, all of which are factors that
help to maintain the fleet in the highest state of battle readiness.
Following these instructions has enhanced the condition of
machinery of the Oklahoma and improved her standing in com-
parison with other vessels of the fleet and with her own past per-
formances. At the end of the engineering year 1923-24 the Okla-
homa had a merit of 82.7 and stood twelfth in her class. To date
she has a merit of 110.5 and is standing one. This vast improve-
ment has resulted in spite of the fact that the fuel allowance, while
in port, has been reduced 10 per cent for half of the engineering
year 1924-25.
It is thought that a survey of the procedure followed in ob-
taining this unusual standing for the ship would be valuable to
engineer officers. While most of the methods are commonly used
in the fleet, yet a few of them may be of special interest to some
officers. The following is an indication of the methods adopted
aboard this ship:


  p. 2111 (#1063)                      

1925)
Standing One
2III
1. To assure the satisfactory mechanical condition of all ma-
chinery before attempting any methods of analysis, thus
eliminating false conclusions which might otherwise obtain.
2. A definite plan of operation was next established, based on
actual tests made on each unit.
3. High morale was fostered among the entire personnel.
SATISFACTORY MECHANICAL CONDITION OF MACHINERY
The first consideration in bringing the plant to a satisfactory
mechanical condition was to pay particular attention to the tight-
ness of main engine pistons, pump pistons and plungers, main
engine valves, pump valves and throttle valves, as well as the
alignment of all moving parts. This effort at mechanical per-
fection brought a natural and consequent lowering of water rates.
The tightness of stuffing boxes and joints which accompanied this
general overhaul materially reduced the amount of make-up feed,
bringing about a saving in water.
This plan also included the cleanliness of such parts of the in-
stallation as boilers, condensers, feed water heaters, and fuel oil
heaters, thus insuring a standard condition of material upon which
to base conclusions on methods of operation.
A series of tests was made on the various units, running them
as slowly as possible to accomplish the work desired, the real test
of a unit being how slowly it can be run to do the work desired.
As an example, the main circulating pumps on this ship, which are
of the reciprocating engine drive type, were brought to such a
mechanical condition that it was found possible to run them at
less than 50 per cent of their previous lowest speed and still
maintain proper amount of circulation through the condensers.
A point often overlooked by engineer officers is that machinery
running slower, and fewer units in operation will necessitate less
overhaul with consequent less strain on the personnel. Every
effort should be made to make the men realize this fact so that all
of their efforts will naturally tend toward getting best results.
This attempt at material perfection has made it possible for
this vessel, which is the only reciprocating engined vessel in the
battle fleet, to conform to an overhaul schedule outlined for tur-
bine driven ships.
When the material was in good condition, there was less routine
overhaul necessary and the ship's force effected major overhauls


  p. 2111 (#1064)                      

2II2
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
which, under other conditions, had been left to the navy yard
force. It is not necessary to state that there was also a great
saving in money and time for operating. It also made it possible
to defer the navy yard overhaul period seven months. This re-
Gallons of oil per hour
in hondrods)
le
6 10 12 i 16 1 20 22 14 16 2696 70
hour
Aoi
Boiler
per
2 Soilers
-
H. S.
3 Boilers
4 Boilere
s Boilers
6 Boilers
Combustion, Ibs. per sq. ft. of
7 Bollers
8 Boilers
9 Boilers
-
10 Boilers
Boilers
3 Boilers
-
Rate of
BOILER SELECTION
for Bill Boilers
CURVE
U.S.S
OKLAHOMA Fier.
torul "puol consémption in incronese or "ponds to poor " "
sulted in permitting other vessels which were in more urgent need
of navy yard overhaul to have their work done.
OPERATION
In all methods of proper operation the primary consideration
is to utilize the greatest percentage of heat generated by the burn-


  p. 2111 (#1065)                      

1925)
2113
Standing One
ing of the oil to give, first, the greatest amount of work from the
expansion of the steam and, second, after expansion, using the re-
maining heat with as little waste as possible.
To follow the heat from the point of its generation to its final
disposition at the various units, boiler operation is the first subject
to be dealt with.
Boilers.—In order to decide intelligently on the number of boilers
to be used for a certain speed, a curve of boilers versus revolutions
desired was developed, based upon the following factors:
(a) Curve of rate of combustion versus consumption of various
numbers of boilers (Fig. 1).
(6) Boiler efficiency curve (Fig. 2).
(c) Specific gravity of fuel oil in use.
(d) Curve of r.p.m. versus gallons of fuel oil required, (as
determined from the Bureau of Engineering allowance for
this vessel) (Fig. 3).
The curves in Fig. I are merely the rate of combustion multi-
plied by the heating surface in use, for one, two, three, etc., boilers,
to give the total oil consumption in pounds per hour. Using the
specific gravity of the oil in use, the abscissæ may be converted
to oil consumption in gallons per hour. It will be seen from
Fig. 2 that the best efficiency is obtained for a rate of combustion
of .3 of a pound of oil per square foot of heating surface per hour.
Therefore, combining curves in Fig. I and Fig. 3, using this eco-
nomical rate of combustion, gives the curve in Fig. 4, revolutions
per minute (standard speed) versus boilers. The legend of this
curve is self-explanatory, hence, given the desired revolutions per
minute from the ship’s monthly foul bottom curve corresponding
to the knots standard speed required, the economical number of
boilers may be selected. This selection at once gives the economi-
cal number of boilers and at the same time allows a large reserve
power, since rates of combustion as high as .6 of a pound of oil
per square foot of heating surface per hour may be had without
seriously affecting the efficiency. (See Fig. 2.)
Having determined the number of boilers to use the problem
then becomes one of proper regulation of oil temperatures and
pressures and of the number of blowers to use and their speed.
The proper oil temperature must be determined from the charac-
teristics of the oil used. Oil pressure is dependent upon the vis-


  p. 2112 (#1066)                      

2112
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
which, under other conditions, had been left to the navy yard
force. It is not necessary to state that there was also a great
saving in money and time for operating. It also made it possible
to defer the navy yard overhaul period seven months. This re-
Galloper poterit per hour
je u 6 10 1 1 16 18 20 22 ly 20 26 90 11 »
hour
/ Boiler
per
2. Boilers
H. S.
9 Boilers
4 Boilers
s Boilers
Combustion, Ibs. per sq. ft. of
o Boilers
7 Bollers
8 Boilers
9 Boilers
10 Boilers
Il Boilers
12 Boilers
-
-
of
Rate
CURVE
BOILER SELECTION
for Brw Boilers
U.S.S
OKLAHOMA fiat.
tore "tuor consémprion in records of "provinces or mor
sulted in permitting other vessels which were in more urgent need
of navy yard overhaul to have their work done.
OPERATION
In all methods of proper operation the primary consideration
is to utilize the greatest percentage of heat generated by the burn-


  p. 2113 (#1067)                      

1925]
2113
Standing One
ing of the oil to give, first, the greatest amount of work from the
expansion of the steam and, second, after expansion, using the re-
maining heat with as little waste as possible.
To follow the heat from the point of its generation to its final
disposition at the various units, boiler operation is the first subject
to be dealt with.
Boilers.-In order to decide intelligently on the number of boilers
to be used for a certain speed, a curve of boilers versus revolutions
desired was developed, based upon the following factors:
(a) Curve of rate of combustion versus consumption of various
numbers of boilers (Fig. 1).
(6) Boiler efficiency curve (Fig. 2).
(c) Specific gravity of fuel oil in use.
(d) Curve of r.p.m. versus gallons of fuel oil required, (as
determined from the Bureau of Engineering allowance for
this vessel) (Fig. 3).
The curves in Fig. I are merely the rate of combustion multi-
plied by the heating surface in use, for one, two, three, etc., boilers,
to give the total oil consumption in pounds per hour. Using the
specific gravity of the oil in use, the abscissæ may be converted
to oil consumption in gallons per hour. It will be seen from
Fig. 2 that the best efficiency is obtained for a rate of combustion
of .3 of a pound of oil per square foot of heating surface per hour.
Therefore, combining curves in Fig. I and Fig. 3, using this eco-
nomical rate of combustion, gives the curve in Fig. 4, revolutions
per minute (standard speed) versus boilers. The legend of this
curve is self-explanatory, hence, given the desired revolutions per
minute from the ship's monthly foul bottom curve corresponding
to the knots standard speed required, the economical number of
boilers may be selected. This selection at once gives the economi-
cal number of boilers and at the same time allows a large reserve
power, since rates of combustion as high as .6 of a pound of oil
per square foot of heating surface per hour may be had without
seriously affecting the efficiency. (See Fig. 2.)
Having determined the number of boilers to use the problem
then becomes one of proper regulation of oil temperatures and
pressures and of the number of blowers to use and their speed.
The proper oil temperature must be determined from the charac-
teristics of the oil used. Oil pressure is dependent upon the vis-


  p. 2114 (#1068)                      

2114
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
cosity of the oil used, load demand, and the size of the burner
tips in use. It is advisable for the engineer officer to make his
own determination of the characteristics of the oil since the oil
delivered may sometimes be a mixture of two oils of slightly
different characteristics.
The regulation of the blowers is materially aided by the smoke
watch using signals to signify “good combustion," and "too clear,"
as well as the usual smoke signals. This, together with the intelli-
gent use of uptake pyrometers will tend to give proper regulation
:
Boiler Erriciency of
Rete of Combustion
B and w
Boiler
H. S. • 4000 sq. ft.
rig.z.
wie oi oil"por iso or ''M.si po
how pero
w
12
13
14
of blowers, although varying demands for steam may be made.
It is noted that in trying to avoid smoking, the great tendency is
to use too much air for economical combustion, whereas good
combustion may be obtained without actually incurring any lia-
bility of smoking on changes of demand for steam. This, of
course, pre-supposes a well-trained fireroom force.
The chlorine content of water in the boilers should be below,
approximately, fifty grains of chlorine per gallon. In the oper-
ation of a boiler which has been thoroughly cleaned and which has
been filled with water of .5 grains of chlorine per gallon, it will
be found that the chlorine content of the water in the boiler will
increase at the rate of about two grains per gallon per day. In
this connection it should be noted that the amount of make-up feed
necessary has a very decided effect on the rate of increase of the


  p. 2115 (#1069)                      

1925)
Standing One
2115
chlorine content of the boilers. For instance, a plant that requires
only 2,000 gallons of make-up feed per day will deliver one half
the amount of chlorine to the boilers as an installation requiring
4,000 gallons of make-up feed. At a rate of increase of two grains
of chlorine per day the period at which the boiler reaches its limit
of steaming hours and its limit of chlorine content as stated, will
be at about the same time. It was found good practice on this
vessel to dump entirely the 50 grain water when the boiler was
cleaned. If this water is dumped in a so-called "up and down"
bottom, it can be run through the evaporators by a few changes
in the piping system and in this manner a great saving in water
is accomplished, in that this water may be forced through the
evaporators rapidly and half grain water produced at a less ex-
penditure of fuel.
In coming to anchor and securing, with a battery of boilers in
use, all fires should be died out as soon as word is received to se-
cure main engines. Instead of immediately securing all the un-
necessary boilers, the whole battery of boilers should be kept on
the line until the pressure has reduced to that pressure used for
auxiliary steaming. Then the unnecessary boilers should be se-
cured and fires again lighted under auxiliary steaming boilers.
During the period in which the steam pressure is dropping, about
one half hour, the auxiliary units are being run without any ex-
penditure of oil and, hence, over a half hour's port fuel allowance
is saved. Covering a period of almost daily operation this item
becomes of consequence.
Main engines.—The main engines of the Oklahoma being of the
reciprocating type, many of the economies effected will probably
not be of great interest to the majority of present day engineer
officers. However, the more important factors will be taken up.
Probably the greatest economy is made in the proper use of the
valve cut offs as determined by indicator diagrams, the object in
view being to obtain the greatest expansion of the steam consistent
with having a fairly well balanced, smooth running engine. Boiler
and high pressure chest steam pressures should be as nearly equal
as is consistent with the maneuvering requirements, to avoid the
loss entailed by the throttling process from main steam line to high
pressure valve chest.
Changes in speed should be made as gradual as possible in order
not to upset the thermal equilibrium of the plant, a point often lost


  p. 2116 (#1070)                      

2116
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
sight of. The captain at conn and deck watch officers figure most
prominently in this very important factor of economy, without
which good steaming is next to impossible. In formation, changes
in speed that are ordered so rapidly that they cannot possibly have
the desired effect on the ship’s headway, merely result in unstable
thermal conditions throughout the plant with a consequent reduc-
tion in the steaming score. These officers should bear in mind the
personal error ever present in stadimeter readings and should not
be too quick to order changes of speed on very small changes in
these readings.
R.pn
VERSUS
CURVE OF A. P. M
GALLONS OF OIL ALLOWED
V. S. S. OKLAHOMA
en tandends" or "Collóns om te oor "allones en mour " " " "
The bad effect of sudden changes in speed are cumulative. For
example, an increase in speed draws a greater weight of steam
from the boiler, and throws a greater load on the condensing
plant. Each of these factors must be met as quickly as possible
(if the plant is steaming in thermal equilibrium) by more feed
water and a speeding up of circulators and air pumps. The
greater weight of feed water being forced through the feed heat-
ers causes a lowering in feed temperature with a consequent
greater expenditure of oil to meet the increased demand for steam.


  p. 2117 (#1071)                      

1925)
Standing One
2117
The increased speed of auxiliaries causes a further demand for
steam, more feed water, lower feed temperature, and again a
greater oil expenditure. In the firerooms the greater weight of
oil going through the oil heaters lowers the oil temperature, and
this requires a greater expenditure to produce the steam. Could
these changes be made gradually, and the thermal equilibrium
maintained, the expenditure of oil would be little greater than the
difference in oil burned for the two speeds under steady steaming
conditions. For instance, if under steady steaming conditions for
six knots 350 gallons per hour are burned and under same con-
ditions for ten knots 950 gallons per hour are burned, then, if a
change is made from six to ten knots on an even hour and the
thermal equilibrium maintained, the fuel burned will be little
over 350 plus 950 or 1,300 gallons for the two hours. Whereas,
if the change is made suddenly the fuel used for the two hours
may be as high as 1,400 or 1,500 gallons. Sudden changes in
speed are the engineer's worst enemy. Avoid them!
Main condensing plant.–For economical operation of the main
propelling unit, this plant should be operated to give the vacuum
for which the propelling unit is designed, nothing more nor nothing
less. At high speeds where economy may become of secondary
importance, the condensing plant should be operated at as high
a vacuum as possible.
The main circulators should be run at such a speed that the
overboard discharge is about 8 degrees below the temperature of
steam corresponding to the desired vacuum. The thermometers
indicating the overboard discharge temperatures were placed as
near the circulating pump engine throttle as possible so that this
temperature could be maintained at all times. If the circulators are
of the centrifugal type and are not in such mechanical condition
that they may be run slowly enough to give this temperature, the
overboard discharge valve should be closed down until such tem-
perature obtains. Circulators, if so arranged, should be run cross-
connected up to as high speeds as the desired vacuum may be
retained.
Air pumps should be run as slowly as possible to maintain the
vacuum desired, when the overboard temperature has been cor-
rectly established. Keep all parts of steam side condensing unit
free of air leaks as these result in unnecessary work being done


  p. 2118 (#1072)                      

2118
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
by the air pumps. Vacuum gauges should be kept accurately
calibrated.
Main feed system.—Water of over one grain of chlorine per
gallon should never be allowed to enter any part of the main or
auxiliary feed system except in emergencies, and all water, whether
for filling boilers or for use as “make-up feed,” should enter the
system through the filter tank so that any grease or foreign matter
will be deposited on the loofah sponges.
The heat from every source of expanded and condensed steam
should be utilized to heat the feed water in the feed tank by lead-
ing drains to this tank. Some of these sources of heat include
evaporator drains, feed heater drains, ship's drain line, and such
other discharges from the traps, laundries, pressing shops, steri-
lizers, galleys, etc., that are not led to the ship's drain line. Never
lose the heat of steam already condensed by passing it into the
condenser, but rather lead it to the feed tank.
The auxiliary exhaust valves to main and auxiliary condenser
have become merely an auxiliary means of relieving excess pres-
sure (over fifteen pounds per square inch) from the auxiliary
exhaust line. The primary utilization of the auxiliary exhaust
is in the main engines and evaporators. In case these first two
means are not sufficient to keep the auxiliary exhaust below fif-
teen pounds per square inch, the feed heater drains are allowed
to blow through to the feed tank.
Feed tank temperatures as high as 200° F. are carried when
steady steaming conditions prevail without evidencing any trouble
with feed pumps, since the feed tanks are so located that there is
a head of twelve feet of water on the feed pump suction valves.
This high feed tank temperature permits of high feed temperature
with the use of very little auxiliary exhaust steam passing through
the feed heater; therefore, more auxiliary exhaust steam is avail-
able for main engines or evaporators.
Feed pressure is very carefully kept at about seventy-five
pounds above boiler pressure.
Evaporators.—Through the installation of the excellent type of
Lilly low pressure evaporators, a very economical operation for
making fresh water is possible..
An attempt is made to make enough fresh water while the ship
is operating at higher speeds, at which time there is plenty of back
pressure and it is not always possible to use it in the main engines,


  p. 2119 (#1073)                      

1925)
2119
Standing One
so that the evaporators need not be operated at the slower speeds
or in port when back pressure is low and is needed to keep the
feed temperature high. In case of necessity, in port or at slow
speeds at sea, when back pressure is low, only one set of evapo-
rators was operated since it was discovered that one set produced
almost as much water as two sets under these conditions. A sav-
ing in fuel resulted due to maintaining a higher feed temperature
and due to the fact that one set of evaporator auxiliaries was se-
cured. This procedure allows for regular periods of overhaul and
keeps the evaporators in excellent condition for the production of
good water.
Dynamos.—One of the greatest savings was accomplished
through the attempt to maintain a high load factor on the gener-
ators in use. Through cooperation with the deck force it was
possible to run only one generator for the greater part of the day
in port. Most ship's work involving the use of cranes, winches,
etc., was confined to a limited number of hours, without incon-
venience, during which time an extra machine was run and the
load factor consequently maintained high. At sea, one generator
was used during the greater part of the night. A special effort
was made at all times to keep such electrical units as blowers, and
so forth, not actually needed, cut out.
Intermittently used units.—The various officers concerned, offi-
cers of the deck, gunnery officer, and so forth, were impressed
with the necessity of immediately reporting to the engineer off-
cer of the watch when such units as heating system, deck pumps,
and air compressors were no longer needed.
Fresh water.—Every engineer officer must realize the constant
attention necessary to prevent the waste of fresh water and the
incessant striving to correct the very flagrant cases of wastage
which continually come to his notice. Where once fresh water
was considered a privilege, fresh water showers with no control
have come to be considered a rightful demand. The military view-
point of this question is often lost sight of: that is, that water
means oil, and oil used governs the cruising radius of the vessel
and costs money.
It is of the first importance that a man should be trained prop-
erly to use one of the greatest necessities of life on ship-board.
While no attempt is made to restrict water for any legitimate use,
it certainly seems fitting to keep a man from wasting water, just


  p. 2120 (#1074)                      

2120
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
as one prevents him from throwing good rope or canvas over-
board.
For a long time a system of locked fresh water spigots had been
in use on this ship. Due to various additional spigots being in-
stalled in different parts of the ship, and over which there was no
direct supervision or control, this method was not considered
effective. Very early in the engineering year a "free spigot"
BOILER
SELECTION
CURVE
CURVE BASED ON FOLLOWING
CONDITIONS
(u Fuel of spa.94
21 Boilers here typical officiency art
ter & W bailars of 4000 sq ft. N.
o Oil burned per hour is that
alleerd by Engineering Competition rules for 100g
R. P. M.
C.W. styr USM
Approved
c. H. Dans
Note:
LT. Cord USN
Rather than use Sorgballers se
8 om
account or tool used to operate aeriliaries in
In added 'fireroom necossary for Sor a bailors
1 2 1
Anita , o grosis
policy was put into effect, with the supposition that this added
privilege and the instruction of the men by division officers would
tend to eliminate an apparent waste of fresh water.
This plan has evidently succeeded in its purpose as shown by
the gradual reduction from month to month in water expenditure
per capita. However, it is necessary continually to bring this im-
portant item to the attention of all hands, and to serve this purpose
a daily curve of water expended per capita was posted on the
bulletin board.


  p. 2121 (#1075)                      

1925]
2121
Standing One
One of the greatest savings of water can be accomplished by
placing the third rinse of the laundry in tanks for use of the entire
ship's company for washing paintwork, and so forth.
The saving of water in "make-up feed” has been touched upon
under "Satisfactory Mechanical Condition of Machinery.” A
further saving has been made by leading drains from pumps and
steam seals to a small tank, which can be periodically emptied into
the feed tank. The extraordinary low "make-up feed” of the
Oklahoma has been made possible by the elimination of leaks in
flanges, joints, stuffing boxes, and so forth, throughout the plant.
"Make-up feed” is one item on which one cannot depend upon a
navy yard overhaul to help out the ship's standing. Constant
striving to prevent even the smallest leaks is necessary.
Inspections. Any method of operation without an efficient sys-
tem of follow-up must eventually deteriorate. To prevent this, an
arrangement in port was made whereby the senior engineer officer
of the watch, junior officer of the watch, and the three chief petty
officers of the watch made thorough inspections each watch and at
different times during the watch. A record was made of de-
ficiencies found and steps were taken to correct the same immedi-
ately. These reports of deficiencies formed a basis of discussion
at various conferences and their cause was then entirely elimi-
nated.
Analysis.-A daily analysis sheet used by the Pennsylvania in
port was used on this ship after a few additions and changes had
been made, such as a kilowatt hour curve plotted along with the
fuel consumption curve. It was possible to detect faulty oper-
ation from these combined curves together with the itemized ma-
chinery in operation.
At sea, a careful check was made to see that all log entries were
correct and actually represented conditions. It was then possible
to repeat conditions found to be good practice.
MORALE
Last, but probably the most important of all, is morale, for
without esprit de corps neither mechanical perfection nor efficient
operation can be obtained. A proper spirit was fostered by:
1. Instruction and training.
2. Privileges.


  p. 2122 (#1076)                      

2122
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
3. Intership competition.
4. Internal competition.
Instruction and training.-Men were instructed at their stations
while under operating conditions. The various phases of the re-
lation of their job to the whole plant was continually pointed out.
The interest of the men was constantly stimulated by giving them
engineering information as rapidly as they assimilated it. This
method of instruction required more time and patience but is con-
sidered more effective than holding routine “school.” In this way
"school” was not delegated to a junior officer who at times might
not be intensely interested in, or thoroughly familiar with, his
subject. It was rather delegated to all officers, whose singleness
of procedure and point of endeavor was assured by having numer-
ous short conferences of engineer officers at which all plans of
operation and procedure were discussed and decided upon. In-
struction of men becomes an easier task if they are made to be-
lieve that the officers have an honest interest in imparting knowl-
edge to them and are not merely conducting "school" to fill in
time.
To assist those who were especially desirous of obtaining more
information, extracts of the Bureau of Engineering Manual in
the form of pamphlets were issued weekly to the men whether
they wanted them or not, and thus circulated so that each man had
an opportunity to study them all.
When a problem presented itself that involved the entire engi-
neers' force as well as any set of individuals, the complete situ-
ation was given full publicity so that the men could realize the
object in view and aid in the solution of it. This did away with
the issuing of seemingly routine orders and instructions and
brought many good suggestions from the men.
Men have actually stated that under this system they have
learned more engineering in the eight months it has been in effect
than in as many as six years previous engineering service.
Privileges.—On account of the numerous instances of repairs
being made outside of regular working hours, because of the
great amount of overhaul necessary to attain satisfactory mechani-
cal condition, and on account of the lack of overhaul periods, par-
ticular consideration was given the men in the matter of special
liberty.


  p. 2123 (#1077)                      

. 1925)
2123
Standing One
The men turned to with a will as long as there was work to be
done, no matter what the time, because they always knew that
they would not be forgotten during slack times. Furthermore,
men were given leave as much as possible, looking ahead to the
usual navy yard leave period, when, due to the force of circum-
stances, the leave of the engineer force is very often curtailed in
order to finish up overhaul work.
Even though these special considerations were made, the
strictest discipline was maintained at all times to such an extent
that the engineer divisions were set up as an example for the rest
of the ship's company to follow. A spirit of pride and of well
being and well doing pervaded these divisions.
Intership competition.-It was noted at the beginning of the
engineering year that in spite of the individual ability of a great
many men, there was no concerted effort toward making the ship
stand out over others. By means of publishing the competitive
engineering scores of the battleships and by thoroughly instructing
the men as to the rules and the real reason for engineering com-
petition, a desire to win was created. The force becomes more of
a unit with a singleness of purpose.
No attempt was made to restrict any conveniences in any man-
ner whatsoever, thus insuring the eventual cooperation of the en-
tire ship's force. As stated previously a "free spigot" water policy
was inaugurated and fresh water showers were installed. The
question of necessity of heat was decided by the executive officer
and in this manner there could be no dissatisfaction with the en-
gineer department. It was continually dwelt upon that this com-
petition must be entirely on an engineering basis. .
Internal competition.—When it was thought possible that the
interest in intership competition might be waning by reason of the
high standing of the vessel, an internal competition between
watches was started and produced amazing results. Whereas, a
score of 105 for a watch had been considered satisfactory, a
score as high as 215 for four hours was made. This latter, of
course, was made possible by ideal steaming conditions.
Scores were computed hourly, while underway, and were for-
warded to the various units of the engineer department and also
to the officer of the deck, whose cooperation was thereby invited.
At the end of a watch, the score for the watch was computed and
posted on a large blackboard. The scores for the individual offi-


  p. 2124 (#1078)                      

2124
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings (Nov.
cers and men were totalled from day to day for each month. This
stimulated interest upon the calculation of scores for the new
month, and insured a continual keen competitive spirit which at
times became so manifest that it became necessary to establish
rules for such routine procedure as pumping of bilges, blowing
strainers, and so forth.
CONCLUSION
The advances made in the past few years in economy on the
Oklahoma and other capital ships have been so great that it would
seem that a high limit must soon be reached. However, it is be-
lieved that if the installation of metering and measuring devices,
such as steam flow meters, stroke and revolution counters, weigh-
ing apparatus, and so forth, was more encouraged and brought
more to the attention of operating personnel that even greater
advances in economy and consequent reduction in the navy fuel
bill, or, what is more to be desired, a greater radius of activity for
the same fuel bill, can and would be effected.
Paying concerns such as power plants, manufacturing plants,
and so forth, with fuel bills much less than the Navy do not con-
sider operation of any part of the plant without insuring economi-
cal operation of the unit as soon as possible. Large commercial
plants have adopted and have in successful operation a reliable
means of metering the steam flow in order that an immediate de-
termination may be made of the efficiency of any unit which may
be cut in and immediately correct any deficiencies before any
great loss of fuel results. In the Navy the efficiency of a certain
method or unit can be determined only after comparisons of
periods of like conditions of operation which, at the best, stretch
over a long period of time, due to the varied requirements of the
service and usually result in a wastage of fuel while the compari-
sons are being made, or may result in an inaccurate conclusion of
the change in procedure.


  p. 2125 (#1079)                      

POST-TREATY NAVAL DESIGN
By HECTOR C. BYWATER AND MAURICE PRENDERGAST
NDER the Washington Naval Treaty, France is allowed a
battle fleet with an aggregate displacement of 175,000 tons,
or exactly one third of the total allotted to the British Em-
pire and the United States, respectively. Italy, also, is granted a
battle fleet of 175,000 tons. In these two facts we find a clue to
the intense dislike with which the treaty is regarded by French-
men at large. The tonnage allotment they consider ridiculous in
view of the heavy responsibilities devolving upon their navy,
which is charged not only with the defense of a long coast line
fronting on two seas and of an extensive colonial empire, but
with the security of a line of communications that would be abso-
lutely vital in wartime. Still more bitterly do they resent the for-
mal recognition of Italy as a sea power of the same rank as
France. This assumption of equality in maritime interests and
prestige between the two nations is wholly at variance with the
plain facts of the case, to say nothing of history or tradition.
France would never have accepted it but for the conviction of her
naval experts that the battleship has ceased to be the key factor
in naval strength.
Not for a moment, however, would she agree to extend the ex-
isting battleship ratio to those lighter craft which, in the judgment
of all but a small minority of her active sea officers, are the only in-
struments capable of achieving decisive results in the naval combats
of tomorrow. As her attitude on this point is common knowledge,
it has probably had a great deal to do with the postponement of
the second limitation conference which was to have been sum-
moned for the purpose of regulating non-capital naval armaments.
Six months after the signing of the treaty France had to de-
plore the loss of one of the only seven dreadnaughts she possessed,
the battleship France being wrecked in Quiberon Bay in August,
1922. Now the treaty provides that “in case of loss or accidental
destruction of capital ships or aircraft carriers they may immedi-


  p. 2126 (#1080)                      

2126
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ately be replaced by new construction, subject to the tonnage
limits prescribed. ...." France, therefore, was and still is at
liberty to build a 35,000-ton battleship should she so desire, and in
January, 1927, she will be free to lay down a second ship of the
same type. Thus, in a little more than a year from now she will
have a margin of 70,000 tons for new armoured construction. A
certain significance attaches to this in view of a footnote to the
French replacement table in the treaty, stating that “France ex-
pressly reserves the right of employing the capital ship tonnage
allotment as she may consider advisable, subject solely to the
limitations that the displacement of individual ships should not
surpass 35,000 tons, and that the total capital ship tonnage should
keep within the limits imposed by the present treaty."
The French delegates who appended this footnote did so of set
purpose. While they did not believe in the utility of huge battle-
ships such as the British Nelson and Rodney, they foresaw the
possible value of armoured ships which, although much inferior in
tonnage and fighting power to these mastodons, would yet be able
to make short work of the largest “auxiliary" craft authorized by
the treaty: that is, the 10,000-ton cruiser.
This idea has since taken definite shape. French naval con-
structors have completed plans for a 17,500-ton croiseur de combat
which, if it is built, cannot fail to modify very drastically the
present standards of strength in auxiliary ships. Full particulars
of the design have not been released, but the French service jour-
nals have published its salient features. Briefly, the type repre-
sents a small battle cruiser, with a speed of 34 knots, its vitals
protected by armour sufficiently strong to keep out all projectiles
save those of major calibre, and mounting a battery of eight
12-inch guns.
The main armament is disposed in two quadruple turrets eche-
lonned amidships, with a (nominal) end-on discharge of four to
six guns and a full broadside of eight over a somewhat restricted
field of fire before and abaft the beam. The four-gun turrets,
which are 29/2 feet wide, are supported on an armoured redoubt,
especially strengthened to resist the stresses set up by rapid
salvos fired at an elevation of 30 or 35 degrees. The guns them-
selves are of a new high-velocity model, unofficially reported to be
fifty-five calibres in length, loading shells of 970 pounds weight.
Their range at extreme elevation should not be less than 33,000


  p. 2127 (#1081)                      

1925]
2127
Post Treaty Naval Design
yards. The machinery would consist of geared turbines and oil-
fired boilers—the uptakes leading into a single smokestack for
high speeds, and a Diesel plant for cruising speed. Thanks to the
grouping of the big guns amidships, ample space would be left
forward and aft for flight decks and aviation equipment. The
secondary battery would be composed of rapid-fire guns on
mountings equally adapted to high-angle or flat-trajectory fire.
No mention is made of a torpedo armament, or mine-planting
gear, but eight aeroplanes are to be carried.
Some of the ablest French critics are loud in their praise of
the new type. One such vessel would be of incomparably greater
value, both strategically and tactically, than two cruisers of the
10,000-ton class, they maintain. Unless these could show a clean
pair of heels they would infallibly be destroyed by salvos of
12-inch shells, out-ranging their 8-inch batteries by many thousand
yards, and excepting in perfectly smooth water the larger ship
could steam faster that smaller ones of the same legend speed.
Even at closer range the 17,500-ton cruiser, with its vital parts cov-
ered with thick armour, would have little to fear from 8-inch pro-
jectiles, while its own heavier artillery would soon destroy the
lightly-armoured antagonists. Under normal conditions one ship
of this type ought to be more than a match for two cruisers of the
10,000-ton class. If this premise is granted, the strategic value
of the design becomes self-evident.
Let us suppose that one of the new croiseurs de combat—which
we may name the Indomptable—is ready for service on the out-
break of a war with Great Britain. The ship is at Brest, and her
commander is ordered to make a cruise in the South Atlantic,
where British cruisers, including several of the 10,000-ton County
class and many of smaller tonnage, are patrolling the trade routés.
Whether the departure of the Indomptable becomes known to the
British authorities does not seriously matter. Once she has reached
the open sea her mission will already be half fulfilled. Arriving
on the scene of operations she chases and sinks one or more of
the British cruisers which are simply helpless prey. Her appear-
ance instantly dislocates the system of commerce defense in that
area. A warning is flashed to all British merchantmen to give
the danger zone a wide berth. Ships already at sea must look
after themselves; ships in port are ordered to remain there until
the situation is rectified. But, scarcely have these orders been


  p. 2128 (#1082)                      

2128
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings (Nov.
issued when the Indomptable appears in West Indian waters,
where she sends another British cruiser to the bottom and proceeds
to raid shipping with dire effect.
Meanwhile, the British Admiralty has been devising counter-
measures. In view of her powerful armament, the only vessels
capable of dealing with the raider are capital ships ; but battleships
are two slow, and even the four battle cruisers are inferior to the
Indomptable by 2 or 3 knots. Still, something must be left to
chance; so the Hood, Renown, and Repulse are ordered to sweep
the Atlantic routes, while the slower Tiger is held in reserve lest
the ubiquitous enemy appear in some new and unexpected quarter.
Coincidentally, steps are taken to organise merchant convoys under
the guard of old battleships of the Iron Duke class and sub-
marines. But all of these arrangements take time; heavy losses
are being incurred by British trade, several cruisers have been
sunk, and the effect of this interruption to the steady flow of im-
ports is making itself felt in the British Isles.
One day the Renown, cruising to the southeast of Bermuda,
catches a glimpse of the quarry. Visibility is high, and the
British ship works up to full speed in an effort to get within
range. But, the Indomptable is not to be caught so easily. Gradu-
ally she draws away, and, as a parting insult, straddles her pur-
suer with 12-inch salvos at a range of seventeen miles, to which
the Renown is unable to reply.
When next heard of, the French ship is back at Brest. She has
been at sea eight weeks, during which time she has sunk four
cruisers and a score of merchantmen, spreading alarm over the
greater part of the Atlantic. She has twice taken in oil from
captured tankers, and could have remained at large for a longer
period but that her bottom is getting foul and requires docking.
Battle cruisers, submarines, and aircraft have vainly sought to
bring her to book. Soon she will begin a second war cruise, the
results of which are awaited with painful anxiety in British naval
circles. A sister ship has just been completed at Toulon, and
while the Indomptable repeats her operations in the Atlantic, this
second vessel may appear off the Cape or in the Indian Ocean,
where there is not a single British ship strong enough to face her.
The situation thus pictured might well arise if France built
even two or three 17,500-ton ships of the type indicated. To all
existing cruisers they would stand in the same relationship as the


  p. 2129 (#1083)                      

1925)
Post Treaty Naval Design
2129
Dreadnought stood to the pre-dreadnought. Their advent would
materially reduce the relative value of the 10,000-ton “treaty"
cruiser, the métier of which has never been clearly defined. As
we have seen, France has good legal warrant for laying down two
Indomptables at once, and a second pair in 1927. Generally
speaking, it is bad policy to build armoured ships inferior in fight-
ing power to contemporary capital ships, but in this instance the
circumstances are quite exceptional, and the Indomptable design
offers a tempting solution for the new problems of strategy and
tactics which have developed out of the Washington Treaty.
At the moment of writing the French Ministry of Marine has
not come to a decision in the matter. The 17,500-ton croiseur de
combat is, as yet, only a paper project, which may or may not ma-
terialize. But, the chances are that it will, in which case other powers
may find it expedient to revise their own shipbuilding plans lest
they be one day confronted with the situation depicted above.
Turning to the technical aspect of the matter, it is unnecessary
to remind students of naval development that there is nothing
really new in the Indomptable design. To misquote a Spanish
proverb: "It is only an old dog with a new collar.” Almost fifty
years ago Benedetto Brin planned the Italia and Lepanto, of which
the new Indomptable design is simply a modern replica.
The Lepanto-Indomptable idea is one that has cropped up more
than once in naval architecture, withered, and blossomed again.
Old age killed off the Lepanto family, and the notions inspiring
their design appeared to be dead. But they were not; they were
only dormant, and achieved a strange resurrection in "Fisher's
Freaks"—the three Glorious type cruisers. The principle of the
three designs—Lepanto, Glorious, Indomptable-aims at a vessel
of large size, heavily armed, lightly armoured, very fast, which
can hunt down and devour the lesser cruiser species, and also act
as a corsair de luxe.
As a destroyer of the "ten-thousand-tonner" treaty type cruiser,
could an Indomptable justify itself? To this query we may reply
in the Socratic manner by propounding another. Why did the
French choose 17,500 tons as displacement and eight 12-inch guns
as the main battery? The answer is obvious and may be put into
six words: the Battle of the Falkland Islands. When one reduces
the two Scharnhorsts to "standard displacement”-deducting their
fuel and reserve feed water weights—those two armoured cruis-
ers of von Spee's come down to much the same category as the


  p. 2130 (#1084)                      

2130
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
treaty cruiser type: about 10,000 tons, armed with eight guns of
close on 8-inch calibre. There is, of course, to knots disparity in
speed between Sturdee's victims and the modern treaty cruiser,
but that disparity represents ten years' intensive progress in war-
ship machinery. Again, at the Dogger Bank battle, the other
German 8-inch gunned cruiser, Blücher, simply could not live
when put under fire by British battle cruisers. Given high visi-
bility and a clear run, there is every probability that a fight be-
tween Indomptables and treaty cruisers would end much as did
the Sturdee-von Spee duel—with the decks of the 10,000-tonners
blown out by plunging salvos. In short, the French are out to
"Falkland” the treaty cruisers.
The revival of the echelonned turret disposition is, of course,
the interesting thing in the French plan. It is a bad pattern of
gun distribution, and its appearance in capital ship design is usu-
ally a tacit admission that, for the moment, attack has mastered
defense. The main gun positions have to be retracted from the
ends to the centre of the hull so that they can be enclosed in a
small and very heavily armoured redoubt. In modern design, it
is the necessity of providing multiple heavy anti-bomb (and anti-
plunging salvo) decks, more than stiffening of vertical side pro-
tection, which has led to the contraction of main gun positions
within narrow spaces.
In practice, the arcs of fire for echelonned turrets are far less
than the arcs of training appearing in the paper design. Ahead
or astern, guns cannot be fired until the turret trained 15 to 20
degrees outboard. Any attempts to fire at angles closer inboard
simply results in damage to hull side. As for athwartship fire,
it is a snare and a delusion. The British battleships Hercules and
Colossus are said to have got off a few full (10-gun) salvoes in
the Battle of Jutland, the port turret firing directly across the
deck. The result was that the deck—although especially stiffened
against blast effect-sagged very badly. At high elevation, the
French Indomptable might safely indulge in cross-deck fire, but
not at angles of elevation less than about 15 degrees.
Below decks, there is the disadvantage that the magazines of
echelonned turrets are brought into the outboard spaces, close to
the skin of the hull, where the full impact of sub-surface ex-
plosion will be felt. No doubt the French ship will be bulged, or
*For example: the old British Inflexible, with her 24-inch belt.


  p. 2131 (#1085)                      

1925)
21ŽI
1. Post Treaty Naval Design
have the Ferrati type of multiple hull protection. None the less,
in internal sub-surface hull protection safety varies as the square
of the distance from the outer skin. A magazine set thirty feet
inboard is 800 times safer than one set ten feet inboard.
With echelonned turrets, the mix-up with the machinery spaces
is a serious complication. The usual method is to fill in the
counter-echelon spaces by placing engine or boiler rooms abeam
of the magazines. To place heat generators cheek by jowl with
powder stores is not conducive to stability of propellants—even
when magazine refrigeration is used.
It remains to consider why the French have taken up the echelon
distribution of main guns for this projected battle cruiser—a lay-
out of the cardinal battery which has never before figured in a
French capital ship. What is more, it is a distribution of guns
which has always been discarded after a brief trial by the British
Navy. For example, during the eighties it was adopted for In-
flexible, Ajax, Neptune, and so forth, and then abandoned. It
was revived in 1905-10 in Invincible, Indefatigable, and Neptune,
and again dropped.
One answer, and the most probable one, is the point outlined
above, that turrets in echelon permit defensive hull armouring to be
reduced in area and intensified in thickness of plating. But there
is yet another answer: the French may have accepted the echelon,
with all of its inherent disadvantages, because they wish to clear
the ends of the hull for flight decks, lifts, and large hangars.
. An Irishman once defined a net as “a lot of holes tied together
with string.” Nonsense it is, of course, but taken as a definition, it
is a far more lucid, vivid, and compact explanation than Dr.
Johnson's famous attempt to define a net in his dictionary. When
one comes to the treaty definition of an aircraft carrier, one is
left wondering who composed it. Possibly it was that famous
contributor to the Eatanswill Gazette, who wrote the article on
"Chinese Metaphysics.” When Mr. Pickwick expressed incre-
dulity that an essay could be written for a newspaper on so ab-
struse a subject, Mr. Pott, the editor, impressively explained :
“My dear sir, you read up China in the encyclopædia, then meta-
physics, and then combine the two subjects." The draftsman of
that definition in the treaty possibly looked up "aircraft" in the
dictionary, then “carrier" and, like Mr. Pott's contributor, com-
bined the two definitions ; for it consists of two parts, which may


  p. 2132 (#1086)                      

2132 U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
(Nov.
be two separate definitions, or a single definition divided into two
co-related and complementary sub-definitions. The result, either
way, is not unlike the Irishman's definition of a net-nonsensical
sense, a witty bouleversement of terms. One cannot make out
whether the treaty definition of an aircraft carrier is sense, half-
sense, or nonsense.
And what is this priceless definition, that does not define any-
thing in distinct outline but rather blurs the picture?
It defines an aircraft carrier as a "naval vessel of war designed
for the specific and exclusive purpose of carrying aircraft. It
must be so constructed that aircraft can be launched therefrom
and landed thereon. ...." Here we have three separate func-
tions detailed: (a) the carrying of aircraft, (b) the launching of
aircraft from the carrying vessel's deck, and (c) the landing of
aircraft on the deck; but we are not told if any one, any two, or
all three functions, when carried out, convert the executant vessel
into an aircraft carrier. For example, a large vessel of a semi-
cargo type is designed for carrying fifty aircraft in knock-down
condition and, maybe, with plant for rapid assembly. She is “de-
signed for the sole and exclusive use of carrying aircraft," but
there is no provision for flying-off or landing. Is she an aircraft
carrier within the meaning of the act? But much more important
is the question of a vessel akin to H.M.S. Furious in 1917. At
that time, the British cruiser had a hangar, lift and flying-off deck
forward and a single 18-inch gun aft; there was no provision made
for landing aircraft on her deck. Here two of the attributes laid
down by the treaty are fulfilled—the carrying of aircraft, and the
launching from the deck; but the third condition_landing on the
deck—is not complied with. Was the Furious, or would a ship on
the lines of the Furious, be an aircraft carrier? The new French
battle cruiser design is very much on all fours with the 1917
Furious design. If the Furious of 1917 was not an aircraft car-
rier, then the French can build their new vessel and be within the
law. But, if the Furious of 1917 was an aircraft carrier, then the
French seem to be stretching the treaty in arming such a vessel
with guns larger than 8-inch calibre.
Of course one can turn to the "sole and exclusive purpose of
carrying aircraft” clause, but this is the weakest part of the whole
definition, for it is a definition that raises no standard. Who, or
what, is to determine "sole and exclusive use"? We are not told.


  p. 2133 (#1087)                      

1925]
2133
Post Treaty Naval Design
The French are stated to have designed the Indomptable type to
carry eight aeroplanes; they could just as well have given the ves-
sel eighteen. Even if they had put eighty aircraft into the design,
they could have done so legally; for, being a battle cruiser, armed
with 12-inch guns, the ship is not designed for the "sole and ex-
clusive purpose of carrying aircraft.” The way in which the
question of aircraft tonnage has been safe-guarded in the treaty
is truly wonderful. Firstly, you may build vessels carrying
twenty to thirty aircraft, launching such aircraft from and landing
them on their decks; but if such vessels are of 9,999 tons dis-
placement or less, then they are not "aircraft carriers.” From
10,000 up to 27,000 tons standard displacement, you can build
vessels which are treaty-defined porte-avions. Above 27,000 tons,
it appears that you can borrow from your capital ship replacement
tonnage, build vessels armed with one 16-inch (or an agglomera-
tion of lesser calibres down to 8-inch) and load them up with
aircraft. If anyone objects, you can say, “Oh, those are not air-
craft carriers—they are not designed for the sole and exclusive
purpose of carrying aircraft. They are capital ships carrying
aircraft in an auxiliary sense." No one can now validly object to
any type of war vessel carrying one, two, or more aeroplanes; the
treaty has nowhere defined the number of aircraft which may or
may not be carried. Dreadnoughts, battle-cruisers, cruisers, light
cruisers, destroyers, and even a submarine have carried aircraft,
and some of these types have launched their machines into flight
from their decks. As a village politician remarked recently, “This
is a bit too thick ; it's the thin edge of the wedge!" The right of
war vessels to carry aircraft and launch them from their decks has
been conceded by custom and is not denied by the treaty. No limit
is imposed on the number of aircraft to be carried. Therefore
the French may, if they wish, build the Indomptable, give her
eight large guns and as many aeroplanes as she can conveniently
carry, and no one can object to such a course being pursued. From
what the treaty definition says, it would appear that the presence
of a landing deck and net is about the only criterion by which one
can determine the treaty-defined carrier; for, as we have argued
above: (a) all warships may carry aircraft to any number they
please; (b) they can launch such aircraft from their decks; but
if they land such aircraft on their decks, then the three conditions
of the treaty definition are complied with and the ship becomes


  p. 2134 (#1088)                      

2134
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
an "aircraft carrier.” If seaplanes take the water alongside and
are hoisted inboard, the third "landing deck” function can be
evaded. Detachable or retracting undercarriages enable aero-
planes to fly off a deck and land in the water.
If the French ever build vessels of the described type, other
powers may retaliate in kind by building super-Indomptables. In
lieu of constructing two capital ships of 35,000 tons, they might
build three vessels of 23,333 tons apiece, armed with, say, six
13.5-inch guns and having a speed of 36 knots. Italy might do
this, inasmuch as she, like France, has reserved the right to use
her allotment of capital ship tonnage in any manner she pleases.
Whether the other powers might do so is a debatable point; they
appear to have tied themselves down to a set time-table of replace-
ments by 35,000-ton ships only.
Even so, the 35,000-ton capital ship could be made into a de-
stroyer of Indomptables. When the Washington Conference as-
sembled, Great Britain had designed and ordered the four modified
Hoods. When the original draft of the treaty was broadcast to
the world, British naval designers started to work out a series
of plans for reducing the modified Hoods by about 8,000 tons, so
that their displacement would come inside the new legal limit of
35,000 tons standard displacement. Among these tentative plans
was one in which the battle cruiser speed and massive post-Jutland
protection of the original design were retained unaltered, and the
8,000-tons cut was made out of the armament weight. It was
found that this reduced vessel could only carry a battery of 12-inch
guns, or, at the best, 13.5-inch. Such a type of vessel might be
called into existence as a contre-Indomptable species or second-
class capital ship. The "Thurston Design B," of Brassey's Annual
for 1923-24, shows another type of vessel, fast (30 knots), power-
fully armed (six 16-inch in two triple turrets), and very heavily
defended (thirteen-inch to seven-inch armour on waterline, five-
inch decks, fourteen-inch to ten-inch on main gun positions). Ad-
mitted that this design has not speed enough to deal with a 34-knot
Indomptable, but if some sacrifices were made in armament and
protection, the horsepower might be raised and speed enlarged to
35 knots. Within the maximum quota of displacement allowed by
the treaty, it should be possible to create a vessel (a) armed with
six 14-inch or nine 12-inch guns, (b) driven at 36 to 37 knots with
engines of 240,000 S.H.P., and (c) protected by eleven- to five-


  p. 2135 (#1089)                      

1925)
2135
Post Treaty Naval Design
inch waterline armour, five-inch decks, and twelve- to nine-inch
gun positions. The 14-inch (or 13.5-inch long calibre) armament
is preferable, for with 35 degrees elevation the 12-inch guns of
the Indomptable would be outranged by several thousand yards.
True, the armouring of this type of ship would leave something
to be desired, but it must be remembered that, saving only the
Hood, no post-Jutland type of capital ship armed with 15-inch or
16-inch guns has a speed of over 23 knots. With 10 to 12 knots
advantage in speed, the Indomptable and contre-Indomptable
types could keep out of range of the post-Jutland ships, so that
there is no need for the new battle cruisers to be heavily armoured.
Astonishment, amusement, and even derision are often expressed
at the instability of French naval policy. It should always be re-
membered, however, that France has a complex naval problem
with which to deal. To the west she faces the expanses of the
Atlantic; to the south her sea frontier is within the enclosed
waters of the Mediterranean; to the north she has her side of the
Channel to defend. Her policy, like her scheme of naval com-
mand, is cloven in twain. The “Blue Water” school wants battle-
ships and battle cruisers; the Jeune Ecole demands large numbers
of small and very speedy ships. The present French scheme of
naval policy is based on the necessity of maintaining communi-
cations between Southern France and the Northern African Colo-
nies. The great innovation is the tripartite division of national
defence into three sections in place of the old bisection into land
naval forces. The 1922 organisation provides for: (a) the sea-
going fleet, a striking force endowed with offensive properties;
(b) the frontiers maritime, a new “liaison” scheme, drawing its
"elements”? from sea, land, and air forces; and (c) the land forces
proper. The Indomptable type of battle cruiser appears to be a
compromise which would be acceptable to all schools of 'naval
opinion in France. By the “Blue Water” school she would be ap-
proved as a type of capital ship excellently suited for operations
in the Mediterranean. The Jeune Ecole—which places commerce
destruction among the first of its tenets—would accept the design
* NOTE: The “elements” are comprised of :second class submarines,
mine layers and sweepers, patrol craft-aircraft, super-range guns, and
guns on mobile land mounts handled by a specialist coast defence force-
marines-military detachments. Such naval craft as are required are pro-
vided for by special defense estimates, entirely distinct from the navy esti-
mates of the 1922 navy law.


  p. 2136 (#1090)                      

2136
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
enthusiastically, because it is that type of "sea-hawk” favored by
Captain Castex-a formidable corsair capable of carrying out
long-distance and long-period raids against shipping. Both sides
would acclaim the advent of a vessel which, at the same time,
would be capital ship in the Mediterranean and corsair in the
Atlantic.
Was the advent of the Dreadnaught type a stroke of genius or
a piece of mistaken megalomania ? It dominated the capital ship
types but it was also domineering; it was a case of Aut Cesar, aut
nullus—Dreadnaught or nothing. It crushed the second-class bat-
tleship and the coastal defense type of armoured ship out of ex-
istence. But submarines, mines, and aircraft have made enclosed
seas too dangerous for goliath ships of the line, small in total
numbers, huge in individual size.
Has the time not come when we can consider the creation of a
a second-class capital ship, of moderate size, high in speed, and
more numerous in numbers—a type suited for operations in the
Mediterranean, Baltic, North Sea, and so forth? The super-
dreadnought would still be rector of the oceans, and, in emergency,
might venture into the enclosed seas to support the new second-
class capital ships. On these grounds, the French concept of a
new capital ship type, such as the Indomptable, seems funda-
mentally sound.
Since 1870, France's chief pre-occupation has been the defence
of her land frontiers—l'armée est archiprêtre. If, under a se-
curity pact, France's land frontiers were guaranteed, her land
defences would no longer be her chief anxiety. She would prob-
ably turn to colonial development, and colonial development always
means, as Mahan has shown, naval expansion. But this argument
will not hold good—you cannot create colonies with a dwindling
population. It is only nations too plentifully provided with flesh
and blood that possess the urge for overseas expansion. Italy as
a colonizer is a greater potential force than France. It will be
Italy that will seek expansion in the future, and probably in
Northern Africa at the expense of France.
What would be the position of Italy if France built two In-
domptables? Could Italy claim the right to build two equivalent
vessels as replacements for the lost Leonardo da Vinci? We pause
here to ask why the authors of the Washington Treaty included
the Leonardo da Vinci as an effective capital ship? Everyone


  p. 2137 (#1091)                      

1925)
Post Treaty Naval Design
2137
knows she blew up during the war, sank in a capsized position,
was refloated and re-capsized, but was found beyond repair. As
a fighting ship, she was about as valuable as the wreck of the
Maine, in Havana harbour. The Leonardo da Vinci was de-
stroyed before the treaty—was included in the treaty—and
scrapped after the treaty was signed. Could replacement tonnage
be lawfully claimed on account of her loss? So long as France
does not replace the lost battleship France, Italy may not replace
the Leonardo da Vinci. But if France orders two 17,500-ton
battle cruisers as compensating tonnage for a capital ship lost,
Italy may retaliate in kind. Britain could not ignore the presence
in the Mediterranean of four very fast and powerful battle cruis-
ers of a new type. She might claim the right to commence in
1931-32 seven ships of 20,000 tons in place of the four 35,000-ton
capital ships licensed by the treaty. Ensuing political permuta-
tions, combinations, and conferences we will not attempt to en-
visage.
To sum up:
1. The French design is not new—it is a réchauffé of Brin's
Italia design.
2. The echelon turret arrangement is poor; it can only be justi-
fied because it solves protection problems. It may also be adopted
so that convenient flight decks can be fitted in. If the latter sur-
mise is true, the question arises :
3. Are the French going to build an aircraft carrier with battle
cruiser armament? The treaty is so confused and vague on air-
craft carrier definition that they may attempt to do so, and get
away with it.
4. An experiment in a second-class capital ship type is worth
while. Such a type could (a) operate in enclosed seas, (b) carry
out oceanic commerce raids, (c) kill off the 10,000-tonner tribe,
as Sturdee's Indomitables killed off the Scharnhorsts.
5. Italy might retaliate by building similar ships and Britain
would then be forced into building vessels of the same general
design. To speculate on contemporary American and Japanese
action in the contingency thus forecast would carry this discussion
to an inordinate length.


  p. 2138 (#1092)                      

VEST POCKET BALLISTICS
By LIEUTENANT W. L. WRIGHT, U. S. Navy
THE following equations to the trajectory of the projectile
were developed with the hope of obtaining something ex-
pressed in the simplest terms and of a wide range of appli-
cation. Auxiliary tables are not required. The equations will
give a close approximation of the performance of a long-point,
high velocity projectile whose weight is in the neighborhood of
lbs. and velocity above 2500 f.s. They are not to be used where
more exact information is available but should not develop errors
in excess of 5 per cent. It is thought that the equations may prove
of especial interest in connection with high angle fire. It will be
noted that at an angle of elevation of 45° the sine term drops out
of the equation for range, giving a very simple expression for the
maximum range.
The equations follow :
R=2.6 V 2% sin1.39d™ 20
R =2.6 V d%
Y=R tano
T=.5 Y%
Where:
R=horizontal range in yards.
Y=maximum ordinate in feet.
T=time of flight in seconds.
V=muzzle velocity in feet per second.
p=angle of elevation.
d=diameter of projectile in inches.


  p. 2139 (#1093)                      

THE NAVIGATOR'S NOTEBOOK
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER P. V. H. WEEMS, U. S. Navy
INSPECTIONS of the navigator's notebook, or work book, on
various ships reveal the fact that the notes, data, and forms
are frequently poorly arranged and that the investment of a
little time and thought in the arrangement of the work would give
big returns in accuracy, brevity, clearness, compactness, and com-
pleteness. The possible arrangement of the work in a notebook is
subject to endless variation; perhaps the best arrangement has not
been devised. Furthermore, experienced navigators, by years of
experience, have usually arrived at their own systems and wrinkles.
However, since any system is better than no system, these notes
are made with the hope of giving the young navigator a short cut
to a satisfactory arrangement of his work.
The principal point to consider in the arrangement of the note-
book is the form for the lines of positions. To save time, a most
important consideration aboard ships with high speed, duplication
must be avoided and paper work reduced to a minimum. Printed
forms save the time and trouble of writing them out, but the bind-
ing or pasting in of these forms is some trouble, and the work is
not arranged compactly or in sequence. .
The ideal form for a line of position would be one that could
be used for any heavenly body, arranged vertically so that when
written once it would suffice for a double page or for the entire
book. This cannot be done entirely, yet with a slight change in the
usual arrangement, a big step in the right direction can be made.
The work for finding the hour angle is done in one column. The
declination and latitude, referring to the haversine formula, might
conveniently be written in the same column with the time. Now,
instead of writing the log functions of t, dec. and latitude off to
the right as we learned in the study of logarithms, they might
with equal facility be written in the same vertical column below
the other work. This will now bring the computed altitude in the
same vertical column, and by putting the sextant altitude with its
corrections there, and the altitude difference and azimuth last, the


  p. 2140 (#1094)                      

2140
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings [Nov.
entire form may be put at the left margin of the page. With this
arrangement, each line of position may be worked in one vertical
column, giving ample room for eight lines of position for each
double page.
The correction for H, is applied “going uphill” in order to bring
the true altitude and computed altitude together for subtraction.
The point here is to prevent duplication, and it is considered suffi-
ciently important to justify the effort of adding up instead of
down. After a little practice it is no more trouble to put the H,
below the corr. and add up than to follow the usual form. Now to
make the form suitable for the sun as well as for the moon,
planets, and stars, a couple of lines are skipped when working sun
lines in order to make the longitude and hour angle come on the
same lines as for other bodies. By so arranging the forms that
the same operation is done on the same line for all bodies, the dif-
ferent values may be checked more easily. Since all the elements,
except time, change slowly when actually navigating at sea, errors,
except time, may be detected quickly by comparing with preced-
ing values on the same line.
The simple arrangement of putting all of the work for a sight
in one vertical column looks so different from the old forms that
it might at first glance seem awkward, but the work is reduced, all
duplication is avoided, and by having the work compactly arranged
on corresponding lines, the work may be checked and in some
cases partially copied from the previous lines of position.
With this arrangement, and by use of the haversine formula for
working all lines of position, only one form need be written at the
left margin of the page and all work throughout the book for lines
of position may be done with reference to the one form.
There is no particular form suggested for working lines of posi-
tion by the method given in H.O. 203, but such a form may be
worked out and arranged vertically, as in the case of the haversine
formula. The form suggested is so arranged that the corrections
to local hour angle and sextant altitude are made going up, instead
of down, the page in order to avoid duplication and to bring the
values to be subtracted in the correct position.
To illustrate the advantage of the vertical arrangement for the
solution of the lines of position, lines worked for the sun, the
moon, a planet, and a star will be worked by the haversine formula,
and the same lines worked by H.O. 203. In order to emphasize


  p. 2141 (#1095)                      

1925)
2141
The Navigator's Notebook
the advantage by the quick checking of a portion of the work,
these lines are worked for the same date and about as they would
be worked at sea. As a further comparison, the solution of two
simultaneous star sights is taken from page 45 of Dutton's Celo-
Navigation. It will be noted in the latter solution that the name
of each of the stars appears three times, while the latitude, longi-
tude, and altitude of each star is written twice. The declination
and right ascension are not repeated, but in some forms even
these are uselessly repeated. A good part of the work in the solu-
tion of these lines is the finding of the azimuths of the stars. One
of the best features of the solution by H.O. 203 is the fact that
the azimuth is picked out at the same time the local hour angle is
taken from the table with one opening of the tables.
The time diagram is necessary and desirable for the student,
since the G.C.T. and date are puzzling, and since the problems to
be solved may jump from ocean to ocean, while in actual practice,
the G.C.T. and date give little trouble and the diagram, therefore,
is just so much verbiage which should be omitted for the sake of
speed and compactness.
It is believed that more stress should be placed on the new
method given in H.O. 203. If it is just as accurate and consider-
ably shorter than the haversine formula, and if the disadvantage
of a slightly more difficult plotting operation is more than counter-
balanced by its advantages, there seems to be no logical reason
why it should not be adopted to replace the haversine method.
It is well to decide definitely what system is to be used in solv-
ing for lines of position. The St. Hilaire haversine method has
been the one most used in the past few years, though the various
methods of working lines without the use of logarithms are rap-
idly coming into use. Aquino, H.A. 201, H.O. 203, and the com-
pactly arranged Japanese Admiralty tables, are some of the best
known methods. With the standard St. Hilaire line worked by
the haversine formula giving a satisfactory method approved by
the Navy Department, without the use of Aquino's tables, or other
short methods not sponsored by the Department, there has been
the feeling that it would be less disastrous to run aground while
using the latest approved method of navigation! Since, however,
the Navy Department has laboriously worked up the splendid
tables given in H.O. 203, and since it has spent approximately
$50,000 getting them out, and now approves their use, thereby


  p. 2142 (#1096)                      

2142
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
giving a short simple method not involving logarithms, there now
seems to be no logical reason why the method should not be
adopted for general use.
If an officer has been working lines of position for several years
by any standard method, it would be unnecessary to commence on
an entirely new method, but the younger officers should be encour-
aged to choose the best method available in the beginning.
Once the method to be used is decided upon, it should be used
continuously rather than attempt the use of different methods for
different occasions. By repeatedly working with one method, one
naturally becomes more proficient in its use.
While the lines of position and chart work constitute the greater
portion of the navigator's labors at sea, the computations for the
times of transits of bodies, the meridian altitudes and numerous
other minor operations must be entered in the notebook. In addi-
tion to the St. Hilaire sight, the vertical haversine formula lends
itself to several other operations. Determining the G.C.T. for
any operation might be logically and chronologically done by the
use of the time portion of the vertical haversine formula. This
applies also for the hour angle, as well as for the sidereal times.
For instance, the L.S.T. for a Polaris sight, the altitude correc-
tions, and the corrections for L.S.T. might conveniently be done
by the use of the one universal vertical formula. This would give
a line of position arranged in logical sequence with the other work.
Another use of this form was inadvertently demonstrated by a
midshipman. He was working a watch time of local apparent
noon problem. Having memorized the time portion of the for-
mula, he apparently noted that it ended with what he was given
and that it started off with what was required; at any rate, he
wrote the form for finding local apparent time, then put 12-00-00
for the local apparent time and worked up hill till he arrived at
watch time, which was required.
As a matter of fact, this makes a logical arrangement of the
work in the notebook, and only one column is needed for working
out the W.T. of L.A.N., and the altitude correction, declination
correction, and the simple operation of combining the h and dec.
may conveniently be done in the same column, thereby making
another long step toward systematizing the notebook work.
Except for the conversion of the G.S.T. to G.C.T., finding the
watch time of transit of any heavenly body may conveniently be


  p. 2143 (#1097)                      

1925]
2143
The Navigator's Notebook
done as in the case of the sun. In converting the G.S.T., to
G.C.T., the R.A. must first be applied to G.S.T. to get the sidereal
interval which is the G.C.T. expressed in sidereal units and is
converted by the use of table II of the nautical almanac.
In other features the notebook might be made more convenient
for use and considerable time saved as a result. Instead of
scrambling through thick tables for the altitude correction for the
sun and stars, why not paste inside of the front cover of the note-
book the corrections ordinarily used? The height of eye is usually
the same day after day, therefore one narrow column cut from an
old table would give the needed correction at a glance. At the
same place should be pasted an arc-time conversion table. Finally,
and most important, all data pertaining to the ship which can
conveniently be condensed and placed on one double page should
be collected and arranged so as to avoid trouble and embarrass-
ment. This data would include the speed-revolution table, prin-
cipal measurements of the ship, height of trucks, distance from
bow to bridge, knots per ton of fuel at various speeds, and tactical
data. To be sure all of this data may be obtained from other
pamphlets or drawings, but the point is that the notebook is always
at hand for quick reference.
LINES OF POSITIONS
by
Sun, Moon, PLANET, AND STAR
On October 3, 1925, at about 5:30 A.M., the U.S.S. Bobolink,
with tow, is in D.R. Lat. 37-50 N., Long. 75-05 W. The navigator
observes the lower limb of the moon for a line of position, as
follows: W 5-50-00; C-W 5-02-00; Chro. slow im-07.38; Ht. of
eye 45 ft.; I.C. 0-00; H, lower limb of moon 14-48-00. The speed
is 6 knots and the course is 180° true. When the watch read
10-50-00 A.M., H, for sun's lower limb was 46-30, and when watch
read 6-30 P.M., the H, of Venus was 9-16-00, and the same instant
the H, of Antares was 14-48-20, the C-W, C.C., Ht. of eye, and
I.C. being the same as for the moon.
Required the lines of positions for the four bodies.
Solved by St. Hilaire haversine formula and by the method
given in H.O. 203 using the special forms for each.
Note: The moon sight is taken from Dutton's Celo-Navigation.


  p. 2144 (#1098)                      

2144
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
LINES OF POSITIONS BY ST. HILAIRE HAVERSINE METHOD
NEW YORK TO GUANTANAMO
October 3, 1925
BODY, 0530 MOON 1030 Sun 1830 VENUS 1830 ANTARES
W......
5-50-00 10–50-00
C-W
5-02-005 -02-00
C......
10-52-00 15-52-00
+1-07.3 +1-07.3
GCT............ 10-53-07.3 15-53–07.3
RAMO +12 0_44–42.9
Eq.T. or Red.... 1-47.3 +10–54.5
GAT. or GST.... 11–39–37.5 16-04-01.8
Long............ 5-00-20 w 5-00-20 w
L.S.T............ 6-39–17.5
LAT or RA...... 1-42-44 11-03-41.
8
H.A. or t........ 4–56–33.5 0-56–18.2
6-30-00
5-02-00
11-32-00
+1-07.3
23-33-07.3
0_44–42.9
3–52.1
00–21-42.3
5-00–20 W
19-21-22.3
15-13-08.7
Same as for
Venus.
19-21-22.3
16-24-49.3
2-56-33
-1.
36
26-16S
0
Dec. (1)........ 5-05.6N
Corr............ +10.7
Dec. (2)......... 5–16.3N
Lat............. 37-50 N
In Dec.......... 32–33.6
3-55.75
: -.1
3-55.6S
37-20 N
41-15.6
19-27.69
-.4
19–27.25
36-34 N
56-01.2
26-16S
36–34N
62-50
Lat. I. cos........ 9.89752
Dec. I. cos....... 9.99816
t . hav....... 9.56033
0 1. hav....... 9.45601
O n. hav...... .28576
Endn. hav.......07860
Z. n. hav...... .36436
Z............... 74-15-35
Hc.............. 15-44-25
Ht.....
15-50-08
Corr. H.........+1-02-08
Hs............ 14-48-00
a................ 5.7 T
9.90043
9.99898
8.17651
8.07592
.01191
.12414
.13605
43–17–24
46-42-36
46-38-38
+8-38
46–30-00
4 A
9.90480
9.97447
9.42439
9.30366
.20122
.22054
:42176
80-59-51
9-00-09
9-03-40
-12-20
9-16-00
3.5 T
9.90480
9.95267
9.14973
9.00720
.10167
.27171
.37338
75-19-51
14-40-09
14-38-07
-10-13
14-48-20
2 A
Z (Wiers D.).....
264-20
159–14
237–35
212-55
The space below the lines of position should suffice for record of 0800, noon, and
2000 positions and other data.


  p. 2145 (#1099)                      

1925)
2145
The Navigator's Notebook :
TAKEN FROM PAGE 45 OF DUTTON'S CELO-NAVIGATION.
LINES OF POSITION FIX BY SIMULTANEOUS
OBSERVATIONS OF TWO STARS
Example 2: On July 2, 1925, during evening twilight, in D.R. position Latº
36-49 N, Long. 75-12 W, the navigator of the U.S.S. Detroit and his assistant took
simultaneous observations of stars B Leonis (Denebola) and A Scorpii (Antares)
for lines of positions as follows: W- 7-24-21; C-W 5-03-39; Chro. slow 00m-39.8s;
Ht. of eye 36 ft.; I.C.+1-30. H, Denebola 51-20-10; H, Antares 19-27-37. Required
the lines of position and the fix.
2 July, 1925.
STAR FIX, SIMULTANEOUS OBSERVATIONS.
Denebola
Lat. 36–49 N.
Antares
Long.75–12W.
5-00-48
t d
L Base
t 2-24.7 114–46
114-46 114–46
d 15 N 112–17 Denebola 115–56 – 14
W
7-24-21
L 36.8
(-) 149
(-) 70
(+)
(+)
70 N114-32 W.
56 Zn245–28
Antares
33-13 33–13 33-13
33-13
31-07 32-42 33–01 (-) 1-23
(-) 126 (-) 31 (-) 12 31-50
(-) 64 (-) 9 (-) 10 Zn 148–10
hs
19-27-37
I.C. (+) 1-30
T. 46(-) 8–37
Но
19-20–30
C-W 5-03–39 Sup.t.945.1
Chro.T. 0-28-00
Chro.S. (+)0–39.8 d 26.3 S.
G.C.T. 0_28–39.8(3 July)
R.A.M.O
L 36.8 N.
+12 18-41-59.9 hs 51-20-10
T.III 0-04.7 I.C. (+)1-30
G.S.T. 19–10-44.4 T.46 (-) 6-40
Long.(w) 5-00-48Ho 51-15-00
L.S.T. 14-09-56.4
R.A. 11-45–14.4 Denebola
t(w) 2-24-42 1. hav. 8.98404
36-49-00N 1. cos. 9.90339
d.
14-59-30N. 1. cos. 9.98496
1. hav. 8.87239
n.hav. .07454
Ind 21-49–30 n.hav. .03584
Z
38-48–30n.hav. 11038
Antares
L.S.T. 14-09-56.4
R.A. 16-24-50.5
(E)
L
2-14-54.1
36-49-00.N.
26-10-00 S
1. hav. 8.92539
1. cos. 9.90303
l. cos. 9.95267
d
1. hav. 8.78109
n.hav. 06041
n.hay. .27365
Lud 63–05-00
2 70-37-00n
19-23-00
19-20-30
.hav. .33406
Hc
Ho
51-11-30
51-15-00
3–30 miles toward
2-30 miles away


  p. 2146 (#1100)                      

2146
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
LINES OF POSITION BY METHOD OF H.O. NO. 203
NEW YORK TO GUANTANAMO
October 3, 1925.
1030 SUN 1830 VENUS
BODY
0530 MOON
1830 ANTARES
Same as for
Venus.
W...............
5-50-00 10-50-00
C-W..
5-02-005 -02-00
C......... 10-52-00 15-52-00
CC........ +1-07.3 +1-07.3
G.C.T........... 10–53-07.3 15-53-07.3
R.A.M.O +12... 0-44–42.9
RED. or EQ.T... 1-47.3 +10-54.5
G.S.T. or G.A.T. 11–39–37.5 16-04-01.8
R.A............. 1-42-44
G.H.A.....
9-56-53.5 4-04-01.8
L.H.A. (2)....... 4-55-08.5 1-03-12.8E
Corr. ........ +50.5 -10-17.2
L.H.A. (1)....... 4-54–18 1-13–30
Long (1)....
. 5-01-45 5 -07-14.6
Long (d).... 75-26-15 W 76-48–39 W
6-30-00
5-02-00
11-32-00
+1-07.3
23-33-07.3
0_44_42.9
3-52.1
0–21-42.
3
15-13-08.7
9-08–33.6
4-0649.6
- 1-54.4
408-44
5-01-44.0
75-26-00 W
0
-21-42.3
16-24-49.3
7-56-53.1
2–51-19.4
- 1-45.6
2-53-05
5-05-33.6
76-23-24 W
3-55-7
19–27.6
Dec. (1)......... 5-05.6
Corr......... +10.7
Dec. (2)......... 5–16.3 N
Lat............. 38 N
Hs.........
14-48-00
Corr....... ...+1-02-08
Ho..........
.. 15-50-08
a............... 9.9 A
3-55.6 S
37 N
46-30-00
+8-38
46–38-38
8.6 T
19-27.2 S
37 N
9-16-00
-12-20
9-03-40
3.7 T
26-16
00
26-16 S
37 N
14-48-20
-10-13
14-38-07
21.9 A
Z...............
264.1
156.7
237.3
219.1
Note: AZ=5° for 1° change in latitude.
HARBOR CHARTING UNDER DIFFICULTIES
On February 12, 1924, the Rochester was lying off the port of
Ceiba, Honduras, the setting for O. Henry's Cabbages and Kings,
safeguarding American interests while the various presidential
aspirants "revoluted.” The only chart of the place available was
H.O. Chart No. 394, published in 1884 from data taken in 1877,
scale about 1:7200. Moreover, when approaching the town, it
was found that it had been incorrectly charted. As there was
the possibility of making a hurried landing any time (sailors and
marines were landed within three weeks), a large scale harbor
chart was urgently needed. Due to the fact that the work was


  p. 2147 (#1101)                      

.
LA CEIBA, HONDURAS/
SOUNDINGS W PUT
BY SUAVEY PARTY, USS ROCHESTER
# FEBRUARY, 1924
NOTE - Moon Politia SA
do termined by Coighted Observations
LAT 15'50 of N. LONG. 86' 50'42"
LIIIIII rife
L.


  p. 2148 (#1102)                      

2148
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
(Nov.
started from the “stump," and proceeded under difficulties, a brief
description of the work is given, for what it is worth, as a pointer
to officers who might have to do similar work.
On account of the unsettled conditions ashore, the captain de-
cided that it would not be good policy to send a survey party
ashore to establish a point, measure a base line, and accurately
locate the town, but he directed that the work proceed with the
best data obtainable from the ship. The mountains south of Ceiba
spoiled the horizon for sun observations; in fact, the only good
observations obtained were made on six northern stars at dawn.
Five observations were made on each of six stars, and these were
worked out carefully by six officers giving over thirty lines, all of
which checked closely. The mean of the positions thus obtained
was used as the correct position of the ship, and with the bearing
and range finder distance, later checked by sextant angles, the best
position of the west radio tower in Ceiba was determined.
A motor sailer with the following personnel and equipment was
sent out for the data for the harbor chart:
Personnel
Duty
Equipment
Navigator
Plotted and directed Three arm protractor
work
range finder
Assistant navigator Sextant angles
Sextant
Quartermaster Sextant angles
Sextant
Quartermaster In charge soundings Three leads with lines
marked in feet
Recorder (yeoman) Record angles, sound Notebook previously
ings, etc.
ruled and spare pencils
Four seamen
Leadsmen
Boat crew
A working sheet was laid out and the position of several con-
spicuous objects on the beach located approximately by bearing
and range finder distance from the ship. These sufficed to run
sounding lines and were later adjusted with sextant angles taken
from the end of the two docks. The base line used was taken from
a blueprint of a portion of the town furnished by the Vacarro
Brothers Fruit Company; this, checked with range finder and a
round of sextant angles from the end of each dock, gave a chart
which is accurate enough for practical purposes. These data were
taken hurriedly on the twelfth, and the ship sailed the next morn-
ing before daylight. As required by Navy Regulations the data
was worked up, a harbor chart constructed, and the original data


  p. 2149 (#1103)                      

1925]
2149
The Navigator's Notebook
forwarded to the Hydrographic Office. The blueprints loaned by
the fruit company (American) were scaled down to a convenient
size and used to map the town which was shown with the harbor
chart. Finally, a tracing of the chart was made by Ensign Carson,
several blue prints were made from that, and because of the con-
ditions at Ceiba, copies were furnished to the Office of Naval
Intelligence and to other ships in the vicinity.
This sort of work is interesting and instructive, and considering
the fact that we can now keep more accurate time and have more
accurate instruments, there is no reason why we should not be able
to do more accurate work than the surveyors who worked forty or
fifty years ago under the greatest difficulties, yet who as a rule
turned out charts of surprisingly accurate standards.


  p. 2150 (#1104)                      

RADIO VISION
By C. FRANCIS JENKINS
T ROM the beginning of history, pictured information has
been the most quickly comprehended, and longest mentally
retained.
A hundred years ago photography was invented, eliminating
the possibility of dexterous error in pictures.
Thirty years ago motion was added to the picture, and we get
a sense of direction, comparative size, and approximate location.
Now radio as a carrier is wedded to the action picture so that
instantaneous delivery is attained for the most inclusive of all
means of information.
Naturally, all of these have been employed in the national de-
fense, and just as naturally it follows that this latest, radio vision,
should, in anticipation, be so considered, for it will enable the chief
of staff to sit in his office at headquarters, and watch the distant
battlefield, on sea or on land. He can constantly note the troop
movements or the fleet maneuvers, both his own and the enemy's.
The broadcasting instrument aboard the scouting airplane, by
which this is attained, is, then, literally, the eyes of the chief of
staff, the radio being the nerve tendrils which carry the visual
impressions from the scouting plane back to the brain of the com-
manding officer.
While it is true that such radio vision has not actually been done
from a plane in flight, it could be done at any time, for it is a daily
laboratory demonstration.
On June 13, last, this new thing, radio vision, was demonstrated
when Secretary Curtis D. Wilbur, and others of the Navy; Act-
ing Secretary, Judge S. B. Davis, Department of Commerce, and
friends, and Director, Dr. George M. Burgess, Bureau of Stand-
ards, saw, in a Washington laboratory, what was actually happen-
ing at the time in the Anacostia Air Station several miles away.
It is obvious, therefore, that refinement is all that remains to be
done before the chief of staff of any branch of our governmental
service may see on a screen in headquarters everything that the


  p. 2151 (#1105)                      

1925)
Radio Vision
2151
broadcast lens looks upon as it is carried aloft by a scouting air-
plane.
Of course, like every new thing, it is mysterious until the simple
principles and mechanisms employed are understood, but no longer.
To us in the laboratories it does not seem mysterious or im-
possible, or its attainment deserving of any particular comment.
We are familiar with each wire and screw and lens and tube, and
our surprise would come if the combination failed to give us radio
vision.
Until just a few days ago I have been so busy I have not had the
opportunity quietly to consider radio vision from the layman's

Jenkins Laboratories, Washington, D.C., U.S.A.
The lens-disc and prisming mechanism of the recep-
tion of radio vision. The lens-disc (black) is about
eight inches in diameter. Laboratory-test mechanism.
point of view. I had seen in the problem only the need of getting
together the necessary elements and putting them into a working
combination. Some of these I found ready at hand in science and
engineering; some others I had to invent—that is, physically
create from a mental concept; the ring prism, for example, a new
contribution to optical science.
To me it does not seem strange that you may presently plug into
the loudspeaker jack of your radio receiving set, a small box-like
device which will project a picture on a small white screen; an
action picture of some event then taking place down town, or in
some distant city; for example, a presidential ceremonial, a na-
tional sport, a spectacular event.


  p. 2152 (#1106)                      

2152
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
It is the development, the refinement of each separate element,
that is now occupying my attention, and that of the keen young
men and young ladies who are assisting me, and I think I may
confidently promise you such an attachment before many moons.
Let's see whether there is warrant for assuming that it is a
simple problem; whether there is really any mystery in the thing,
after all. Let's analyze our problem—take it to pieces and examine
it in detail.

Jenkins Laboratories, Washington, D.C., U.S.A.
The lens-disc and ring 'prism mech-
anism employed in the transmission of
radio vision. The lens-disc (black) is
about twelve inches in diameter, and the
mechanism with its motor weighs about
twenty-five pounds.
These are the essentials. First, a picture of the remote scene;
second, have the picture repeated fast enough to reproduce the
action on the scene.; and third, we want it carried into our homes
from the distant location, the baseball park, let's say. That's the
problem, and that is all there is of it: namely, a radio-carried,
continuous-picture of a distant activity. .


  p. 2153 (#1107)                      

1925]
2153
Radio Vision
[
"
DE
Hilih
Fig. 1
The Radio Vision receiving unit: G is the last tube of a detector-amplifier
set; the incoming radio signal strength is added to the critically-adjusted
lamp F; these fluctuating light values are distributed laterally by the lens-
disc D, and vertically by the ring prism E, over the picture-receiving screen C.
If one put one's head under the black cloth of an old-fashioned
camera, pointed at the baseball game, one would see in miniature,
on the ground glass an exact reproduction of the game as it goes
on. In this case, it is carried by light from the ball diamond to the
ground glass screen. That ground glass action picture is exactly
what we want, only we want it in our homes; but daylight alone
won't do, for light goes only in straight lines, and obstructions
cut it off. We must, therefore, have some kind of carrier which
B
[
]
FIG. 2
The Radio Vision transmitter unit: Beyond A is the scene to be trans-
mitted; B is the objective for imaging the scene onto ground glass C; D is
the rotating lens disc for linearly analyzing the image ; and E the prism ring
for distributing these linear "slices” across the light sensitive cell F; in which
the varying light values are converted into electric current values to be am-
plified (G) and broadcast.


  p. 2154 (#1108)                      

2154
.
U(Nov.
U
.
Naval Institute Proceedings
. S. can go around obstructions, and through the walls of our houses.
A copper wire will do, but a wire carries only to one place. Radio,
however, carries everywhere, so we adopt radio instead; besides
which, radio is a convenient and cheap carrier.
Next we come to the consideration of the picture. Now a pic-
ture is nothing but some black and white mixed up together in a
definite order. Pick up a newspaper, a book, or a photograph, and
examine it analytically; it is made up of lights and shadows only.
But how are we going to make radio, which has carried these
lights and shadows from the ball park to our home, reproduce the
ball game as a picture.
Don't you remember that when we were little tikes, mother en-
tertained us by putting a penny under a piece of paper, and by
drawing straight lines across the paper she made a picture of the
Indian appear. Well, that's the very way to do it.
In our homes we take a small square of white blotting paper,
fasten it on the wall, and move across it in successive lines an
image of a small light source. If this little light spot moves across
the screen swiftly the eye sees it as a line, like the circle of fire
of our youth when we swung a lighted stick.
Now, when these successive lines, one under another, succeed
each other so rapidly that the whole screen surface is covered in
one sixteenth of a second we have motion picture speed, and the
whole surface appears continuously illuminated.
But, when the illumination is controlled by the incoming radio
current, put through our lamp, the strong signals will make the
spot of light on the screen very bright in certain places; the
weaker signals less bright in other parts, and when there are no
signals at all the lamp goes out, and black spots appear. Our
screen is no longer uniformly lighted, but the light is dabbed about
over the screen.
Because a picture is only a collection of these little dabs of light
put around in different places on the screen, it will readily be seen
that these radio light variations, when they follow a predetermined
order, make up our picture of the ball game, just as the humps on
the penny made up a picture of the Indian.
On the broadcast apparatus the picture image of the baseball
game is "sliced” up into slices, like a bacon-slicer in the market,
and the lights and darks sweeping across a light sensitive cell are
converted into electric currents which, carried by radio to your


  p. 2155 (#1109)                      

1925]
2155
Radio Vision
home, are converted back into light values, a "motion picture"
of the distant ball game.
So that's the way we do radio vision in your home; that is, the
incoming radio signals turn the light up and down as it is moved
swiftly over the screen, and you “see" the distant scene.
Easy, isn't it? You can go out into the woodshed and build
yourself one now. Of course, if you have no woodshed where
you can get off by yourself and think clearly, you are out of luck.


  p. 2156 (#1110)                      

DISCUSSION
. . . . Diesel Engines for Capital Ships
(See page 1217, July, 1925, Proceedings)
Captain A. M. PROCTOR, U.S.N :-In my article on “Diesel Engines for
Capital Ships," published in the July number of the Institute PROCEED-
INGS, I attempted to present to the operating branch of the Navy a specific
advantage to be gained from a Diesel engine. This result was predicated
upon the possibility of developing an engine suitable for the purpose.
In view of the fact that Admiral Robison has apparently misunderstood
my purpose and seems to believe that I have recommended a jump toward
a "possible but improbable miracle," I will state specifically just what I
propose as a logical step toward the ultimate solution of the problem. It
is proposed that the development of a single cylinder unit suitable for the
purpose be undertaken.
This course has been followed by practically every leading Diesel engine
builder in Europe and by the Worthington Company in this country.
In every case where the difficulties have been overcome in a one-cylinder
engine and the resultant unit combined into a completed engine, the result
has been an unqualified success.
When the reciprocating engine passed into obsolescence there remained
one problem, the practical solution of which had not been reached—that of
torsional vibration.
During the past few years, however, largely through the efforts of Pro-
fessor F. M. Lewis of the Webb Academy and the Diesel engine personnel
of the New York Navy Yard the solution of this problem has reached a
practical basis, and, having developed a one-cylinder unit, it is now possible
to combine that unit in a multi-cylinder engine without fear as to the final
result.
No article can be written at present on the subject of Diesel engines
without the certainty that it will be obsolete when published. Since my
article was written several things have happened:
The results of the trials of the Gripsholm engine have been made
public, the 10,000 B.H.P. engines of the Asturias have been completed and
are ready for trial, the Augsburg engine is being built in a nine-cylinder
15,000 B.H.P. unit, and orders have been placed for a number of Werks-
poor double-acting engines developing 1,000 B.H.P. per cylinder.
Within the next few months the details of the Fiat two-cycle, double-
acting engine developing 2,000 B.H.P. per cylinder will be available.
Mr. H. H. Blache, the managing director of Burmeister and Wain, has
stated that his firm is prepared to build an engine with a forty-three-inch
cylinder in units of 25,000 B.H.P.


  p. 2157 (#1111)                      

1925]
2157
Discussion
This statement is entitled to great respect, made by the head of the firm
which has installed more marine Diesels than all other builders combined
and which has in service today every installation ever made, with the ex-
ception of that of the Selandia which was burned at sea.
It is evident that the day of the large Diesel has arrived.
It must be remembered, however, that all of these engines are long
stroke, low-revolution engines suitable for continued steaming, in commer-
cial vessels.
In the development of reciprocating steam engines, there was a marked
differentiation in type between the long-stroke liner engine and the short-
stroke high speed battleship engine.
There will be a similar differentiation in the Diesel engines, but with the
experience of the builders of commercial engines available, there will be no
difficulty in adapting the commercial type to naval needs.
The dynamic strains incident to the increased speed of revolution are
capable of exact determination.
With the establishment through commercial practice of the fact that
cylinder diameters necessary to develop the required power, at a certain
value of mean indicated pressure, are practicable the development of a
naval engine running at a high piston speed presents no difficulties, since
the heat strains do not increase, but rather tend to decrease, with in-
creased speed, so long as the mean indicated pressure remains the same.
Admiral Robison is in error in assuming that I have not considered all
of the factors involved. I have considered all of them very thoroughly.
The conditions which he lays down for naval machinery are as follows:
"First: Naval machinery must be safe to operate."
There are many things which can happen to a Diesel engine, but I have
been unable to think of anything which can happen to it which would class
it as being unsafe to operate, nor have I been able to learn of anything
which ever did happen to a Diesel engine which would so class it.
"Second: It must be reliable; it must be possible for a ship's force,
composed of such material as we have on naval vessels, to operate and
maintain naval machinery in such condition as always to be capable of
whatever service it was designed to render.”
There is undoubtedly a general impression in our service that Diesel
engines are not as reliable as steam machinery.
This impression is due to the unsatisfactory performance of the Maumee
engine, an engine which represented a jump toward large power units be-
fore the then-existing state of knowledge justified it, and to the complete
failure of all early submarine engines, due to faulty design. With the
Augsburg engine in service this impression is being corrected, but in pass-
ing judgment upon this engine it should be remembered that it is working
under conditions where a steam plant would be an impossibility.
As to the reliability of the Diesel engine, there is an accumulated mass
of information which is overwhelming and which is so well known to all


  p. 2157 (#1112)                      


BEAN
Tori
3 0 CLEARANCE
CLEARANCE
OVERLAP 16
Diam SCREWS 14-0
RATIO SCREW DIA BERS
8 .79
DWL COLFT 75
(ABRFT 0
Vi
DAIN DECH
DE TAX 686
DWL 338 opon FRAME
APPROL LENGTH
MOTOR R000 68.0"
CLEARANCE
CLEARANCE
SECTION 138
SECTION 190, 200 AND 201
SECTION 175
DIA DETERS OF SCREWS SHOWN 180 dem Of TANGENT CIRCLES 200
CLEARANCE --20"
RATIO SCREW DIAM : BEAM
..85
MAIN DECH
THAUST
DWL COCTE. 788
ABATT
BEAR 106.0
BEAM MAX. 1040"
AS DAWN
- 600
ge
- 0.7L 4250*
SKETCH SHOWING ONRECI DE
AND 31 'BROT fel
LENGTH DAN


  p. 2157 (#1113)                      

IME ANTIO OF LINEAR DIMENSION OF
ENGINE SHOWN BELOW TO THAT
SHOWN IN DIRECT DRIVE 15 1:2
CN Dina 17, STROKE 204, APM 400
MIS PLAN OF A SCOUT CAVISER WAS
DOWN ON A SCALE OF 'ho 1 Foot
USING THE SCALE OF THE BATTLE
CRUSER PLAN ON THE DIMENSIONS
ent INCREASED IN INE RATIO 151
ma
bo 1000000
out rey INE INLAA DENSONS
CRUISLAS BAY BUEN INCALASED
The 125
5- 9000 BNP UNITS. 45,000 BMP
LENGTH OM 1%.000 BNP. 296 .
MOTOR AND CONTROL ROOM APPROJ 660
TOTAL 364 O APPROX
AUTHOAT MACHINERY / ono !!
IRID
+
SECTION 138
LA
SECTION 100
- BEAM 01 104-0"
TYPICAL SEGTION
ELECTRIC DRIVE

CENT OF CHEWS
====
(DECHS)
AURELIARY MACHINAY
36.000 WF! () DECM3)
9
000 000 000 000
190.
-
1000 -
LINGIN ENGINE MOOPS 2000
-
LENGTH MACHINCHY SPACE 200-0"
THIS LENGTH ADDED TO BRING AVI RACH-
SPACE UP TO INA! OF ELECT DAME
LIGAY
AUXILIARY
DUD UUD DOO UOD
UDDDDD JODODD
MESY
16 CU.FI
MACHINERY
44.100 CU.FI
oso
o
o
o
70
30
s
ro
o so to
SCOLE - FEET
DRIVE IN SHIP 8500"Owl 104-0"max BEAM
VGTH MACHINERY SPACE 280'-0"
SPACE DIESEL ELECT 364.0"


  p. 2158 (#1114)                      

BEBE 6 ORE
3:0 CLEARANCE
CLEAU
-OVERLAP
-
5
-O
0 21-
Diam SCREWS 4.0
RATIO SCREW DIAM BEAM
OWL COU!..75
(ABAFT 0 )
ARRIN DECK
DO
fo
E
X. 66-6
60-0
D.NL. 338' o'rmon passe
APPROX. LENGTH
MOTOR A00m 6.0

CLEANONCE
CLEARANCE
O
SECTION 138
SECTION 190, 200 AND 201
SECTION 175
...DIA PETERS OF SCREWS SHOWN 180 DAM OF TANGENT CERCLES 20"
CLEARANCE --20"
RATIO SCREW Diem: BEAM - 0
BEAM - .85
.85
E-
MAIN DECH
THAUST
THRUST
DWL COEFF. 788
ABAF1
44-0-
BEAM
O
Brennan 1040"
AS DAWN
609-"
190
10.7L 425-
SKETCH SHOWING SPEC
AND 36 DSM
LN6TH


  p. 2159 (#1115)                      


THE RATIO OF LINEAR DIMENSION OF
ENGINE SHOWN BELOW TO THAT
SHOWN IN DIRECT DRIVE 15 1:2
an Dinn 17, STROKE 2041 APM 400
THIS PLAN OF A SCOUT CRUISER WAS
BROWN ON A SCRLE OF 20.
USING THE SCALE OF THE BATTLE
CRUSER PLAN BELOW THE DIBENSIONS
MAE INCREASED IN THE RANO 125
TO SO
Ovo que
XO DE
p000 000
ADOLAY THE LINEAR DIANENSIONS
SCOUT CRUISERS HAVE BEEN INCREASED
9720 125
5 - 9000 BHP UNI15. 45.000 BHP
LENGTH FOR (26.000 BMP-2960"
MOTOR AND CONTROL ROOM APPROX 680
TOIRL 34 OAPPROX
AUXILIARY MACHINERY
NOU!
HEHEHE
34CTION 138
SECTION 100
DEAM mal 1040
TYPICAL SEGTION
LLECTRIC DARE
(ENT OF SCREW
AU MACH
(DLC
)
VILLARY MACHINTAY
36.000 W FT (DEENS)
000 000 000 000
1000
100 o
LENGTH ENGINE nooms 200'0"
LENGTH PRACHINERY SPACE 280.0
THIS LENGTH ADDED 10 BAING AUI DACN
SPAU UP TO THAT OF ELECT DANE
AUXILIARY
ALLIAMY
CHINERY
3376
IMACHINERY
44.100 W.FT
BO
it so 2
2
30
70
80
100
40 50 60
SCALE - PEET
EL DRIVE IN SHIP 850'-0"WL 1040 AX BEAM
ENGTH MACHINERY SPACE 280'-0"
Y SPACE DIESEL ELECT 364.0"


  p. 2160 (#1116)                      

2160
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
officers who have followed the development of this engine that it would
seem to be superfluous to repeat any of it.
There is not a more conservative class in the world than the British
ship owner. Based on an experience far wider than our own, they are,
by placing orders for larger and larger units, showing a confidence in the
Diesel engine which should dispel any doubts as to the fact that this type
of engine is fully as reliable, under like conditions, as the steam engine.
As to the requirement that naval machinery shall be capable of being
maintained by the ship's force, it is within the knowledge of all sea-going
officers that in steam-driven machinery we are far from having reached
that goal.
There is an abundance of evidence available that the Diesel engine is
not inferior to the steam plant in this important respect.
It is, of course, basic that naval machinery should be placed below the
water line.
As to Admiral Robison's statement that "usually also it is necessary that
this machinery be ready to develop full power upon demand,” it seems
hardly necessary to point out that this feature is one which gives to the
Diesel installation a superlative advantage over the steam plant.
The comments of Admiral Dyson and Captain Robinson raise technical
questions which are difficult to answer without a lengthy discussion. I
will attempt, however, to state briefly my reasons for disagreeing with
both of them.
Admiral Dyson states:
For any considerable power over that which is now fitted on those
vessels (latest battleships) consideration of tip clearances between pro-
pellers and the hull and between adjacent propellers places such limitations
on the diameters of the propellers which can be used that we are driven
to increase in speed of revolutions in order that the propellers with these
limited diameters may be able efficiently to absorb the power, .... and it
is an absolute impossibility to use them (Diesel engines) for such powers
as our light cruisers and airplane carriers, both on account of the necessary
limitation of piston speeds of the engines and the resultant low revolutions
of the propellers.
As to the light cruisers I agree with Admiral Dyson ; I am not at present
prepared to suggest the possibility of a Diesel drive for those vessels. The
problem of the airplane carriers is far simpler, however, as will appear.
Little information is available as to those vessels, and detailed informa-
tion is presumably still held as confidential.
The following, however, has been published and is sufficient to form a
fairly accurate estimate as to the propeller conditions:
L.W.L.
850 feet o inches
D.W.L.
102 feet o inches
Beam max.
106 feet o inches
Draft D.W.L.
31 feet 6 inches
Speed
33.25 knots
S.H.P.
180,000
Diameter of motors
15 feet o inches
Eight motors on four shafts developing 22,500 S.H.P, each.


  p. 2161 (#1117)                      

1925]
2161
Discussion
35
Assuming that these motors are similar in their general proportions to
those of the West Virginia, which an inspection of the photograph pub-
lished in Marine Engineering indicates, it is a simple matter to determine
that in order to develop 22,500 S.H.P. the motor speed must be approxi-
mately 330 r.p.m.
Assuming a tip speed of 14,000 feet per minute, which Admiral Dyson
places as the limit if cavitation is to be avoided, the diameters of the pro-
pellers will be about 13.5 feet.
The scout cruisers on a maximum beam of 54 feet 10 inches have four
propellers with a diameter of 11.25 feet. Since the lines of the scout
cruisers v. ill not differ materially from those of the airplane carriers, it
would be possible to install four propellers with a diameter of about 22
feet and maintain the same proportions as in the scouts. From this it is
evident that the small propellers are a result of conditions limiting the
motor diameters rather than those of the propellers.
A comparison between the propeller conditions of the scouts and the
airplane carriers, using published data for the former and estimated data
for the latter is given below:
Propeller
Scout
Airplane Carrier
Diameter
11.25 feet
13.5 feet
Pitch
11.83 feet
14.25 feet
Ratio P/D
.95
.95
R.p.m.
380
330
Speed, knots
33
S.H.P.
90,000
180,000
Tip speed
13,429 f.p.m.
13,995 f.p.m.
Thrust per square inch. 11.5 lbs.
15.3 lbs.
D.A. (Based on S.H.P.)
In order to determine just what could be done in the way of screws for
a Diesel engined airplane carrier, it has been necessary to resort to the
drawing board, and the accompanying plan has been drawn showing a five-
shaft arrangement with twelve cylinders on each shaft.
In order to develop the power, 3,000 B.H.P. per cylinder will be re-
quired for which an engine of the following characteristics will be
necessary :
Cylinder diameter
34 inches Net area 850 square inches
Stroke
40.8 inches =3.4 feet
200
Piston speed
1360 f.p.m.
M.i.p.
96 lbs.
Mechanical Efficiency
90% (Separately driven auxiliaries)
M.e.p. brake
86.4 lbs.
B.H.P. Cyl.
3027 lbs.
I do not expect the statement that the development of such an engine is
practicable to be accepted without proof. I am quite prepared to submit
this proof in detail, but an attempt to do so at present would lead far be-
yond the limits of this discussion.
It may be pointed out, however, that this power being that required for
abnormal conditions during short periods of full speed required for naval
R.p.m.


  p. 2162 (#1118)                      

2162
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
vessels is not, when based on normal continuous steaming conditions, ma-
terially greater than that justified by recent developments. At 60 per cent
of full power, which is the present relationship between full power and con-
tinuous steaming power established by experience, this engine would develop
1,800 B.H.P. per cylinder, which is less than that of the Fiat engine, and
not materially greater than that of the Augsburg nine-cylinder engine now
under construction.
To return to the question of propellers : The plan of the scout cruiser
shown has been drawn for the purpose of comparison with the Diesel lay-
out for the airplane carrier. The lines of this sketch are only approxi-
mately correct, as they have been drawn without reference to confidential
plans, but in order that the comparison should be fair I have developed
the lines and sections of the airplane carrier from a water line having
a materially larger coefficient than that of the scouts.
Inspection of this plan will show that it is possible to install five screws
with a diameter of eighteen feet, with materially more favorable conditions
as regards tip clearances than exist in the scouts.
The propeller conditions for this layout are as follows:
Propeller
Diameter
18.0 feet
Slip
20 per cent (assumed)
Pitch
20.8 feet
Ratio P/D
1.15
R.p.m.
200
Speed
33 knots
S.H.P.
180,000
Tip speed
11,300 f.p.m.
Thrust per square inch D.A.
7.9 lbs.
(Based on S.H.P.)
By all the laws governing propeller design it would be permissible to
claim a higher propeller efficiency with the lowered propeller speed, and
consequent lowered tip speed and thrust, but with the specified B.H.P.,
180,000, the above data is sufficient to justify the claim that Admiral Dyson's
statement that “it is very doubtful whether Diesel engines arranged on
four shafts can be used for the development of any propulsive power much
in excess of our latest battleships," is too conservative.
I cannot but disagree with Captain Robinson when he states that the
present tendency in design points to the use of the reduction gear, or that
this will be the ultimate solution.
Many years ago, before the turbine was considered practicable for
marine installations in any form, an inventor appeared at the Navy Depart-
ment with a patent on the electric drive. Many letters were written from
the Bureau of Steam Engineering explaining that there could be no ad-
vantage in interposing a generator and a motor between a prime mover
and the propeller when the prime mover was capable of being directly con-
nected. The Diesel engine is essentially a slow speed machine. Admiral
Dyson makes the point that it is too slow to be connected to the high
speed propellers required in high powered installations. In this country


  p. 2163 (#1119)                      

1925)
2163
Discussion
there has been a marked development in the Diesel electric drive, and when
small high speed Diesels are compared to long stroke, slow speed, single-
acting engines a very favorable case can be made out for the electric drive.
The situation is very materially altered, however, when the comparison is
made with a double-acting engine. This development has been influenced
to a great extent by two factors; first, the fact that the small high speed
engine suitable for small powered, electric drive installations has reached
a high state of development in this country; and, second, the fact that this
form of drive has been pushed by two very progressive, aggressive, and
highly competitive firms. There has been no such development abroad,
and, with the exception of several installations made for the purpose of
using war-built submarine engines, there is, as far as I know, but one ex-
ample of the geared Diesel drive, that of the Monte Sarmiento. In dis-
cussing this installation, Dr. Hugo Fram makes an interesting comparison
which is given below:
Type of Drive
2,000 S. H.P. Single Screw
4-Cyc. S. A. 4-Cyc. S. A. 2-Cyc. S.A. 2-Cyc. D.A
direct
geared
direct
direct
Weight 430 tons 216 tons 289 tons 177 tons
Price $100,000 $69,600 $79,350 $51,400
Propeller
speed 95 r.p.m. 70 r.p.m. 85 r.p.m. 75 r.p.m.
Piston
speed 840 f. p.m. 840 f.p.m.
It will be noted that in the above table the two-cycle, double-acting engine
is rated at but 590 feet piston speed as compared to 840 feet piston speed in
the geared drive.
When we consider the geared drive for large power installations the
large number of cylinders required becomes impressive.
The Augsburg 21 inch by 21 inch submarine engine develops 300 B.H.P.
at 380 R.P.M. For an installation developing 180,000 B.H.P. this would
require 600 cylinders.
To install these engines six abreast, which would reduce the clearance
between engines to the limit, would require a line one hundred cylinders
long, and since the distance between cylinders is about 38.5 inches, the
total length required for cylinders alone, without room for generators or
passages between engines, would be 320 feet, 1.60 times the length required
for direct drive, with the motor rooms, generators, and passages still to be
accounted for,
It is, of course, possible to install double-acting engines for electric
drive, and a sketch has been made showing an installation of double-acting
engines having a ratio of linear dimension one half that of the direct drive.
This engine will develop one quarter the power of the direct drive engine
and will have a weight per B.H.P. of one half that of the direct drive.
Even allowing for the head room saved, the space occupied by the
electric drive is very materially greater than that of the direct drive. This


  p. 2164 (#1120)                      

2164
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
is natural in view of the fact that the projected cylinder area is the same
with both installations, and that the passages between the engines, which,
being based on the size of the men using them, cannot be reduced below a
certain limit, are largely increased in area as the number of engines is in-
creased.
There would probably be a material saving in weight of the machinery
even with the motor and generator weights added, but when the extra fuel
required by the .92 efficiency of the electric combination is considered there
will be no net gain.
The number of cylinders required with this installation would be 260.
Should smaller engines be installed this number of cylinders will be in-
creased to a prohibitive figure, and the horizontal space, for reasons stated,
will be materially increased.
As a final objection it may be pointed out that the real reason for a re-
duction gear is to reduce the speed, and with propellers running at 330
r.p.m. imposed by motor conditions the speed reduction in any case would
be small.
In closing, I would again like to state, in case I may have been misun-
derstood, that I do not suggest that it is now practicable to install a Diesel
engine in any type of surface vessel contemplated.
What I do suggest is that if we undertake now the development of a
large size Diesel engine cylinder and carry on this development through
changing administrations up to the time of laying down a replacement
battleship, we shall in all probability be in a position to decide on the
motive power to be installed without the uncertainty and risk of having to
consider an undeveloped type, which may be forced upon us to meet the
competition of our possible opponents. .
It is quite true, as Admiral Robison states, that any naval vessel may at
some time, bear in itself the onus of maintaining the national honor, but,
in view of the highly competitive nature of our calling, it is for that very
reason that we cannot afford to proceed too safely. Herreshoff once re-
marked in regard to the highly competitive occupation of building yachts
to defend our national honor, “It is just as easy to lose a race by building
a yacht too strong as by building one too weak.” The same thing might be
said of battles and battleships.
Excellence of Naval Material
(See page 1573, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS.)
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER J. F. SHAFROTH, U.S.N.—Lieutenant Com-
mander Craven, in his article entitled “Excellence of Naval Material," pro-
poses changes in the organization of the Navy Department that are so
extensive and radical as to require legislation to make most of them effect-
ive even if deemed desirable.
The merging of the "technical” bureaus into a "Division of Naval Ma-
terial" under a single head would be, it is believed, a progressive step. It
would undoubtedly result in the simplification of the seemingly illogical


  p. 2165 (#1121)                      

1925)
2165
Discussion
cognizance of material under the several bureaus, a simplification of con-
trol of navy yard expenditures and cost accounting and, as pointed out in
the article, would substitute coordination for cooperation with its personal
variables. The head of such a division should be, in my opinion, junior to
the Chief of Naval Operations. It would seem fitting that he be given
the rank of vice admiral as the position that he would occupy would be one
of great responsibility and should be one of great authority.
I completely disagree with Lieutenant Commander Craven as to the de-
sirability of placing the function of determining the military and major
operational characteristics of ships under the proposed “Division of Naval
Material.” The head of such division will undoubtedly be a “material
man," whereas the characteristics to be embodied in our vessels must
primarily be based on tactical and strategical considerations and the mate-
rial designed and fabricated to conform to such considerations.
Usually the General Board is composed of officers who have recently
held important commands afloat and whose duties have compelled them to
give much thought to strategical and tactical situations that may arise in
war. They have available the advice of experienced officers in every line
and are admirably equipped to specify the military and major operational
characteristics of vessels. The "Division of Naval Material” would have
the task of preparing the detailed designs to meet the specifications laid
down by the General Board and would and should have the advice of ex-
perienced seagoing and technical officers in this work. In case the speci-
fications were greater than could be embodied in a vessel of the allowed
tonnage, and this is believed to be desirable rather than otherwise in order
to obtain the maximum, it would devolve upon the “Division of Naval
Material” to inform the General Board what combinations of certain
features would be possible. The decision as to the modifications should,
however, not come from the technical division but from the General Board;
that is, from experienced line officers who have handled or will handle the
finished product. The general characteristics having been determined upon
and pronounced practicable then the “Division of Naval Material” would
proceed with the detail design work cooperating as at present but cooper-
ating under an authoritative coordinator with authority to render a definite
decision that would be binding on the cooperating agencies.
It is regretted that Lieutenant Commander Craven's article is so long
and goes into such detail. It becomes of more interest if read with Com-
mander Fisher's article on Proposed Administrative Changes in the Navy
Department, March, 1925, issue of PROCEEDINGS.
Excellence of Naval Material
(See page 1573, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER H. S. HOWARD (CC), U.S.N.—The article by Lieutenant
Commander F. S. Craven, U. S. Navy, entitled, “Excellence of Naval Ma-
terial,” is of great interest, particularly to one who is, or has been, con-
cerned with the design of naval ships. In studying the article it divides


  p. 2166 (#1122)                      

2166
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
itself naturally into two parts: one part is a criticism of the present or-
ganization of the Navy Department as concerns the whole handling of naval
material by bureaus, with their present responsibilities as to funds, cog-
nizance, and their interrelations, with a scheme proposed as a substitute;
the second part comprises a suggested scheme for the conception and carry-
ing out of designs of naval vessels.
In the article, the second question, that of naval design, is treated first,
and in the most detail, and it appears obvious that this question of the de-
sign of naval vessels is the one in which the author is most interested and
his proposed scheme for handling designs is the principal feature of the
article. Therefore, although this question is actually subsidiary to the
major question of the proposed reorganization of the material branch of the
Navy Department, it will be commented upon first.
The author's principal suggestions as to changes in the method of handling
designs of ships are that first, the original conception as to the design or
type of vessel which is needed should come from one man, the head of the
design division of the Navy Department, who should be a line officer. The
idea is stressed of the superiority of one-man design over design by a
committee. Second, it is proposed that the development of the design up
to the point where final detailing starts, should be supervised by line
officers.
As far as the first point is concerned, I am disposed to agree that if the
right man is selected for the "head of the conceptive agency," be he line or
technical officer, greater brilliance will almost surely result in the designs
than where design in its conception is handled by a committee, as it is at
present. However, mistakes may well be greater. As an example there
are the Glorious, Furious, and Courageous, brilliant conceptions of a most
able officer, but worthless as ships for their intended functions when built.
It is believed that a superman only could fill the proposed position of "head
of conceptive agency,” particularly when it is remembered that his principal
job must, of necessity, be at sea, commanding ships or fleets, with this
design job an offshoot from the work to which he has been trained all his
life.
With designs conceived (or at least with the major characteristics out-
lined), as they are at present by the General Board, the whole conception
comes from line officers of experience. The technical design bureau can
and does submit proposed designs, varying from radical to reactionary for
the consideration of the board during its determination of characteristics,
and when designs are proposed by the conceptive board this technical bureau
can ascertain in a short time whether such proposals are practical from
an engineering standpoint or not.
It is agreed that designs by a board or committee are probably com-
promises, but, as stated above, without the assurance that the one man in
a one-man design division is a superman, it is believed that the present
system gives results much better on the average than would be attained by
the system as proposed.
As regards the next point, that line officers should supervise and control
the development of design, this is a difficult question, and I believe that as


  p. 2167 (#1123)                      

19251
Discussion
2167
a practical possibility, it is out of the question. The major features of new
ships, both military and operational, are now established by line officers,
and practically all of the detail features are subject to their comment and
criticism, as each new ship represents almost entirely in its details, an ad-
vance upon and not a departure from its predecessors, and these features
of a new ship are determined by the results obtained with similar features
on the old. No matter how able a line officer, and I am in no sense intend-
ing to criticize their ability, their work does not run continuously along
the line of ship design. Ship designers depend very greatly upon the com-
ments and criticisms of line officers as to features of existing ships and
of the features of ships under design, and to obtain this comment, reports
are received from vessels in the fleet, and the criticism of line officers on
duty in the department is sought on new designs. For the best results in
the actual preparation of a detailed design, however, I cannot see any
solution but a branch of technical ship designers. As a matter of fact, in
this article Lieutenant Commander Craven states that the line cannot per-
form technical design, and this statement cannot be reconciled with his
proposed design division. While the preceding may be criticism, it is in
entire agreement with his principle that "line officers should participate in
the development of all general designs as regards the incorporation of mili-
tary or operational features."
The remainder of the article is a criticism of the present division of
work among the bureaus of the department and their cognizance, and the
present system of appropriations. With these comments I am generally in
accord. The present bureaus have grown to enormous proportions from
small and simple beginnings, and in this growth the division of cognizance
between the bureaus has not kept pace with modern development. The
present system is not the fault of the bureaus themselves, and in any
organization, divisions or bureaus, give them whatever name you will,
must exist to care for the logical divisions of the work. The present con-
ditions are, of course, aggravated by the system of appropriating funds, and
the responsibility therefor.
In general it appears to me that the reorganization of the department
which Lieutenant Commander Craven proposes would doubtless be an im-
provement on the present organization. With some details I do not agree,
as, for example, there must be closer touch than is indicated between
maintenance and design, as these two functions come together when altera-
tions on ships of the fleet are to be undertaken, since the necessity of
alterations will almost surely bring the need for changes in new design.
However, the general scheme as proposed seems logical, and, subject
to a revision as to details, would represent an improvement over the present
system.
Excellence of Naval Material
(See page 1573, September, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
Captain H. C. DINGER, U.S.N.—The article written by Lieutenant Com-
mander Craven brings up many points that are worthy of discussion. It
shows extensive and studied thought and therefore merits careful con-


  p. 2168 (#1124)                      

2168
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
sideration. It apparently represents the views of an officer of independent
ideas who sees many shortcomings in our present naval material and in the
present system of producing and handling it.
Apparently, the author has had considerable experience in handling and
operating intricate naval materials, particularly ordnance material, and he
also appears to have studied much. His reactions are, no doubt, largely
the result of his experience, study, and thought. His experience appar-
ently is lacking in connection with the actual design and construction of
vessels and the making of major repairs and alterations.
This appears to be reflected in the article. The recitation of short-
comings is, in general, sound. The suggested remedies, however, often
appear to be theoretical and in many respects rather impracticable.
For present shortcomings, duplications, interferences, and lack of unity,
there would be introduced others more varied and less easily assimilated.
Many of the suggestions embody an idealism that is difficult to realize
in these quite practical times.
Any organization of the Navy and any administrative procedure for the
Navy, to be successful, must be based on the navy personnel as it actually
exists now or is likely to exist in the near future; also, on Congress and
the present people of the United States. This fact appears to have been
lost sight of to a considerable extent. Also, in citing present difficulties,
these are laid to the present system instead of to individual idiosyncrasies.
As a matter of fact, most of our terrible examples are not due to any par-
ticular system but due to improper individual action by persons who should
have known better. Now it looks to me that the suggested scheme will
very greatly multiply the opportunities for such contrary individuals. I
do not anticipate that the supply of such contrary-minded individuals will
be greatly decreased in the immediate future.
Commander Jordan's discussion in the September number of PROCEED-
INGS is a very good answer to many of the novel ideas advanced.
My own reactions are based largely on experience with naval material.
This has involved design, construction, inspection, operation, and command.
My experience has been such that I have had the opportunity of looking
from the outside in as well as from the inside out. The views and view-
points from these two situations are not the same. With this basis of
experence I shall venture to go over the article and comment pro and con
on the various matters, mainly from the viewpoint of a technical officer.
Page 1578—Money. I see no practical way of disregarding money. We
shall have to regard and also surrender to money limitations, whether we
like it or not. Disregard for money considerations has been one of our
most serious shortcomings, sometimes resulting in disaster. Ajax was not
a very practical man, nor did he exercise very good judgment.
Pages 1578 and 1579. There appear to be an unnecessarily large number
of groups. I cannot see how the financial group is to represent productive
and operational costs or available funds. Congress and the budget sets
the available funds and it is not very difficult to ascertain what they are.
Page 1580 and following. There will be need in any organization for
coordination and cooperation. Brilliant conception is obviously based on


  p. 2169 (#1125)                      

1925)
2169
Discussion
intelligence, knowledge, and experience. This can be secured to some ex-
tent by individuals and also by boards or committees.
Page 1585. Again, there appears to be too many groups. I cannot see
what the financial group has to do. Furthermore, supply officers are not
estimators of material costs. The present General Board appears to exer-
cise or can exercise the functions of the Board of Review.
Pages 1586 and 1587. Comments on these pages are quite sound, par-
ticularly those relating to permanence of personnel.
Page 1592. Line officers keep out of technical design. I cannot agree
to this, except that they should keep out of the particular design work for
which they are not fitted. By all means, use their talents where they are
productive.
Page 1594. The various subdivisions appear to be arbitrary as con-
ceived by the author. Such subdivisions as are given would probably not
be used in actual practice.
Page 1597. Records. This looks very complicated. I cannot grasp
clearly what is meant. Such elaboration as appears to be suggested is deemed
quite unnecessary and would be confusing to the actual designers. Proper
design and operating records should be kept. However, it is not necessary
that these be kept all in one room or in one particular place.
Page 1597. The author appears to think that the preparation of a ship's
design is much more complicated than it really is. Designing a vessel,
although a big job, is not such a terrible mystery to those properly trained
and familiar with the work.
Page 1605. The conception of planning, contracts, procurement, and
storage appears to be rather hazy. These things are done quite effectively
and efficiently under our present system. Storage should be a function of
the supply officers.
Page 1606. Cost accounting is at present centralized; no greater cen-
tralizing appears necessary or desirable.
The conception of testing and inspection does not appear to be clear.
In actual practice it is not split up in the manner suggested. It also is
tem when this is properly carried out.
Page 1608. Observations as to economy are concurred in.
Effective centralized control over various yards is now effectively exer-
cised.
There is close liaison between production and maintenance since these
functions are largely combined in the same persons.
The distinction between production and maintenance is not understood.
At present, design, production, inspection, and maintenance on any par-
ticular type of material is quite well coordinated because these functions
are exercised by the same person or persons trained and experienced along
the same lines.
Page 1609. Cooperation with Operation. There is now an effective sys-
tem for accomplishing this. Its efficiency depends upon the intelligence of
the officials who operate it.


  p. 2170 (#1126)                      

2170
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Page 1610. Advance reports. Such reports are of little use. The
agency that is to accomplish the work must necessarily examine it, unless
it is a simple replacement.
Page 1612. The suggestion for a single agency for developing material
appears to be sound.
Page 1613. We already have centralized accounting, also a budget
agency. The budget agency is as yet not fully developed, but accounting
is. In some respects it is overgrown.
Page 1614 and following. The remarks on training and specializing are
the best part of this article.
Page 1617. There is no reason why line officers should not do technical
design for which they fit themselves properly.
A proper system of specialists within the line will probably secure better
allround results than a technical corps except for naval constructors and
civil engineers who seem to be satisfactory under present arrangements.
Page 1617. The General Board is advisory. The Chief of Operations
makes decisions, being guided, supposedly, by his Assistant for Material
and Planning Section
Page 1618. Specialists do participate very decidedly in major conceptions.
Continuous conceptive supervision. According to the present organiza-
tion of the Navy Department this is lodged under the Chief of Naval
Operations, (Assistant for Material).
Page 1619—7-8. Material is handled both by classes and by functions.
This is entirely proper. A purely functional organization is quite ini-
practicable.
Page 1620—10. It is entirely proper that technical officers should con-
trol ship design, being guided in this by military and operating require
ments. This is the only practical way of accomplishing effective results.
Page 1621–11. This seems to hit the nail on the head.
12. Line specialists can and should perform technical de-
sign. Radio is an instance of successful application.
13. If any additional coordinating is necessary, Chief of
Naval Operations (Material Section) is provided for this very purpose.
14. There is little or no overlapping cognizance. Cog.
nizance is quite clearly defined and is well understood by officials familiar
with material work.
15. This can hardly be admitted. The trouble so far has
been that there has been no proper concensus of opinion on military require-
ments and these have not been placed before the technical forces in a proper
form for use. This condition is being improved but is far from satis-
factory. Note delay in getting out design of new light cruisers.
Destroyer body designs have reached great excellence in securing the
military characteristics of speed and economy of power. The military
authorities would hardly wish to sacrifice these for the subsidiary and less
definite requirement of a smaller turning circle. Actual design is a com-
promise, not a theoretical ideal.
Our light cruisers have four stacks because this is the best arrangement
for utilizing the space and weight available. Smoke control was not the


  p. 2171 (#1127)                      

1925)
2171
Discussion
guiding factor. Precious space is gained, not sacrificed, by this arrange-
ment. A real improvement, however, is to use a fewer number but larger
boilers.
16. Standardization is being improved. Better coordination
and cooperation among the bureaus fostered by Naval Operations and
Navy Yard Division can improve this.
17. Matters are quite well centralized in material bureaus.
22. This is condensed at navy yards and manufacturing
plants. Bureau division does not affect this at all.
24. Not objectionable.
25. This is hardly so to any very great extent. It is some-
thing that can be coordinated by Navy Department.
26. Navy yard work is now quite well coordinated; at
least, agencies to do so are provided.
27. This is not objectionable.
28. This is so. It can be remedied by better budgeting
and simplifying appropriations.
29-30. These are concurred in.
Page 1622. Modification of existing system. Officers who have had ex-
tensive material experience will hardly agree with this. Combining all
material matters under some definite head would be desirable, but who is
to do it? This is a nut to crack.
Page 1624. Accounting is already centralized.
The term "handling contracts" is obscure. Procurement of material
is handled by the material bureaus who draw up requirements and conduct
the inspection, and by the Bureau of Supplies and Accounts which actually
places the contracts and looks after financial requirements. This works
quite satisfactorily, particularly when the representatives of each of the
bureaus concerned understand their functions.
Why split up the Supply Department? It is working well as is. It is
not logical, economical, or desirable to subdivide procurement and storage
as suggested.
Page 1625. The accounting office is in the Bureau of Supplies and
Accounts. This is about as good a place as any other.
I fail to see where the budget office is to exercise real coordinating in-
fluences except indirectly.
5. Why split up Bureau of Supplies and Accounts?
6. This has something to recommend it.
7. This split-up is not particularly desirable.
Page 1626—8-12. This appears to introduce a rather top-heavy staff.
It is not particularly desirable to have a bureau of design separate from
production and maintenance and from inspection, testing, and so forth. It
looks as if the suggested organization, which apparently is to extend its
split-up to the navy yards, would be vastly more complicated than is our
present organization.
Page 1629. Remarks on specialization are concurred in.
Page 1630—33. Would not too large a number of schools and school
ships be required? This can be overdone.


  p. 2172 (#1128)                      

2172
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
34. Remarks on assignment of duty are generally con-
curred in.
Page 1631. Is it not a rather large order for the Navy to put over:
"Congress must be brought to see, and so forth?"
Congress often has ideas of its own and sometimes they are not entirely
wrong. Congress also must give consideration to money limitations.
It is believed that discussion of this article should bring out many val.
uable ideas and these discussions should redound to the good of the Navy.
The author is to be congratulated upon the vast amount of serious
thought and detail that has been presented in his article.
It is very unlikely that any novel and revolutionary scheme for the re-
organization of the Navy Department such as that proposed will ever be
adopted.
Any improvement in our present system is likely to be by development
and evolution, not by revolution. The improvements must come from
within. The leaven is working and will no doubt continue to work. The
improvement may appear to be slow and halting, but it is there. The prin-
cipal thing that can be done to help is that important positions be filled
by officers best fittted to perform the proper functions of each particular
office. The less number of square pegs in round holes, the better Navy
we will have.


  p. 2173 (#1129)                      

1925)
2173
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
The Bridge Across the Atlantic
Captain Yates Stirling, Jr., U. S. Navy, has requested the Secre-
tary to give publicity to the following:
In the article, “The Bridge Across the Atlantic" published in the Septem-
ber, 1925, INSTITUTE PROCEEDINGS the following paragraph appears:
In spite of the thoroughness of the German wreckers, the daring
adoption of the electrical welding introduced by Captain Jessop, U. S. N.,
reduced a two years' task to one of five months.
Since publishing this article I have been reliably informed that the inception
of the idea of applying electrical welding to the repairs of the ex-German
ships came from Commander A. B. Hoff, retired, U. S. N. This in no way
detracts from the credit due to Captain Jessop for his perseverance and
professional skill, together with his responsibility in adopting and carrying
out the plan.
The particular electrical welding process in question was devised by
Mr. D. H. Wilson, an electrical engineer on the Erie Railroad. It was first
advanced in 1915. It was tested by the Navy and approved. Commander
Hoff was instrumental in the first place in introducing Mr. Wilson to the
naval authorities and obtaining recognition of his process.
The day war was declared, April 6, 1917, Commander Hoff held a con-
sultation with Mr. Wilson who was then vice president of his own welding
company. Commander Hoff was at that time in the administration of the
Erie Railroad. Commander Hoff advised Mr. Wilson that his process could
repair the German ships. Commander Hoff explained to Mr. Wilson that
he would encounter strong opposition from the ship building interests who
would naturally wish to employ standard methods of ship yard repairs but
that by his welding method the time to complete the German ships would be
reduced so considerably as to force the government to use it. Commander
Hoff gave Mr. Wilson a letter to Captain Jessop. Captain Jessop was con-
vinced by his examinations into the project and through his recommenda-
tions the process was used. If this process had been a failure, naturally,
Captain Jessop would have had to shoulder the responsibility. As it was a
great success, naturally, Captain Jessop got the credit. However, Com-
mander Hoff was the originator of the idea to employ this method in the
repairs to the German ships in order to save time which meant both lives
and treasure to the United States, and for this brilliant conception and for
his work in bringing this electrical welding process to the notice of Captain
Jessop a part of the credit of electrical welding of the German ships should
go to Commander Hoff.


  p. 2174 (#1130)                      


H.M.S. "NELSON" TO BE COMPLETED IN 1927
This ship and her sister the Rodney will replace four of the older British battleships


  p. 2175 (#1131)                      

PROFESSIONAL NOTES
ARRANGED BY
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. W. UNDERWOOD
FROM SEPTEMBER 3 TO OCTOBER 3
2176
2176
GENERAL ARRANGEMENT
GREAT BRITAIN
The Imperial Navy ......
The Cruiser Program .....
The New Cruisers .......
New Treaty Battleships Nelson and Rodney
The New Battleships
Sir....
Warship Maintenance Costs ....,
Juggling With a Destroyer .
The Plight of the Shipbuilding Industry ..
2180
2183
2186
2188
2189
2190
FRANCE
French Navy Notes ..
..............
2102
2192
AVIATION
Airplane Replacements in the Early Part of War ......
Bombing Accuracy
Flying Ships ......
2196
2197
2200
ENGINEERING
Propulseur Trompe for Airplanes ........
The Whaley Constant Pressure Oil Engine .
The Metering of Fluids ....
......
.........
2202
2203
2205
MERCHANT MARINE
.....
Commissioner Haney and Admiral Palmer ..
2207
Water-Borne Commerce through U. S. Ports in 1924 ............ 2208
MISCELLANEOUS
Warships of the Future ....
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
2209
..........
221


  p. 2176 (#1132)                      

2176.
[Nov.
V. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
GREAT BRITAIN
The Imperial Navy
The Army, Navy and Air Force Gazette, 5 September, 1925.-Little
attention has been aroused by the completion of the first exchange of
cruisers between the Imperial and the Australian Navies, but the event
marks a great step forward in the achievement of a common understanding
for mutual defense of the empire. The Commonwealth cruiser Brisbane
has served for about five months with the China squadron of the Royal
Navy, and her place has been taken during that period by the Concord,
lent for the purpose from the Mediterranean. It happened that the China
squadron was called upon for a busy time while the Brisbane was attached
to it, so that her officers and men have had experience, during the disturb-
ance at Shanghai and elsewhere, of the sort of duty which often falls to the
British Navy in acting as the world's policemen in the interests of human-
ity generally.
The exchange of duties appears to have given complete satisfaction. It
naturally raised the question of the exact purposes for which Common-
wealth ships might be used while on loan to the imperial government, and
this has been settled between the Australian and the home authorities. In
cases where the admiral of a squadron to which a Commonwealth ship is
attached has authority to use, at his discretion, the vessels under his com-
mand without reference to the Admiralty, for the protection of the lives
and property of British subjects, the Commonwealth agrees that such dis-
cretion may be exercised in the case of an exchanged cruiser without refer-
ence to the Australian Government. In other cases, where it is necessary
to receive instructions from the Admiralty before action is taken, the ad-
miral must seek direct permission from the Australian Government before
he can use their vessels. An event which would make this necessary would
be rare, but when it did occur the admiral would merely have to ask for
instructions from two sources instead of one.
The interchange policy between the Imperial and Australian Navies is
to be continued, and much good should result from it. More officers and
men of the Royal Navy can thereby have the opportunity of service in
Australian waters, and on the other hand the Australian personnel get
more chances of seeing the world and of improving their professional
knowledge by working with larger squadrons than exist in their own sery-
ice. The next exchange, which begins about mid-November, will be
between the Brisbane and the Delhi, the former coming to the Mediter-
ranean and the latter taking over duty in Australia. While no other domin-
ion is yet in a position to exchange a cruiser-although New Zealand may
soon be, when she has her second ship, the Diomede-the idea would seem
to be capable of expansion. What is there, for instance, to prevent the
South African surveying ship Protea from taking a turn of duty else-
where, in place of the Iroquois in China, or the Ormonde in the West
Indies, while one of the latter takes her place at Simonstown? Then the
Canadian destroyers Patriot and Patrician have made cruises in the At-
lantic and Pacific in company with imperial vessels; if one of them came
further from home, to the North Sea or Mediterranean, a destroyer from
one of the flotillas there could replace her at Halifax or Esquimalt. New-
foundland, too, has a sloop employed on fishery duties, the Lobelia; she
would be a suitable craft to spend a few months with the North Sea fishing
fleets while the Godetia or a similar vessel replaced her on the Newfound-
land fisheries. But, the great thing is that the idea of one common naval
service for the empire, with local units maintained by the various nations,
is making such good progress.
The Cruiser Program
Engineering, 2 August, 1925.-A government can make out a case for
warship construction by publishing tables in which the programs of other


  p. 2177 (#1133)                      

1925]
2177
Professional Notes
powers are set out and explained; or, by showing that certain units will
be obsolete at certain dates and by making proposals for replacing them in
time; or, by describing the strategical duties which the fleet will have to
perform in war. It is rather surprising that the present Board of Admiralty
has persistently ignored the third method of argument, which, if properly
employed, invariably builds up the strongest case. They could quite easily
have related their very reasonable proposals for cruiser building to the
concrete problems of imperial defense without committing a single indis-
cretion or divulging a single secret; and, had they done so, they would
have raised the level of recent debates, and have stifled a great deal of very
irrelevant criticism.
Trade routes may be protected by one of two methods. First, covering
forces may be stationed, permanently, at those points on the ocean high-
ways where merchantmen are bound to congregate; elsewhere, the bulk of
the trading ships may be dispersed by orders issued at the ports of de-
parture by the consular officers, acting under Admiralty instructions.
Secondly, all merchantmen may be grouped into convoys which sail, under
armed escort, at regular intervals, from ports at which they are ordered to
congregate. The first of these two methods was adopted at the outbreak
of war and lasted until 1917, when the successes of the German sub-
marines compelled us to adopt the second, and to escort all out-going and
in-coming trade in the Atlantic.
Obviously, then, the case for cruiser and destroyer programs is little
more than an elaborated reply to a very simple question : do the forces
which we at present possess suffice to protect trade by cover and dispersion,
or by placing it under permanent escort in those oceans where a possible
opponent has a chance of attacking it?
Although the weapons and types of ships used for attacking and de-
fending trade vary with every decade, the war has none the less set up a
fairly reliable standard for calculating the forces necessary for ensuring the
safety of British sea borne commerce. In August, 1914, the British Ad-
miralty had to provide against an attack upon trade in all the oceans of the
world, for the German cruisers were able, and did actually operate in the
Atlantic, the Pacific, and the Indian Oceans. The distribution of the
cruiser forces necessary to meet the danger was as follows:
Number of
Cruisers in the
Area to be Covered Cruiser Force Allocated
British
Squadrons.
Western approaches to Eleventh cruiser squadron.
the British Islands.
Western approaches to Twelfth cruiser squadron.
the Channel.
Bay of Biscay to the Ninth cruiser squadron.
Azores.
North America and the Fourth cruiser squadron.
West Indies.
Canary Islands to north- Fifth cruiser squadron.
eastern Brazil.
River Plate
H.M.S. Glasgow
Total for the Atlantic
24
To this total must, however, be added the cruisers on the China station (4):
the Australian station (4); the East Indies station (2); and the Cape
station (3); so that our cruiser defense on the outer oceans consisted of
thirty-seven units. This, however, was by no means the whole force al-
lotted to the purpose. The Japanese reinforced our patrol of the Pacific
routes by cruiser squadrons which varied in number, but which were never
less than five units strong; and the French Admiralty assisted us in the


  p. 2178 (#1134)                      

2178
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
north Atlantic with ten cruisers. The whole Allied force employed was
thus well over fifty units.
It is quite obvious from this that, if the post-war problems of imperial
defense corresponded to those which confronted the country in 1914, we
should not possess a cruiser force sufficient to cover the vital points on
the ocean highways. At the present moment Great Britain has some fifty
cruisers on active service or in reserve. If, therefore, the Admiralty con-
templated defending trade in all oceans, every one of these vessels would
at once be required on the outer routes, and not a single unit would be
left with the feet in home waters and the Mediterranean. The conditions
are obviously changed, and the reason for the change is purely political.
Germany was able to attack trade in all oceans and to supplement her attack
by another in the approach routes to the British Islands, which none of our
possible opponents in the postwar world would be able to do. But, as at
least two of these powers would be in a position to develop an attack upon
British trade, which our cruiser fleet would have to thwart, an analysis of
the strategical implications of a naval war with some of these powers is
probably the best test which can be applied to the Admiralty's proposals,
and, indeed, to our whole naval position. The cordial and friendly relations
which exist between Great Britain and these three powers make it possible
to pursue the analysis without impropriety. Its object is purely arith-
metical: to establish a proper method of calculating the cruiser forces
necessary for defending the imperial trade routes, and the assumptions
upon which the calculation is erected have nothing to do with the actual
facts of international politics. In view, however, of the possibility of
partial and misleading quotation, it may be well to refer to the suppositi-
tious opponents respectively as transatlantic, European, and Asiatic powers.
The slight obscurity will not embarrass the reader.
War with a transatlantic power would inevitably mean that the Canadian
route would be closed, and that the West Indies would be overrun; and
these calamities would be followed by a violent struggle for the mastery of
the Plate trade route. The enemy bureau of operations would detach
every available cruiser to attack trade in the Rocas, Fernando Noronha
area; and, by bringing pressure to bear upon South American states, would
endeavor to establish operating bases as near the Plate as possible, and so
cut the trade from its point of departure. As local influence would make
it quite impossible for Great Britain to do as she did during the last war,
that is to establish a secret coaling and operating base in Brazilian territory
at the Abrolhos rocks, the British Admiralty would certainly be compelled
to answer an enemy attack upon the Plate route by escorting all merchant-
men from the Plate to the Canaries area, and then dispersing them. The
opponent's fleet, as at present constituted, would not be able to maintain a
sustained attack in the approach routes to the British Islands; and merchant
fleets when past the meridian of 20° W., would be outside the zone of
attack. In such a war, trade defense would, therefore, be a combination of
the two systems, which, as has been shown, are the essence of any pro-
tective plan, covering cruiser forces, and permanent escort. The forces
required for the purpose would, of course, vary with the forces allocated
to the attack, but they are none the less calculable, within a certain margin.
At the present moment the navy department of the transatlantic power has
allotted eleven cruisers in full commission to the scouting and battle fleets,
and four to the Gulf of Mexico. An approximately equal force of fourteen
cruisers has been left in reserve, and we may assume that about this num-
ber of ships would be available for an attack upon those British trade
routes which were left open to us. This, however, by no means implies
that fourteen ships would be incessantly attacking on the Plate route. If
one cruiser is to be kept continuously operating in a given area, a total
force of two or three has to be allocated to it, so that the enemy would
be lucky if they could maintain three attacking cruisers in the Fernando
Noronha zone, and three more off the Plate. On the other hand, our pro-


  p. 2179 (#1135)                      

1925)
2179
Professional Notes
tective forces could not possibly be less than twenty-five cruisers. At least
two ships would be required at Bathurst and Sierra Leone, to convoy the
trade from the River Plate and, although the waters east of the twentieth
meridian would be fairly immune from attack, some forces would neces-
sarily be allocated to the route between the Canaries and the western
channel. We therefore arrive at the result that, if Great Britain were at
war with the first of her three possible opponents, the Admiralty would
have to distribute half her available cruiser forces to the defense of trade.
If every other ocean were denuded, some twenty-five cruiser units would
be left for fleet work in home waters and the Mediterranean. If, on the
other hand, the political atmosphere compelled us to maintain some vessels
in oceans not immediately threatened, as may well be taken as probable in
the hypothetical event we are discussing, this narrow margin of tactical
safety would be very much reduced. The conclusion to be drawn is that
our present cruiser fleet just, but only just, meets the first of our require-
ments. If our building program were modeled on purely strategical
grounds, any government could make out an unanswerable case for a very
considerable increase.
The strategical implications of a war with a European power are less
easy to estimate, because such a power would be in a position to make a
double attack upon our trade routes. With sufficient cruisers, she could
operate in the Atlantic and the Indian Oceans, and with her light craft and
submarines she could make a sustained attack upon the approach routes to
the British Islands between Cape Clear and the northwest coast of Spain.
The attack in these three areas would, however, be of very different in-
tensity. Unless her navy were very much increased, the attack of the
possible opponent in the Indian Ocean could easily be met by a force of three
cruisers stationed at the Gulf of Aden, at Colombo, and at Singapore. The
attack in the Atlantic would, however. be very much more severe. If the
existing Mediterranean squadron and its attendant auxiliaries represent
the force which this power considers necessary for keeping the communi-
cations open in that sea, her Admiralty would have available for operations
in the Bay of Biscay and the Atlantic: (1) A squadron of three old battle-
ships, one cruiser and seventeen destroyers; (2) nine cruisers kept in re-
serve; and (3) a submarine fleet of some fifty units, of which twenty
would be continually at work. If, moreover, her Admiralty succeeded in
establishing a composite force of cruisers and submarines on the west
coast of Africa, and in keeping them supplied, their attack upon trade
would be continuous from the coast of Brazil to the approaches to the
Thames. The resulting situation would so closely resemble that which the
Germans set up in 1917 that we should doubtless be compelled to do what
we then did; that is, put all of our trade in the Atlantic under armed
escort. The forces necessary for this purpose are thirty cruisers for es-
corting oceanic trade; sixty to seventy destroyers for escorting the convoys
in the approach routes, and an enormous number of mosquito craft for
setting up an anti-submarine patrol in the inshore lanes, and escorting the
coastal traffic. In the summer of 1917 some three thousand yachts, drifters,
trawlers, motor boats, and submarine chasers were employed in this way
along the coasts of the British Islands. As the enemy submarines would
operate from bases which flank the main approach to the British Islands,
and as the smallest coast defense type of submarines could be used in the
Channel, such an attack upon commerce would certainly call for a similar
effort from the British auxiliary feet, and immobilize an equal number
of small craft along the traffic lanes.
Undoubtedly, Great Britain, with her fifty cruisers and her 189 destroy-
ers, could detach sufficient forces to take the necessary counter measures ;
and, undoubtedly, the maritime resources of the empire, from which the
auxiliary mosquito fleet is drawn, would suffice. But, when the deductions
for meeting a trade war were made, the Admiralty would be left with a
dangerously narrow margin of cruiser and destroyer strength for the


  p. 2180 (#1136)                      

2180
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Mediterranean, which would certainly be the theater of a prolonged and
bitter struggle; and the cruiser forces necessary for cutting off enemy over-
seas trade would be very difficult to find. Once again, therefore, this
analysis of possible contingencies leads to the same result: the British naval
forces, as at present constituted, are sufficient for national security; but
no more.
The cruiser and destroyer forces necessary for a war with an Asiatic
power cannot be calculated in the same way. In both the cases we have
considered the enemy would be able to maintain an attack upon British
trade in at least one ocean, and against an important complex of traffic
routes. Any Asiatic fleet is unable to do either, and in referring to an
Asiatic fleet the only possible reference can be to that of Japan. In these
circumstances, as we have already in these columns made some anaylsis of
the possible employment of the Japanese fleet, we trust that, without of-
fense, it may be allowable to abandon our fictitious obscurity and refer to
that power openly in what follows. The Japanese fleet cannot operate in
the Indian Ocean; and although some persons believe that the Tokyo Ad-
miralty might set up some kind of advanced operating base at Jaluit, it
is difficult to see what they would gain by it; as, if they did so, they would
carry their cruisers away from the trade which they desired to attack. The
probable consequences of a trade war between the two countries would be
that certain routes would automatically close down; and that each side
would endeavor to keep some others open by running convoys through the
danger zones. On the British side trade north of the Yangtze would cease,
and an effort would be made to maintain the Shanghai trade against inter-
ference from Sasebo, by placing it under escort from Hong Kong north-
ward. The Japanese would probably make a serious effort to keep open
their oil route to Dutch Borneo, against interference from a British advanced
base at Sandakan. Each side would, in fact, find its available cruiser and
destroyer forces absorbed in purely defensive operations. The conse-
quences of a serious offensive movement by either party have already been
dealt with in these columns. It has been shown that, if Great Britain
ever attempted to carry naval war into Japanese waters, she would require
tonnage on a scale which would mean economic ruin, unless it were
especially built for the purpose. It has also been shown that Japan has
not sufficient maritime resources to launch overseas expeditions against
the British dominions, and, at the same time, to provide herself with food,
oil, coal, iron, and machinery. It is therefore unnecessary to calculate
whether our present cruiser and destroyer forces suffice for carrying on
a form of warfare which economic laws would make impossible, the
question does not arise.
The New Cruisers
By Sir Herbert Russell, The Naval and Military Record, 19 August,
1925.-The decision of the Admiralty to build two distinct types of cruiser
under the program of five years' replacements is most probably an ex-
pedient imposed by the necessity for economy. I image there can be very
little question that had the board been unfettered by any other consideration
than that of the highest standard of tactical efficiency they would have
plumped for all Class A ships, which we know to be vessels of 10.000 tons,
armed with 8-inch guns, and probably good for 35 knots. In the alternative
they have elected to maintain numbers at the expense of uniformity of
fighting value. The general impression is that the Class B cruisers will be
vessels of about 7,500 tons, but exactly what detailed loss of sea-keeping
and combative qualities this reduction of displacement by 25 per cent will
entail must remain conjectural. I do not believe that this partial reversion
to the system of graded cruisers which existed until the cruiser was prac-
tically evolved out of existence by the battle cruiser is deliberate, but I do
believe that it can be adequately justified.


  p. 2181 (#1137)                      

1925]
2181
Professional Notes
Warship design stands as the material embodiment of current tactical
ideas. At the present day tactical ideas of naval warfare are probably sim-
pler and more concrete than they have ever been since the advent of steam.
The Great War is now sufficiently remote to permit of a clear, judicial
perspective. The strategical situation has been greatly simplified by the
fact that there are now only three sea powers in the first-class category
as against seven before the war. The proposition before the Admiralty
is that we are called upon to maintain a nominal equality with the United
States Navy and a 40 per cent superiority of strength over the Japa-
nese Navy. This is the simple meaning of the 5-5-3 formula agreed
upon at the Washington Conference. The other naval powers have volun-
tarily taken up a purely passive attitude; their rôle is reduced to one of
national defense only, as expressed by ensuring the security of territorial
waters. Therefore, we have no cause for active concern in the policy of the
other naval powers.
Our fleet is "wearing out" and needs replacement. We can only measure
the extent and character of this requisite replacement by reference to what
the other two first-class powers are doing. The question of "friendly re-
lations" has nothing to do with the Admiralty view. This is a political,
not a military, aspect. The Admiralty is only called upon to contemplate
two great fleets-in-being, and to keep pace with their progress so that the
5-5-3 ratio shall not become a meaningless formula. There is no implied
threat to anybody in the principle of "keeping fit.” A nation must keep
fit quite as much as an athlete if it hopes to maintain an authoritative voice
in the counsels of the world.
I think we may define the present tactical period as the cruiser era. There
is considerable diversity of opinion as to the precise value of the capital
ship: there is none regarding the cruiser. The emergence of the Pacific
zone into the strategic vision of naval thought gives a new aspect to our
traditional conception of war at sea. Heretofore, we have environed Euro-
pean waters as the decisive area, the Narrow Seas in the foreground, and the
Mediterranean as the ultimate limit. Fighting beyond this area we have
looked upon as episodical, and as likely to amount to only a small collective
factor in the final issue.
Now this is all changed, and the change brings us to the prospect of
ocean warfare in its widest sense. The tactics which always presuppose
a base within a day or two's steaming are rather in the melting pot, and
the type of warship essentially designed to materialize this conception is
rather in the melting pot with them. Tactics must necessarily be governed
by geographical ideas. Some day we may find ourselves back at the base
operations principle. For a great many years ahead, as far as it is
humanly possible to foresee, we are very much at sea. Therefore, we want
the type of warship which will best enable us to keep at sea.
All of the great sea powers are likewise great maritime powers in the
commercial sense. The one follows the other: a nation with no trade
interests worth speaking about at sea is not going to the expense of keeping
up a big navy. Let us take this as an elementary strategical thesis. A
country possessing a great sea borne trade can be struck most effectively
through that trade. Great Britain and Japan could be speedily reduced to
submission by an effectual blockade, assuming such a thing were possible
to establish. The United States is self-supporting, but the destruction of
her ocean commerce would be a blow under which, even with her colossal
wealth, she would stagger very heavily indeed.
Commerce destruction-or capture, which has the same result-figures
more prominently in the present-day scheme of naval warfare than ever
it did before. Unquestionably, this is due to the effect of the German
submarine campaign, which, in spite of our dominance of the sea's surface,
came perilously near to starving us into capitulation. The doctrine of de-
struction automatically imposes the obligation of protection, and in the case


  p. 2182 (#1138)                      

2182
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of commerce a similar type of vessel is suitable to both purposes. Hence,
this new rivalry in cruiser construction.
It is very unlikely that when the Washington Conference framed its
agreement it foresaw just where that agreement would lead. The real
purpose of the conference was to restrict naval armaments altogether. It
has only been successful in diverting the growth of them. Had there been
more foresight, I fancy the limits of cruiser displacement would have been
set lower; but probably this would have resulted merely in the construction
of larger numbers. Anyway, it is significant that Great Britain, France,
Italy, Japan, and the United States are building up to the fullest limits in
tons and guns, and, but for the Washington restrictions, this competition
must have resulted already in a growth which by now would have equalled
the biggest pre-war armored cruiser type.
The British Admiralty is being forced into reaction from this maximum
building. I say "forced” because it cannot be a matter of pure choice. A
big cruiser can do all that a small cruiser can do, and a great deal more: a
small cruiser cannot compete with size when it comes to gun power, sea-
keeping endurance, and (save at a serious relative sacrifice) speed. On
the score of fighting efficiency the Admiralty would have preferred that the
new program should consist wholly of Class A cruisers.
The conditions which produced such a wide variety of cruiser types be-
tween the passing of the Great Naval Defense Act in 1889, and the advent
of the three Invincibles in 1905, have been largely dissipated. As I have
said before, tactical ideas are now much simpler and more concrete. The
principle of using a sledge hammer for a butterfly is always to be avoided,
but we no longer admit that the best way to avoid it is to build a special
type of cruiser for every conceivable character of work. The system which
produced the first class, second class, and third class cruiser—with plenty
of variety in each class-was even more wasteful than the sledge hammer
threatened to be.
More than three fifths of our new cruisers (counting the five laid down
during last year) will be of the 10,000-ton type. It is always possible to
foresee tactical probabilities with sufficient certainty to provide for meeting
them in the sense of determining where the big ships and the lesser ships
may be disposed to best advantage. By keeping the Class B cruisers within
a more limited radius of action they should prove of just as much value,
under a similarity of conditions, as the bigger ships, always providing that
speed and gun calibers are maintained. They are not intended to fight any-
thing more formidable than their own types, and if they encounter anything
more formidable on the surface-they will have sufficient mobility to
deny action.
But, it seems to me that we shall pass through a long transition period
during which the British Navy will again possess three classes of cruiser.
We shall have the A class, in which may be included the Hawkins group;
the B class, in which may be included the Enterprise and the Emerald,
now completing, and the C class, comprising all of the light cruisers now
remaining on the effective list. History is repeating itself, not through
design, but through the exigencies of economy. As the light cruiser class
dies out it is difficult to believe that it will be repeated. Ships of 5,000
tons, with 6-inch guns, were perfectly adequate for service on the remote
foreign stations all the time that our main objectives remained in European
waters, but now that foreign 10,000-ton cruisers with 8-inch guns are ap-
pearing on those remote stations, they are clearly outclassed. The Blue
Water School has been revived by changed strategical conditions, and we
can no longer be satisfied to build with a view to maintaining the Admiralty
of the Atlantic-which really meant the boundary of the western approaches
and the grand junction of the middle sea.


  p. 2183 (#1139)                      

19251
Professional Notes
2183
New Treaty Battleships “Nelson” and “Rodney"
The British Interpretation of the Lessons of the Jutland Battle, by
Hector C. Bywater, The Scientific American, October, 1925.—Britain's
new battleships, Nelson and Rodney, are now approaching the launching
stage, and both will go afloat before the end of the year. Naval experts
the world over have long displayed a lively interest in these ships, due to
the rumored novelties of their design. They are known to incorporate all of
the modifications suggested by war experience, and especially by the Battle
of Jutland, so far as this has been possible within the limits of displacement
and gun power dictated by the Washington Naval Treaty.
Interest has been further excited by the reticence of the British Ad-
miralty, which, up to now, has declined to release any information about
the ships beyond their principal measurements. This policy of secrecy has
had an unfavorable reaction abroad. It has given a handle to publicists
and agitators who pander to anti-British sentiment, and these people have
contrived to generate a suspicion in the United States that Great Britain is
deliberately flouting the technical clauses of the treaty by endowing her
new battleships with unauthorized powers of offense.
A simpler and more convincing reason for the Admiralty's "hush"
policy might be advanced. It is conceivable that the British naval chiefs,
regarding as their exclusive property the hints on ship design which they
acquired during the war, are not disposed to share this invaluable knowledge
with other countries that did not pay the same price for it. Such an atti-
tude is natural enough, for the British Navy unquestionably bore the brunt
of the struggle at sea, and had far heavier losses than were suffered in the
aggregate by all of the other naval forces associated with it. Nor should
it be forgotten that the United States naval mission which visited Europe
after the war was allowed to inspect all of the latest ships, including the
then unfinished Hood. An American officer who made that tour of in-
spection has assured me that nothing whatsoever was withheld from the
cognizance of the visitors by the British naval authorities.
In the case of the new battleships a closer reticence has been observed ;
but while the fact may be open to criticism on political grounds, it certainly
does not justify the allegations of bad faith in regard to the treaty, which
have been made so freely by certain writers in the United States. It has
now become possible to furnish some information relating to the Nelson
design which, although not official, may be accepted as reliable. As will be
seen, these details completely refute charges preferred by American critics
to the effect that the ships are camouflaged aircraft carriers.
Dimensions of the Nelson and Rodney
Length overall
.........702 feet
Extreme breadth ........
........106 feet
Normal draft ..........
.............. 30 feet
Standard displacement ..
...........35,000 tons
Nine 16-inch guns in three 3-gun turrets
Armament
Twelve 6-inch guns in six 2-gun turrets
Numerous anti-aircraft pieces
Turrets, 13-inch
Belt, 12-inch
Armor (probable) .....
Heavy deck protection, particularly at
the forward group of 16 inch turrets
Speed (probable) ............
...........23 knots
Voted under the Navy Estimates for the fiscal year 1922-23, both ships
were laid down on December 28, 1922—the Nelson by Armstrong, Whit-
worth and Company, at Newcastle-on-Tyne, the Rodney by Cammell Laird
and Company, at Birkenhead. Industrial troubles have delayed their com-
pletion, and, if launched in the coming fall, they will have been on the


  p. 2184 (#1140)                      

2184
[Nov.
U. S. Vuval Institute Proceedings
stocks the better part of three years. They are scheduled for delivery some
time in 1927.
Their leading dimensions are: length 702 feet over all, extreme breadth
106 feet, normal draught 30 feet, standard displacement 35,000 tons. This
last figure refers to the weight of the ship as complete in every respect, but
without fuel or reserve feed water on board. When these items are added,
the gross displacement will be nearer 40,000 tons. The form of hull
resembles that of H.M.S. Hood, with the same clipper stem, a cut-away
stern, and sides falling inward to minimize the chance of direct hits.
Unlike the Hood, however, bulge protection is not fitted as an external
element, but is incorporated as an integral part of the ship's structure.
From the dimensions given, which are official, it is clear that the Nelsons
have not been designed for very high speeds. What they can do in the
way of speed is still confidential, but it will be surprising if they prove to
be much swifter than the 22-knot Royal Sovereigns. In other words, they
are battleships pure and simple, with no pretensions to the high mobility
of battle cruisers.
Their main armament has been a more or less open secret for some con-
siderable time past. It consists of nine 16-inch guns, each weighing about
106 tons, and probaly akin in ballistic properties to the American piece
mounted in the Marylands. Following the omne ignotum pro magnifico
rule, some foreign publications credit the British 16-in. gun with a length
of 50 calibers, but this is almost certainly incorrect. Very long guns do not
seem popular in the British service, which has only once employed a
50-caliber gun of large bore: namely, the 12-in. Mark XII mounted in the
St. Vincent and Neptune ships, and then with qualified success.
The nine 16-in. guns of the Nelson are carried in triple turrets, so that
Great Britain, after many years of hesitation, at last falls into line with the
United States and Italy, the pioneers in this type of gun mounting. It is,
of course, a compromise ; for, regarded as a unit a gun mounted singly
is more efficient than as one of a pair, and for rapid fire a two-gun turret
is equal to one of three guns.
Ammunition supply and loading operations are complicated by the three
gun mount, while the deflection set up by the firing of the outer guns has to
be corrected by a very delicate and not always infallible system of synchro-
nized discharge. The subject, however, is too large to be explored further
on this occasion. Suffice it to say that when the pros and cons are nicely
balanced, the three-gun turret tips the scales by reason (1) of its economy
in weight, and (2) its adaptation to other tactical requirements, which will
be dealt with later.
The triple turret is no novelty, save in the British service, but the really
striking feature of the Nelson class is the disposal of the turrets them-
selves. Contrary to all precedent, the guns are grouped together in the
forward part of the ship, leaving the after section denuded of heavy
armament. The first and third turrets are on a level, the second being raised
on a high barbette. This enables six 16-in. guns to fire directly ahead, leay-
ing the other three guns to join in as soon as the target bears a few points
on either beam. Over a fairly wide arc on either broadside all nine guns
have an unrestricted field of fire. But, if an enemy ship were astern, or bear-
ing several points abaft the beam, it could not be brought under fire
from the big guns. From the tactical viewpoint this is unsatisfactory, if
only because guns should not be mounted on the assumption that the target
will always be in a given position and never stray into one of the "blind
spots" or neutral zones outside the field of fire.
When Beatty made his famous 16-point turn at Jutland, racing ahead of
the German battle cruisers to lure them and their oncoming battle fleet
into the arms of Jellicoe, his big guns could not have fired a shot had they
been disposed on the principle adopted in the Nelson class. With this object
lesson before them, it seems odd that the Admiralty experts should have
decided to sacrifice stern fire altogether.


  p. 2185 (#1141)                      

1925]
2185
Professional Notes
That they did so was in deference to another and perhaps still more
important lesson learned at Jutland: that the really vulnerable points of a
capital ship are its turrets, barbette trunks, and contiguous magazines. At
least two out of the three British capital ships lost in that engagement were
sunk by shells that pierced the turret walls or roof and transmitted a flash
to the powder rooms. In the case of the third ship, the Indefatigable,
there is reason to suppose that projectiles, striking just below the upper
deck level, penetrated one of the barbette trunks and so gained access to a
magazine.
Other ships that came within an ace of destruction through turret hits
were the British Lion and the German Derfflinger and Seydlitz. It would
seem, therefore, that the most vulnerable part of a capital ship is no
longer the waterline but the gun positions. The effect of hits betwixt wind
and water may be localized by subdivision; but if a shell penetrates to a
magazine, or even transmits a tongue of flame that far, the whole ship is
placed in deadly peril.
It was in order to avert this calamity that the grouping of the main
armament on the forward deck was decided upon for the Nelson class,
since it makes possible the concentration of very thick armor on the turrets
and barbettes themselves, as well as on the waterline and topsides in way
of the gun positions, and the fitting of stout protective decks over this par-
ticular area of the ship.
Although the actual strength of the vertical and horizontal armor to be
fitted is not disclosed, these ships will probably be the most heavily-plated
vessels afloat. This feature alone serves to indicate how wide is the gulf
that divides current British practice in capital ship design from the principles
enunciated by Lord Fisher, who had little use for armor and pinned his
faith to big guns plus speed-a combination that failed to make good in
the fiery test of Jutland. Admiral von Tirpitz's dictum, “The first require-
ment of a fighting ship is that it shall remain afloat under fire," evinced a
shrewder appreciation of actualities.
The fact that the Nelsons are to mount the largest battery of 16-in. guns
hitherto placed in one ship, and are to have their vitals shielded by massive
armor plate, disposes of yet another fiction entertained by some naval
critics: that is, that the ships in question are to be virtually bare of armor
in order that they shall have the speed of battle cruisers. As a secondary
battery each has twelve 6-in. rapid-fire guns in twin turrets, stationed on the
broadside amidships. The housing of these guns in closed turrets is a
tribute to the murderous efficacy of high-explosive shell, the blast and
splinters from which took a heavy toll of men behind open gun shields in
every naval action of the World War. There were occasions on which a
few salvos of medium-caliber shell were enough to silence every gun not
mounted in a closed turret. Additional to the guns enumerated, the ships
will have a large equipment of anti-aircraft pieces.
Since the placing of all the main turrets on the foredeck pre-empts room
that is usually occupied by machinery, the propelling plant has perforce had
to be shifted further toward the stern. The boilers are, therefore, aft of
the midship line, and the single funnel into which all the uptakes lead is
situated aba ft the mainmast. This gives the type a very singular appearance,
further accentuated by the huge conning-towers and bridges, and still more
so by the substitution of a veritable skyscraper of steel for the customary
tripod foremast. Yet another grotesque touch is imparted by the "gallows"
mainmast, built up with four legs, three of which are topped by director
towers for the secondary armament.
The thrusting back of all this tophamper has done away with the spacious
quarterdeck found in dreadnoughts of more conventional design. It looks,
indeed, as though the deck space in the after part of the ship will be ex-
tremely limited, and it would be manifestly difficult to provide a landing
platform for airplanes. This fact is a sufficient commentary on the rumor
that each ship is to carry sixty or eighty airplanes.


  p. 2186 (#1142)                      

2186
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Considering the U.S.S. Saratoga-a ship in which practically the whole
of the top deck, measuring some 880 feet by 104 feet, is left free for avia-
tion purposes—is equipped to carry and operate only seventy aircraft, it
would be interesting to learn where the Nelson could stow an equal number
of machines, to say nothing of the provision of landing facilities for the
same. Although positive information on this point cannot be quoted, it
seems more than likely that the Nelson's contingent of aircraft will be
restricted to a few light machines of the type already carried by British
and American battleships for reconnaissance and gun-spotting.
Such, then, are the two mystery ships about to be added to the British
fleet, in exchange for a quartet of older dreadnoughts earmarked for the
scrap heap. Comparing the Nelson type with the U.S.S. Colorado, it will
be found that there is little to choose between them with regard to artillery
power. The Nelson's extra gun is not likely to give her an advantage in
volume of fire, for the reason that the triple mounting, however ingeniously
planned, does not conduce to ultra-rapid working of the guns; and I be-
lieve that the umpire in a war game would not allow nine guns in triple
turrets a larger aggregate of rounds within a given period that eight
similar guns twin-mounted.
So far as ahead fire is concerned, the Nelson has a 50 per cent margin
over the American ship. In broadside discharge they may be rated as
equal, for the reason given; while in stern fire the Colorado would have
everything her own way. As for speed, the Nelson is probably superior by
a couple of knots. Failing publication of armor figures for the British
ship, no comparison of protective attributes is feasible. It may, however,
be taken as reasonably certain that the Nelson is less vulnerable at certain
vital points, such as turrets, magazines and boilers, though her average
thickness of armor may be somewhat less than that of the Colorado whose
protection is unusually heavy.
On the whole, the Nelson may be a better all-round fighting ship to the
extent of her additional few thousand tons, but her tactical supremacy over
the Colorado is by no means pronounced. Her design constitutes a some-
what radical departure from accepted canons of naval design, and it re-
mains to be seen whether it will come up to expectation.
The New Battleships
The Engineer, 28 August, 1925.—The construction of the battleships
Nelson and Rodney, which were laid down simultaneously in December,
1922, has proceeded at a leisurely pace, owing in part to motives of economy
and in part to industrial disputes. As regards economy, it will probably
be found in the end that the slow rate of building has tended to inflate the
initial cost of the ships, as it has done in the case of certain cruisers left
over from the war program. For example, the Effingham, which has been
eight years in the builders' hands, will have cost £2,175,000 by the time
she is ready for sea, while the Hawkins, a ship of identical design, which
was built more rapidly, cost only £1,636,745. Even the comparatively small
cruisers, Emerald and Enterprise, which have been in hand for seven years,
will average £1,575,000 apiece. The individual cost of the new battleships
is officially returned as "about £6,000,000," but it will be a pleasant sur-
prise if this estimate is not exceeded. In any case, it is uncertain whether
the figure in question includes armament. If not, the total bill for each
ship will be largely increased. According to naval reference books, the
Queen Elizabeths averaged £2,336,750 each, but, in fact, the cost was con-
siderably greater. A Parliamentary answer on May 4, 1921, gave
£2.473,103 as the expenditure on the hull, machinery, and equipment of
H.M.S. Queen Elizabeth, with an additional £541,000 on her armament,
bringing the total outlay on this ship to £3,014,103. As her sister ships
were completed during the war period, when labor and material charges had


  p. 2187 (#1143)                      

1925)
2187
Professional Notes
reached a high level, the average cost of the class must certainly have been
nearer £3,500,000. On the whole, it will be safer to regard the official
estimate of £6,000,000 apiece for the Nelson and Rodney as a purely
nominal figure, which may bear only an approximate relationship to the
actual expenditure.
The launching of the Nelson, which is to take place on September 3—
that of the Rodney will not be effected till January next-will be an event
of more than casual interest, for it is nine years since the last battleship,
Ramillies, went afloat in this country, and seven years since the last capital
ship, Hood, was launched for the British Navy. It is already clear that
the virtual suspension of heavy warship construction has not been an
unmixed blessing. Unemployment, with all of its attendant evils, is now
rife in districts to which the steady flow of Admiralty contracts used to
bring work and prosperity. If, on the one hand, vast sums have been
saved by the naval "holiday," on the other hand sums equally vast have
been paid out in relieving the workless victims of this international experi-
ment, to say nothing of the losses incurred through the depreciation of
idle plant. In view of the circumstance that this country, to a far greater
extent than any other, has specialized in the construction of warships and
naval armaments, both for the home and foreign governments, it follows
that the economic effects of naval disarmament have been felt here far
more severely than elsewhere, though the fact does not appear to be gener-
ally appreciated. That the building of even two battleships has done some-
thing to relieve unemployment is self-evident. In this connection some
official statistics may be quoted. The industries that have mainly benefited
are the shipyards and allied concerns, engineering establishments, ammuni-
tion factories, steel works, mines, railways, and shipping. During the first
three months after the placing of contracts four to five thousand men were
employed. In the first six months an average of 13,000 men was engaged,
rising in the second six months to 29,000, and subsequently for a time to
40,000. The average employed during the whole period of construction has
been about 21,000. By the time the ships are finished about £10,000,000
will have been paid out in wages. This money is circulating in Sheffield,
Manchester, Barrow, and Glasgow, as well as in the districts where the
ships are being built and where the government ordnance factories are
situated. It is anticipated that details of the type will be released for publi-
cation as soon as the first battleship goes afloat. Hitherto, these particulars
have been jealously guarded, though the official embargo has not prevented
the leakage of information into the press. The first description of the ships
appeared in the Italian semiofficial review, Revista Marittima, two years
ago, and the data there presented were subsequently laid before a Com-
mittee of the American Congress by Captain Hough, chief of the United
States Naval Intelligence Office. As they correspond very closely to fore-
casts which since have been published in this country, there is good war-
rant for accepting them as substantially accurate. This notwithstanding,
we propose to defer any detailed examination of the design until such time
as the Admiralty sees fit to lift the veil. Where so much mystery has been
observed, we may reasonably hope for something in the way of novelty.
Public attention has hitherto been attracted by the unique disposition of the
main armament, which is reputed to consist of nine 16-in. guns in three
turrets grouped on the center line in the forward part of the ship. This
is the arrangement which is understood to have been approved for the
four super-Hood battle cruisers, which were ordered in 1921 and cancelled
shortly after the Washington Conference. It has the advantage of permit-
ting the concentration of thick armor on the gun positions, which, as
Jutland experience showed, are the most vulnerable parts of a capital ship,
and at the same time it tends to simplify the lay-out of boilers and machinery.
The only drawback is the loss of stern fire; but while that would be a very
serious defect in ships planned for independent action, it is of less moment


  p. 2188 (#1144)                      

2188
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
in battleships designed to serve as units of a fleet which is able, collectively,
to train a large number of heavy guns on a target bearing astern. If the
new ships can fire six 16-in. guns ahead and nine on the beam, their tactical
value will be very high. While there has been much speculation at home
and abroad as to their offensive qualities, little has been heard about less
obvious features of the design. It would be of great interest to know, for
example, whether the ships are to be driven by steam alone, or whether the
possibilities of the Diesel system as a prime mover in large men-of-war
have been turned to account. It is already known that oil engines are in-
stalled in the mine laying cruiser Adventure for propelling her at cruising
speeds. The adoption of such engines for auxiliary propulsion in the new
battleships would not come as a surprise to those who are aware of the
practical interest which the Admiralty has displayed in Diesel development
for a number of years past. When the design of the Hood was under con-
sideration, as far back as 1916, it was proposed to fit two sets of eight-
cylinder Diesel engines, each of 4,500 horsepower, running at 185 revolu-
tions per minute, on the wing shafts, with three sets of turbines on the
center shaft. This proposal was subsequently abandoned, but the fact of its
having been made at that early date is very significant.
The strategic conditions prevailing before the war were such as to
exalt the importance of high speed. As the North Sea was then the pro-
spective battleground, it was obvious that an enemy in inferior strength,
operating from bases near at hand, could not be brought to action unless
our ships were faster by several knots. Today, however, the North Sea
requirements no longer affect the design of our ships. Any future war in
which the empire may be involved is likely to be an oceanic war, and the
ships capable of rendering the most efficient service will be those with the
greatest radius of action. The advantages of the internal combustion
engine in this connection are too well known to need emphasis. While it
is still inferior to the steam turbine in output of power per unit of weight,
and is therefore not yet suitable for adoption as the main propelling plant in
ships of high speed, the oil engine is sufficiently developed to justify its
use for auxiliary drive in large vessels, as has been done in H.M.S. Ad-
venture. To apply the system to 35,000-ton battleships would be a bolder
experiment, but there is no reason why it should prove unsuccessful. In the
projected light battle cruisers of 17,500 tons and 35 knots, which the French
Ministry of Marine is now considering, oil engines are provided for cruis-
ing speed and geared turbines for full power, and it is claimed that the
ships would have a radius of 12,000 miles at economical speed. British
firms are perfectly able to construct oil engines of the power required to
propel large battleships at the moderate velocities which are normally
maintained in peace time. But, in the case of the Nelson and Rodney, which
conform to the tonnage limit imposed by the treaty, the factor of weight
has necessarily dominated the whole design, and it may therefore have
proved impracticable to utilize the oil engine as an auxiliary means of pro-
pulsion in these particular vessels. This is but one of the many intriguing
points which will, no doubt, be cleared up when the naval authorities, in
their own good time, decide to tell the public something about its new
battleships.
Warship Maintenance Costs
The Army, Navy and Air Force Gazette, 22 August, 1925.—The Parlia-
mentary Secretary to the Admiralty states that the cost of a battleship
of the latest type, inclusive of torpedoes, ammunition, and so forth, is ap-
proximately £7,000,000. Of this, about £3,200,000 is due to labor, and
£2,100,000 to material, the remainder being due to profit and to estab-
lishment charges, such as rent, rates, light, power, maintenance, and so
forth. The cost of a battle cruiser similar to H.M.S. Hood would be about
£6,000,000, of which approximately £2,700,000 is due to labour, and


  p. 2189 (#1145)                      

1925]
2189
Professional Notes
£1,800,000 due to material. The corresponding figures for a modern light
cruiser are £2,000,000, £900,000 and £600,000; for a modern destroyer
£325,000, £145,000, £98,000; and for a modern submarine £400,000,
£180,000, £120,000. Particulars of the approximate annual cost of main-
tenance of each type are given in the following table :
Approximate annual cost of maintenance in full commission in home waters
at present prices.
Battle
Sub-
Battleship Cruiser Cruiser Dästroy'r marine
O
Nelson* Hood
Kent* Amason* Class*
195,000
180,200
109,900
17,500
13,200
Full pay, marriage and other al-
lowances, National Health In-
surance, and Unemployment
Insurance
........
Victualling, Clothing and mess
gear
.
.......
......................
Medical stores, etc. .............
Miscellaneous effective services..
Fuel and lubricating oils.
Sea stores .......
Repairs
Armament stores ......... .....
55,500
650
7,700
22,600
16,000
40,000
42,570
52,700
000
7,360
48,300
16,000
45,000
25,140
34,100
350
4,700
15,900
7,000
19,000
16,600
5,300
60
750
8,400
1,800
5,000
2,690
2,300
30
320
3,000
1,000
15,000
1,100
Total direct charges..
380,020
375,300
207,550 41,500
35,950
Liability in respect of retired
pay and pensions ..........
Grand total ..........
* Under construction.
52,940
432,960
51,970
427,270
31,300 5,200
238.850 46,700
2,080
38,030
Juggling with a Destroyer
Remarkable Salvage Work at Scapa, The Naval and Military Record,
16 September, 1925.—The end of the first phase of the salvage operations
at Scapa Flow was completed when the V -78 was finally beached on the
shore of Mill Bay. The vessel, the first of the smaller 800-ton type of the
ex-German destroyers scuttled in Scapa Flow, presented a most formidable
task when her turn came for salvage by Messrs. Cox and Danks, Ltd., of
168 Regent Street, London.
She had the unique experience of being hauled halfway to the surface
out of a bank of sand, towed in a rope cradle like a submarine about four
miles, sunk again in deep water, turned completely over on the sea bed,
raised again, and placed on the beach practically high and dry. This re-
markable feat was necessary owing to the vessel having "turned turtle" at
the time of sinking, and taking what the Germans thought was a final rest-
ing place, her keel uppermost, and bridge, funnels, and upperworks squashed,
and buried in about five fathoms of water on the north coast of the Island
of Fara, one of the Orkneys. During the years that she has been lying
there, a siltation occurred around the ship, resulting in about eight feet of
gravel and sand forming what might be likened to a chrysalis.
The floating docks were moored over the destroyer's position and divers,
by the use of powerful 12-in. pumps, had to "blow" channels through the
sand in order to allow passage for the 9-in. wire hawsers under the deck of
the ship. This was a formidable task, and in the process one part of the
destroyer had to be sealed and pumped with compressed air in order to give


  p. 2190 (#1146)                      

2190
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
a little buoyancy. The divers were finally successful, and the ship was then
fast in a cradle of wire ropes, and was hauled up out of her bed. Tugs
took charge of the dock with its captive destroyer hanging below, and pro-
ceeded to tow it steadily through Gutter Sound, which is now clear of all
the wrecks which have till recently encumbered this narrow strip of water.
In the greater depth of Mill Bay the destroyer was dropped once again to
the bottom in about twelve fathoms of water. The sinking was necessary
in order to give sufficient depth of water to turn the vessel over, and this
was done by skilful maneuvering in hauling up by one dock and paying out
by the other, the friction of the ropes on the one side of the ship resulting
in the complete turning over of the ship in its rope cradle. Once in its
upright position, the destroyer was hauled to the surface and beached in
very shallow water almost high and dry in Mill Bay, whence it will be
patched up and floated round to the firm's adjacent depot at Lyness for
breaking up.
The whole operation was carried out within thirteen days, the docks hay-
ing taken up their position over the wreck on August 26, and the destroyer
being raised on September 7. During seven days no work was possible,
owing to gales which swept the locality with hurricane force, and, of
course, special precautions were necessary to keep the floating docks secure.
The second phase of the operations will commence within the next few
days, when the first of the seven remaining destroyers of a tonnage of
1,300 tons each will be commenced, and these it is planned will be dealt
with in precisely the same way as the smaller eighteen destroyers now
salved.
The Plight of the Shipbuilding Industry
The Engineer, 21 August, 1925.-Evidence accumulates week by week that
the position of the home shipbuilding industry is such as to give grave cause
for anxiety to all engaged in it, whether on the employer or the labor
side. It is true that, judged by the test of output, the position disclosed in
the statistics issued by Lloyd's Register is not unsatisfactory, for the ton-
nage put into the water during the June quarter of the present year was
nearly 300,000 tons and it was 340,000 tons during the first quarter. Fur-
thermore, .Clyde yards during some periods of the present year have been
setting up new records of launchings, but the real tests of the position of
the shipbuilding industry are the quantity of work at present in hand and
that commenced during the period covered by the statistics. When those
tests are applied it is at once apparent that a period of intense depression
and an almost unprecedented percentage of unemployment lie immediately
ahead of the shipbuilding industry. The tonnage under construction at the
end of June, and the position in this respect is rather worse today, had
declined as compared with the corresponding period of 1924 by 423,000
tons, and if the comparison be carried back to the immediate pre-war
period, by more than 796,000 tons. The amount of tonnage commenced
during the June quarter, and since, has been an almost insignificant quantity,
Against the British figures foreign shipbuilders were able to record at the
end of June not only an increase in the tonnage launched, but an improve-
ment in the tonnage commenced and in that under construction. The
British industry has not only lost the old predominance of building more
tonnage than all the rest of the world's shipyards, but has been compelled
by the pressure of foreign competition to surrender a large amount of
building for foreign owners which in earlier years was a regular feature
of the activities of home yards. It has had even, in a few instances, to
admit inability to retain the custom of important British ship-owning in-
terests. Unless these tendencies can be arrested they spell disaster to the
home shipbuilding industry.
To some extent, no doubt, the falling off in the quantity of work in hand
is due to the marked decline in warship building and to the depression


  p. 2191 (#1147)                      

1925]
2191
Professional Notes
W
in the shipping industry, which has caused owners to defer the carrying out
of a large replacement program which would otherwise have been overdue.
These are not, however, the only reasons why the tide of unemployment in
home shipyards has risen to the average figure of 33 per cent, which is far
higher than during the slump period of 1908. On the northeast coast un-
employment in shipbuilding has soared to the appalling figure of 45.6 per
cent, and it is 35 per cent in Scotland. An important contributory cause of the
high percentage of unemployment in shipbuilding is that costs of pro-
duction are not only well above the prices which in the present condition
of the shipping industry owners feel justified in paying for new tonnage,
but they compare very unfavorably with the corresponding costs in con-
tinental shipbuilding establishments. Many explanations have been put
forward for the disparity between shipbuilding costs in home and foreign
yards. Continental builders pay less for materials, the percentage of skilled
to semi-skilled and unskilled labor employed is lower than in British ship-
yards, trade union rules and regulations have been relaxed, in some cases
a longer working week is in operation, and in certain instances it would
appear that financial aid is being given. Nobody suggests that there is
on the purely technical side either in respect of organization and equipment
or the skill of the workers anything really wrong with British shipbuilding.
Yet in spite of the publication of details of recent tenders of home and
foreign builders for new tonnage which show that the margin between
British and continental shipbuilding costs is being narrowed, it is still true
that foreign tenders are well below bare actual costs in British yards. Un-
til this position is redressed it seems quite unlikely that any real revival
in the home shipbuilding industry can be brought about.
Those engaged in the industry are not blind to the dangers of the situ-
ation. It is now some three months since, on the invitation of the Ship-
building Employers' Federation, the labor unions associated with the in-
dustry agreed to form a joint committee with employers to investigate con-
ditions in the industry to search for the precise causes why production
costs in home yards were so high in comparison with those which obtain
abroad, and to find remedies for a condition of affairs which threatens to
bring a great industry to its knees. This committee has, it is understood,
now completed that part of its inquiry which had reference to matters
relating specially to the British shipbuilding industry which need reform
and revision. The conferences have quite properly been held in private
with the object of promoting a full and frank discussion of the questions
at issue, and the bare official reports which have from time to time been
issued have stated no more than that satisfactory progress was being made
with the important work in hand. It is known, however, that while em-
ployers in the shipbuilding industry-adopting a different policy from engi-
neering employers—gave a guarantee when inviting the formation of the
committee that no proposals for reduction in rates of wages or lengthening
of the working week would be made by employers, the labor representatives
have been asked to give consideration to important changes in working
conditions, to a revision of trade union rules, and to a removal of the many
restrictions and anomalies which now exist. Employers believe, and it is
probable that many trade union leaders and workers share the belief, that
changes in working conditions could be made, which, without inflicting any
loss or hardship on a single worker, would have a material effect in reducing
the labor charges in the sum of construction costs. It is understood that,
to aid the discussions which have taken place on these points, employers
have laid their cards on the conference table and have disclosed the financial
results of work executed during a recent period, and that the facts have
come as a surprise to the representatives of the labor unions. The next
move is with the latter. They will, it is assumed, take steps to confer with
the union executives and afterwards decide at a general meeting of trade
unions on the lines of policy to be adopted regarding reforms, internal
to the industry, which can be carried out without reference to other inter-


  p. 2192 (#1148)                      

2192
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ests. This would be the first step in the restoration of British shipbuilding
to its old position of unassailable superiority. Wider issues are, however,
involved. It is frankly admitted that production costs in home yards can-
not be reduced to competitive level unless the crushing burden of national
and local taxation is lightened, and the many industries on which ship-
builders draw for supplies of materials and fittings are willing to accept
lower prices for their products. That is an aspect of the problem which
should occupy the next stage of the investigation by the joint committee.
The work will open up very wide issues and is closely bound up with the
important subject of the relativity of wage rates. It is a question which
affects not only shipbuilding, but most branches of engineering and many
other trades. It calls for prompt and resolute handling, but politicians ap-
pear to lack the courage to deal with it, and the man who will undertake
this essential task is not yet in sight. If the joint committee of shipbuilding
employers and labor unions could evolve a method of bringing wage rates in
different industries back to the old relativity they would be performing a
national service.
FRANCE
French Navy Notes
The Naval and Military Record, 2 September, 1925.–Of the thirty-odd
new ships due to join the fleet in the coming autumn and winter, the mine
laying submarines Callot and Chailley and the 1,500-ton submersibles of the
Requin type are giving great satisfaction; the destroyer Tigre, of 2,400 tons,
is having slight defects to her Rateau turbines dealt with at Lorient after
highly promising trials. The Breguet-turbined Leopard is ready at St. Na-
zaire, and it will be a stiff fight between the two French types of tur-
bines. Parsons turbines will have a chance next month with the 8,000-ton
Duguay-Trouin, now ready for sea. Never before did France make so
determined a bid for speed, and excitement and expectations are great in
the service.
In the human element, in its discipline, devotion to duty, and valor, re-
sides mainly the efficiency of fleets. The French Navy is only second to
the British in traditions and historical achievements; it can claim, too, to
have “for a thousand years braved the battle and the breeze," and its
Breton seamen, trained from childhood to sea pursuits in the rough waters
of the Bay of Biscay, fear no comparison. Undaunted corsaries in their
hundreds have risen from the granite rocks of Brittany, fighting “on their
own" at times when the Paris government, having its hands full on land,
could not afford to attend to sea requirements. A question observers may
now well ask is: "Are such exceptional assets wasting, decaying?" On
the morrow of the Great War an unprecedentedly shameful scandal took
place in the Black Sea. There were on board battleships a hundred mu-
tineers, whose patriotism and judgment were too weak to be proof against
the Bolshevist propaganda ; an engineer officer even was stopped just in
time when he was on the point of delivering to the enemy the destroyer
Protet. The British fleet was exposed to similar propaganda, but manfully
withstood the shock; no British heart Ainched in its devotion to King and
country.
In the series of unedifying courts-martial on board the cuirassés France,
Paris, Provence, and so forth, that were the concluding chapter to the
Black Sea rebellion, it was pointed out that the mutineers were no bona fide
seamen, but young men from great industrial centers, more or less tainted
with anarchism, and who had hurriedly enlisted in the fleet with a view to
escaping the hardships and dangers of French warfare on the western
front. In the enquète that took place the Breton député de Kergue zec,
Rapporteur du Budget de la Marine, then stated that the Marine Française
contained, through this wholesale incorporation of undesirable landlubbers,
a high proportion of recruits wholly "refractory" to naval discipline, and
that the most urgent reform was promptly to rid the fleet of that odious


  p. 2193 (#1149)                      

1925]
2193
Professional Notes
rabble. As a matter of fact, this was done under the Leygues, Landry,
and Guist'hau Ministries.
“Never again !" it was said; the lesson will never be forgotten. Better
do away altogether with the Vieille Marine Française and forego all naval
ambitions than invest so much in an instrument de combat that would prove
untrustworthy when wanted. Only bona fide seamen, men having the voca-
tion de la mer, must be allowed to enlist in the navy, that must remain a
service d'elite, with room only for the best. These were noble ambitions,
praiseworthy intentions, which every officier de vaisseau worth his salt
fervently repeated to himself in setting his teeth; but, alas, politics, that
pervade everything in that belle Republique of ours, stand in the way of any
durable reform and progress, and, for a part, reduce to nil the patriotic
endeavors of our splendid corps, of officers de marine, who are getting
deeply disgusted at the turn of things and at the utter powerlessness of the
feeble politicians in power to save the vital interest of their country by
energetically coping with the cynical Bolshevist propaganda that is rife
in the ports militaires, arsenals, and in the fleet itself.
There has been an attempt at mutiny in the Courbet, and a court-martial
has just settled the affair in condemning to years of imprisonment four
Bolshevist ringleaders who attempted to foment a rebellion with a view to
preventing the meeting of the Toulon feet with the "fascist" fleet of Mus-
solinian Italy at Naples. Bad food and not enough furlough were the pre-
texts put forward by those mauvais matelots. A similar court-martial is
next month to take place in the battleship Paris, to be presided over by
Captain Lacombe, of the Lorraine battleship. Disquieting acts of insub-
ordination of a like nature took place in several other ships, and it looks as
if every French ship had on board a cellule communist, and as if there was
on foot a cleverly engineered plot to paralyze the offensive action of the
French fleet.
Officiers de vaisseau no longer conceal their misgivings. An officer of
the flagship Michelet (a twenty-two-year-old croiseur cuirassé, roomy and
well armed) writes thus to the Paris Yacht: "Il y a beaucoup de novices
dans l'équipage et aussi quelques mauvaises tétes qú on aurait mieux fait
de laisser en France. J'ai entendu des murmures, des gens se plaignant ....
une main ferme sera nécessaire . ... Si nous voulons éviter ce qui s'est
passé à bord du Jules Ferry' où il y a eu des difficultés. . ...” (“There
are plenty of improvised seamen on board and a few bad heads it would
have been more prudent to leave behind. I heard murmurs and com-
plaints about poor food and too much work. .... A firm hand will be
necessary .... if ugly incidents like those on board the Ferry are to be
avoided.. ...") In reading between the lines the true feelings of that
patriotic officer can be gauged. The situation is unprecedented in the serv-
ice; it speaks for itself. Not that on the whole the French Navy is not
a loyal, trustworthy, and thoroughly efficient force, certain in case of need
to do honor to the glorious tricolor. Things are not quite so bad as they
look; but all the same a small minority may cause plenty of trouble and
in an underhand manner interfere with the efficiency of the finest unit. On
the eve of her departure from Toulon the old Michelet, with her over-
hauled and refitted engines, did 20.5 knots with ease. In the Red Sea she
developed engine troubles, and took ten days to crawl from Guarda fui to
Colombo, and, still more limping, crawled into Saigon, the three engines
showing strong disinclination for their work, the central one stopping
altogether.
A firm hand in the command of ships and in the management of crews
can do little if there is not also a firm hand at the head of affairs at the
Paris Admiralty. Discipline cannot rest on sentiment, on good intentions ;
it cannot be improvized; it is easily lost, but takes long to recuperate; it is
the very life of the fleet, and nothing ought to be allowed to interfere with
it. These vital truths, unfortunately, our ever changing, improvized marine
ministers totally ignore. Naval officers in the exacting fulfilment of their


  p. 2194 (#1150)                      

2194
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
professional duties punish, and politicians forgive, oblivious of the judicious
saying of the illustrious founder of the Marine Française, Colbert, to his
son, Marquis Seignelay: "Rappels-vous toujours que l'indulgence dans les
matiéres contraires à la discipline n'est pas une qualité." ("Leniency in
matters contrary to discipline is not a quality.") But, for our fine body of
officers, under-officers, and petty officers, the sentimental comedy in the
management might degenerate into tragedy. On the rock of patriotism, not
on the shifty sands of eloquence, are strong navies founded. Such is the
crux of the matter, as French, as well as English, history will testify.
The original views expressed by Admiral Sims in his somewhat sensa-
tional book La Victorie sur mer (Payot, editor, Paris) continue to give
rise to interesting controversies in the service. The eminent American
officer, naturally enough, writes pour la plus grande gloire de la Marine
Américaine, and so enthusiastic is his plea that he may be pronounced to
have deserved well of his great country and also of all naval students, who
will ever treasure his book as being the sincere expression of a faithful ally
and born leader. In this latter respect his remarkable pages in favor of
Admiral Lewis Baily speak for themselves. He speaks in high terms of
the strategic value of Brest, le port d'Europe le mieux situé, but, unwittingly,
also he somewhat minimizes the part played in the great sea struggle by the
French Navy. Contrary to his contention, the "depth charge" was a
French idea; and not an American admiral but a French one (de Marliave)
was the first non-English admiral in direct command of a British force.
French Navy Notes
The Naval and Military Record, 16 September, 1925.—The Duguay-
Trouin at Brest has her full armament on board, and is completing her
equipment and conditioning for her preliminary sea trials. Her two 8,000-
ton sisterships are shipping their turrets and 6.1-in. guns, that look small
considering the immense length (175 meters) of those cruisers. The 2,400-
ton Tigre and Jaguar (Rateau turbines) and Léopard (Breguet turbines)
receive this month their full complement, and next month will see all three
at sea. A slight change in the internal design will anew delay for weeks
the twelve torpilleurs of 1,500 tons. Of the seven 1,500-ton submarines of
the 1925 program two have been ordered in Lorient, two in Brest, and
three are expected to be ordered of private firms for delivery in the sum-
mer, 1928.
The important artillery and ammunition in the hands of the Riffs shows
the need for a close effective blockade. Like Spain, France is gradually
reinforcing her blockading division under the Paris with 500- and 350-ton
canonnières, well armed and splendid for that kind of work.
The amazing series of aerial disasters of the last few weeks has created
among the French public an outcry against aerial pursuits: "Plus de
dirigeables, plus d'hydravions! How much safer is the dear plancher des
vaches!” The American Shenandoah disaster, repeating that of the French
Dixmude, has similar effects: it causes a new French dirigible program to
be postponed sine die, and puts a stop to the dirigible activity that had for
some time past been resumed in the French aerial stations, that count be-
sides the 25,000 cubic-meter Mediterranée (ex-Nordstern), 10,000 cubic-
meter escorteurs and 3,000 cubic-meter vedettes. Cool headed aerial ex-
perts, however, are waiting for the squall of impulsive and incompetent
criticisms to pass and preserve their faith in dirigible gasbags, not wasting
time in deploring accidents, but devoting their mental power to avoiding
them in future. The loss of the Dirmude, though that fine airship was
caught in a storm and struck by lightning, was not unavoidable; it would
have been saved to France if an air port had been prepared in Algeria, as
recommended by Commander du Plessis. Moreover, means exist, and
they are now the object of interesting experiments-of safeguarding air-
ships against lightning. In the case of the Shenandoah, lack of experience


  p. 2195 (#1151)                      

1925]
2195
Professional Notes
with helium appears to be the direct cause of the disaster, as contended by
German experts.
But, where those German specialists exaggerate is when they impudently
assert that all dirigible catastrophies within the last few years are traceable
to the stupidity of English, French, and American aeronauts, and that they
would have been avoided if the lost airships had been built and steered by
worthy sons of Deutschland über alles. In other terms, in the dirigible
line there is no salvation out of German hands! Everywhere the word
"dirigible" is pronounced, a Teuton must compulsorily be consulted, and
things remain at a standstill until his lips let fall: "Es ist erreicht!" the
fateful words which German coiffeurs used to pronounce with becoming
dignity when dressing mustachios Kaiser-fashion. Germany is a great land,
but there is no room there for the sense of ridicule and of proportion, ob-
viously; otherwise, Germans would remember those eight Zeppelins that
once started baby-killing over the open cities of England and were dis-
persed and smashed by storm, five of them coming to grief in the Rhone
valley; nor would they forget that the grand Count Zeppelin, from cavalry
officer, became dirigible constructor at the School of Colonel Renard and
of Dupuy de Lôme. In the submarine line, too, France did pioneer work,
and showed the way to the world, and in particular to Germany; yet when
accidents (and they are unavoidable) saddened the hearts of our neighbors
and rivals, the idea never came to our ingénieurs to choose that very mo-
ment to crow over their superiority in uncontrollable fits of exultation re-
sembling Schadenfreude.
The lamentable loss of the Shenandoah does not seem to have dis-
heartened American experts, now intent on ascertaining the causes of the
disaster; and the undaunted Colonel du Plessis de Grenedan, the father of
the Dixmude hero, seizes the opportunity of stating anew before the French
public the case for dirigibles in war and in peace.
In his valuable report on the 1925 Navy Estimates the eminent Senator
Cheron emphatically condemns gasbags as being too costly and vulnerable
for the problematic use they represent, and he quotes figures from the
American Army and Navy Register, that reduce the number of German
dirigibles used in the war to ninety-six, of which twenty-nine were lost
through accidents and thirty-six through enemy action. In reality, states
Colonel du Plessis, Germany constructed no fewer than 143 dirigibles, of
which twenty-two were Skülte-Lanz, and 121 Zeppelins, and a close study
of their war utilization shows that they were the means several times of
saving the German fleet from disaster. The Germans, who know best what
they were worth to them, stick to the type, and project the construction of
several giant Zeppelins. For long range aerial scouting and transportation,
as well as for convoy protection and submarine hunting, dirigibles are in-
valuable, and cannot be replaced by seaplanes that, besides, costing five times
more than dirigibles, do relatively to the weight they carry.
Lighter-than-air machines have come to stay; their present defects can
be remedied and their security increased. No great navy can afford to
leave to others, still less to Germans, whose national industry is war and
plunder, the monopoly of dirigible progress. France, the home of the
spheric and dirigible balloons, can least afford to lag behind. Hence, the
decision of the Paris Admiralty to forsake nothing of existing assets in
this direction.
French aviation is silently forging ahead, though not without losses,
these being the unavoidable ransom of progress. Training, though not
quite so intense as in the British and Italian Navies, is proceeding apace
on up-to-date lines in all ports militares, a moderate toll of minor accidents
marking every week's aerial practice, especially as flying in all weathers is
part of the training program. A standard type of hydravian, robust in con-
struction, simple in management, makes up the bulk of our escadrilles
aeriennes, being on a par with the excellent army Brequet, that combines
speed, carrying power, and handiness. Very heavy bombardment machines


  p. 2196 (#1152)                      

2196
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of various types, all with good points, are ceaselessly being tried and im-
proved. The largest of these to have successfully gone through the hard
Admiralty tests is the Latham, 1,600 h.p. quadrimotor biplane, that has a
span of 110 feet, a length of 67 feet, a full load weight of eleven tons
(with over three tons of fuel and ammunition). There is room for a
crew of five. The speed exceeds 160 kilometers per hour, and twenty-one
minutes are necessary for the machine to reach 6,600 feet. It compares
well with the Short and Fairey, dreadnoughts of the air. The value of the
new Latham giant resides in the fact that it is the result of the gradual
development of the Latham type, the oldest French seaplane, and of careful
experiments both at sea and on land. The wings are light at the ends and
raised with a view to facilitating floating on heavy seas. When on the
water the central part of the wings is six feet above the waterline, and the
extremities of the wings nine feet. The hull is twelve feet wide, with an
angular shape, favoring handiness and quick rising. All great French yards
are manufacturing hydravions. Huge monoplanes, with spans of 130 feet,
will shortly be tested at St. Nazaire. Views differ as to the compared suit-
ability of biplanes and monoplanes for sea service. Biplanes offer more
handiness and robustness, but thick-winged monoplanes, very wide in the
center and narrowing to the wing ends, have many partizans. The recent
St. Raphael tests with improved naval biplanes, despite the mishaps that
happened, demonstrate to careful observers that naval aviation has become
an important factor in the war game; strategy and tactics cannot afford to
ignore it, and maneuvers without it are out of date.
AVIATION
Airplane Replacements in the Early Part of War
Aviation (Editorial), 7 September, 1925.—There are times during a lull
in controversies and advocacies when certain points become clearer and
partisanship animosities lose their warping influence. This confession is
not the result of summer heat or contrition of spirit but comes from a
realization that perhaps the actual power of aircraft in warfare is being
overestimated by its best friends. And this overstating of the case for
aviation it will be seen may have nothing to do with the inherent possibilities
of aerial fighting at all. It is exclusively concerned with the material and
personnel problem. Here there seems to be a blank wall that is almost
insurmountable. To boldly ask a very pertinent question: "Will the next
war be fought in the air ?"
If any one wants to do some very disconcerting figuring let him take the
number of combatant aircraft that will probably be available at the start of
any war and then apply the estimated figure of about 75 per cent a month
destruction or to put it more correctly, replacement need, and he will come
upon a condition that should be given much more thought in aviation dis-
cussions than has been the case in the past. The public has been pretty
well informed that the life of an airplane in peace times is three years.
But, less has been said about the tremendous difference in time of war.
With naval vessels, the great sea engagements are few and very far between,
but with aircraft, zero hour is the beginning of a depletion at the staggering
rate of almost complete annihilation every two months. If a country should
start a war with 1000 fighting airplanes of exceptional war value and struck
with the full force that we hear so much about in military and naval dis-
cussions, it is generally conceded, particularly abroad, that at the end of
the first month there would only be about 250 of the 1000 available for
the second month's air combat.
When it is remembered that it takes at least two or three months for even
a well equipped airplane factory to begin to produce replacement aircraft in
quantities, not to mention the time to make engines the difficulty becomes
apparent. Meanwhile, the land and sea forces would have to be relied on,
it may as well be granted. But, when it is further admitted that these


  p. 2197 (#1153)                      

1925]
2197
Professional Notes
forces will be blind without air services the dilemma becomes more acute.
In fact, we are discussing what may be considered one of the skeletons in
every nation's aviation closet. Of course everyone will immediately urge
that there be kept in stock a reserve stock of airplanes sufficiently large to
keep our air forces in the air until replacements can be made, but when
it is remembered that the United States will have spent since the war a
half a billion dollars and not secured an adequate air equipment, the financial
element becomes a problem of the greatest importance. When it is further
remembered that only about 5 per cent of the men in any air force are
needed for actual flying duty, the personnel problem enters. It may be
unpleasant to face these difficulties but it is better to have them discussed
before a disastrous experience than to wait and have the facts develop from
neglect.
The purpose of bringing this serious question up for consideration at this
time is a belief that some solution to the problem can be found if the
importance of the matter is discussed frankly and not avoided. To inform
the public of the possibilities of air warfare and not emphasize the replace-
ment need is a dangerous procedure. Unfortunately, the production of
aircraft during the war has rightly or wrongly left a bad impression with
the taxpayers. We hear of little being done by the War Department to
gather into its inner circles aircraft experts, as is being done in nearly all
other industries. The development of our air power is being left to those
who have fought its battles against the greatest odds, and have only succeeded
in making the older arms realize that if they do not adopt aircraft it will
supplant their special interests. In fact, it sometimes seems that the older
services recognize the disadvantageous position that aircraft will be in
shortly after the beginning of hostilities and are counting on this fact to
discount the claims of the so-called air enthusiasts.
It would seem to be a good policy for those who are trying to arouse
a greater interest in things aeronautical to stress, during the coming aircraft
discussions, the following facts: That air forces require replacements of
materiel and personnel more quickly than any other known form of war
activities; that a country that is without replacements will find its other
forces operating blindly; that replacements cannot come out of stock but
take several months to be made; that it is cheaper to make provision to have
a continuous air action than to wait and try to provide the equipment in
the feverish heat of war enthusiasm. All of which is cast on the waters
with the hope that it may receive the earnest consideration that it deserves.
-L. D. G.
Bombing Accuracy
By Major B. W. Simpson, Ordnance Department, U. S. A., Aviation,
28 September, 1925.—In Aviation for July 20, 1925, there was published a
letter from Norbert Carolin entitled “Bombing Facts,” in which Captain
Carolin makes the statement that “Any bombing team that cannot register
80 per cent hits on such an objective (a battleship) from 9,000 ft. should
be returned to school for further training." This statement was emphasized
by heavy type and was considered of sufficient importance to warrant special
editorial comment.
While it is possible, of course, to obtain as high as 80 per cent hits on a
battleship target such a performance would be remarkable to say the least
and would be beyond the realm of probability. The excellence of training
of a bombing team is more reasonably measured by its probability of hitting
the target. This has been in actual tests considerably below the eighty per
cent figure mentioned above for the altitude considered.
First, let us consider just what area constitutes a battleship target.
Various tests conducted since the World War have proven that such a
target may be damaged not only by a direct hit on the structure of the
ship but also by a hit in the water alongside the ship, the distance within


  p. 2198 (#1154)                      

2198
(Xov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
which such a hit would be effective depending upon the weight of explosive
in the bomb. This broadens out the target considerably and it is assumed
that Captain Carolin is speaking of this broader target when he speaks of
80 per cent hits. This larger target for the largest type of bomb now
standard will be considered in the following discussion.
In measuring the accuracy of gun fire or bombing the “probable error
of the fire is used. The probable error may be defined as the distance
from the center of impact or center of gravity of a group of shots within
which half of the group will probably be found. In other words, any
individual shot or bomb has a 50 per cent probability of being within the
probable error and an equal chance of being without the probable error. In
the ballistics of guns it is usual to determine the probable error in range
and the probable error in deflection and use these two errors to find the
probability of hitting the target. The same method may be employed with
bombing but as the errors in range and deflection in bombing are essentially
equal it is somewhat more convenient to use the "circular” probable error by
means of which the percentage of bombs that will probably hit within a
circle of a given diameter may be determined.
The probable error of bombing has been determined from various tests
and is found to vary with the degree of training of the bombing team, the
type of equipment used and the weather conditions under which the bombing
was conducted. For instance, the probable error of night bombing in one
test was found to be approximately twice as great as that for day bombing,
although with proper illumination of the target night bombing can probably
be conducted with almost as great a degree of accuracy as day bombing.
Likewise, the probable error of an experienced team with the best equip-
ment now available may vary considerably at times from the average
probable error.
E. J. Loring, an authority on bomb ballistics, has discussed the subject
at considerable length and after analyzing a large mass of data has proposed
the following empirical formula for the probable error of bombing :
3 V Altitude (in feet)
Probable error (in feet) —-
- in which K is a factor
te
..
...
or depending upon the degree of training of the bombing team or "figure of
merit" of the team. Loring would rate teams according to the following
table:
K
Ultimate
.........2.5
Remarkable
........2.0 or more
Excellent ......................................1.5 to 2.0
Good .............
................ 1.25 to 1.5
Average ....
............1.0 to 1.25
Knowing the probable error it may easily be determined by calculation
what percentage of hits may be expected on a given target. Loring finds
the following percentage of hits may be expected on a battleship target from
an altitude of 9000 ft.
Direct Hits and
K Rating of team Direct Hits Hits in Danger Zone
Per cent
Per cent
1.0 Average
II
1.5 Excellent
20
39
2.0 Remarkable
28
The results actually obtained in service day bombing correspond to those
obtained by teams that would be rated as average with an occasional per-
formance that would be called excellent. We have had no remarkable or
ultimate bombing so far.
23
53


  p. 2199 (#1155)                      

1925)
2199
Professional Notes
In one series of tests the board of officers conducting the tests determined
that the probability of getting a hit on a battleship of the California class
was 32 per cent from 9,000 ft. altitude but in arriving at this result the
board converted the area of the target to an equivalent square and de-
termined the probability of hitting the square. Loring takes the actual shape
of the target, approximately an ellipse and shows that the probability of
hitting is nearer 23 per cent. In one of the battleship bombing tests two
direct hits and four hits in the danger area, a total of six hits, were made
on a battleship from a height of 10,000 ft., 25 per cent hits somewhat
better than average results. This is considered very good bombing, though
Captain Carolin would send all these teams back for further training. By
all means let them have further training, the more of it the better, but do
not let us delude ourselves that further training can raise the percentage
of hits to anything like 80 per cent.
Oo oo oo
ALTITUDE kam
SCALE
What causes the bomber to miss the target? A number of things are
responsible, some of them within the control of the bomber and others he
cannot control at all. His bomb sight places the pilot on the proper course,
measures his ground speed and corrects for it and indicates the instant for
release of the bomb. Other instruments give him his altitude and air speed
which are used in setting his sight. The bomber is responsible for aligning
the pilot on the proper course, correctly setting the air speed of the plane
and terminal velocity of the bomb, and the altitude of the plane on the sight,
correctly measuring the ground speed, and releasing the bomb at the proper
instant. The pilot must fly at the proper altitude selected for bombing,
obey the signals of the bomber for direction and keep his plane on as level
a keel as possible.
Correct setting of the scales of the sight may be assumed; errors in
altitude, air speed and ground speed determination, direction of the course,


  p. 2200 (#1156)                      

2200
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
level of the plane, and release of the bomb are inevitable. The bomb itself
has an appreciable probable error even if dropped under identical conditions.
Some of the errors beyond the control of the bomber and their effects at
9,000 ft. are as follows:
1. The bomb has a probable error of about 45 ft.
2. The altimeter has a probable error of over 200 ft., which corresponds
to a range error of 40 ft. This error also affects the accuracy of
ground speed determination.
3. The air speed can be determined only within an error of 5 m.p.h.
This error does not have an appreciable effect on range.
4. The effect of wind is only approximately corrected for by the sight.
A 10 m.p.h. wind will move the bomb about 20 ft.
If we add to these errors the errors of the bomber and the pilot we can
see why 25 per cent hits from 9,000 ft. is not such a bad score. To claim
80 per cent hits is ridiculous and unnecessary and would only lead to
erroneous estimates as to the number of bombers and bombs required to
accomplish a given mission.
Flying Ships
By Sir Herbert Russell, The Naval and Military Record, 2 September,
1925.–At a time when the long-discussed claims of economy appear to be
taking very practical shape, it is opportune to repeat the questions: What
is being spent upon airships? What is it further definitely proposed to
spend upon airships? What is the value of airships? The last point is the
one that really matters, and, indeed, in the answer to it the economic
question may be automatically disposed of.
Harking back over the brief history of aviation we shall find marked
phases in the conflict of opinion regarding the airship. The steady progress
made by Count Zeppelin, in the days when the military preparations of
Germany were realized to hold a sinister significance for this country,
naturally suggested a policy of response. For reasons which it would serve
no useful purpose to review, British efforts in this direction were not
successful. After the fiasco of the May Fly it was understood that no
further airship construction would be undertaken, the heavier-than-air
machines being regarded as best suited to the requirements of the fighting
services. The result was that when war came the airship did not figure
amongst our weapons.
The history of the Zeppelin fleet during the Great War is well known.
It is the history of a very few successful operations, all of negligible
military value, and of such general disaster that after the catastrophic
adventure in 1917, in which seven Zeppelins of the gale-swept raid were
destroyed, the Germans finally withdrew these great, costly, and fatally
vulnerable aircraft from service. It may be true to say that they had
carried bombing attacks further than would have been possible to aeroplanes
in their then stage of development. But, to put it in homely phrase, “The
game was not worth the candle." Is it going to be worth the candle now?
In some respects we have set war fashions to the world. In others we
have shown ourselves curiously imitative. I venture to believe the only
explanation that can be given as to why we are again plunging into heavy
outlay upon airships is because the United States has "taken them up."
But, the United States has a definite strategical idea in view, right or
wrong, and I am unaware of any such incentive in our case. The United
States thinks that aerial communication with her remote Pacific bases might
prove of first-rate importance in war time. Distances are too great for
such communication to be attempted by airplanes—at present. An airship
is capable of covering the 3,300 miles between Honolulu and Guam, but an
airplane, no.


  p. 2201 (#1157)                      

1925)
2201
Professional Notes
So, as I say, right or wrong, America is building airships, prepared to
discount the self-evident risk of employing them in view of the fact that
there is no other type of flying machine that she could so employ. At any
rate, it is a practical policy. What is our policy? Can anybody tell me?
There is a lot of talk about "empire airways," linking up the red patches on
the world map, and such like. But what have these Kipling-like heroics got
to do with a military administration which I take the Air Ministry to be?
Nobody will deny the wisdom of the principle under which the Air
Ministry fosters private aviation in peace time with a view to building up
a great reserve in the event of war. There is definite military purpose here.
But when we come to costly national undertakings to demonstrate the com-
mercial possibilities of the airship we are clearly going beyond any such
justification. For the military value of the airship has been subjected to
the most thorough test conceivable, and is proven to be virtually negligible.
Even as a purely commercial proposition the airship is quite prohibitive.
Her primary cost, her maintenance, her navigation, and her very limited
weight-carrying capacity put her beyond the pale of any consideration save,
perhaps, as a millionaire's freak. Admitted that she is able to carry a very
few tons a few thousand miles. The first thing the commercial consideration
demands to know is "How much will it cost?" The answer leaves com-
mercial consideration too flabbergasted to bang the door as it goes out.
Moreover, commercial consideration, when unrelated to military reason,
is quite apart from the province of a fighting organization, even when that
organization is concerned to bolster up its challenged utility. This brings
me back to the question: What is the value of the airship? About the
only practical suggestion I have come across in this direction is that she
might prove of service in the role of an aeronautic aircraft-carrier. That
is to say, she might carry a limited number of baby planes upon her
structure and launch them at a spot where they might hope to do effective
work. The idea is feasible, but the obvious objections immediately crowd
in upon it. Such a purpose necessitates penetration of a hostile zone, and
then promptly arises the question of the colossal target. Probably the baby
planes would have their hands much too full in trying to protect their
gigantic mother to attempt anything else.
But even this presupposes that the airship is able to fulfil her mission as a
plane carrier—which I venture to think is presupposing rather a lot. A
gale of wind may well deliver her into the enemy's hands; a thunderstorm
may repeat the sublime spectacular horror of Cuffley. No structure de-
signed for human transport is—and must always remain-more at the
mercy of the elements than the airship. Any increase in motive power
means an enormous ratio of increase in dimensions; consequently a larger
area for the wind to lash and a bigger mark for the lightning to find. As
a scientific struggle it is all very interesting like the efforts to climb
Everest or to reach the North Pole. As a military proposition is it, or
can it ever be, worth while? A fleet dirigible suggests a valuable medium
for reconnaissance. I say "suggests," because it could only be valuable if
it were the sole means of accomplishing the purpose. But the navy, realiz-
ing more fully the atmospheric conditions at sea, prefers to pin its faith
to the aircraft carrier and her swift little brood, which can travel with
the speed of a train into the teeth of a gale that would send an airship
bodily to leeward. The Navy does not want to be bothered with the great
airship. It does not believe in the great airship. The army will have noth-
ing to do with it. Who wants it?
This question is not only legitimate; it is distinctly pressing at a time
when the Admiralty are saving money on wages, victualling, and marriage
allowance in order to pay for new warships, which we really do want.
A new nose is being fitted to R-33, and she is shortly to undertake further
aerodynamic tests, with a view to providing data required in connection
with the construction of the new 5,000,000 cubic feet ships. I should have
thought that her last exploit provided data enough. But what is the par-


  p. 2202 (#1158)                      

2202
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ticular purpose for which these enormous airships are being built at all?
The disabilities of the type are quite as obvious to the Ministry of Air
as they are to anybody else who gives any intelligent attention to the
subject-indeed, it is reasonable to suppose that they should be rather
more so.
What, then, is the policy they represent? Are they designed as links
of commerce, to popularize the ministry in the eyes of imperialists? Or
are they really intended at war weapons? If so, what is their contem-
plated rôle? This is not a time for highbrow talk about "contrary to the
public interest" by way of answering a question which it is distinctly in the
public interest should be asked. The public interest demands a justification
for all heavy expenditure of public money these times. Aerodynamics
may be a very interesting scientific study, but are we to spend some millions
on pursuing it to the length of finally demonstrating the unsuitability of the
airship to offensive or defensive warfare? One might have thought that
point was settled by the May Fly fiasco, and clinched by the fate of the
Zeppelins during the war. We are never going to overcome the defect of a
wrong principle by experimenting with methods. The mobile balloon is a
wrong principle. Her margin of risk must always remain so high as to
confer the quality of the forlorn hope upon any military enterprise for
which she may be detailed. Beyond the one advantage of a capacity for
longer fight, how is she superior to the aeroplane? Her buoyancy declines
rapidly as she ascends. Five million cubic feet of hydrogen could lift about
170 tons at the earth's surface; at 12,000 feet of altitude it could barely
sustain 100 tons. In war time rapid ascent to the maximum possible alti-
tude may often prove vital to the salvation of such a huge target. There-
fore, "disposable weight" must be reckoned with a view to permitting of
such rapid ascent.
The aerial liner is a possibility of the future. The military airship has
already been very effectively tested and found wanting. Is the Air Ministry
simply spending public money in order to experiment in a highly specula-
tive commercial proposition? Suppose the Admiralty were to begin build-
ing ocean-going steam trawlers in order to encourage British fisheries.
It is not difficult to anticipate the verdict of the country upon such a
procedure. Of course, I do not say that the Air Ministry is doing any-
thing of the kind. I am merely asking. I want to know-like a great
many other people—why these enormous, costly, airships are being built
at all? And I should like to know what each one costs in her own struc-
ture, in aerodromes and mooring masts, in gas reservoirs, and in ground
hands to manipulate her?
ENGINEERING
“Propulseur Trompe" for Airplanes
The Engineer, 18 September, 1925.-In our issue of January 16. 1920,
reference was made to a new apparatus invented by M. H. F. Mélot for
propelling airplanes with the pressure produced by exhaust gases directed
in such a way as to create the rapid displacement of a large volume of air.
Briefly stated, paraffin was burned in a combustion chamber lined with
fire bricks, and the gases issuing from a tuyère passed through a number
of funnel shaped conduits or injectors, each one increasing in size and con-
sequently augmenting the volume of induced air until, on leaving the ap-
paratus, the volume and velocity were sufficient to create a high propulsive
effort. The original device was somewhat crude and cumbersome, neces-
sitating as it did a combustion chamber with oil burner and a large air
compressor, but it served to demonstrate that it was possible by this system
to suppress the engine and propeller and to replace petrol by crude oil
as fuel. The injectors or trompes having been proved a satisfactory ex-
pedient, it was found necessary to simplify and lighten the general arrange-
ment, and after nearly five years' experimental work M. Mélot has succeeded


  p. 2203 (#1159)                      

1925]
2203
Professional Notes
in evolving a much more practical power generating plant which suppresses
the fire brick lined combustion chamber and necessitates only a small and
light compressor for occasional working.
The new device consists of a horizontal cylinder, inside which there
are two walls forming a chamber. In each wall is a sparking plug for
starting the engine with gas injected under pressure. There are three
series of annular ports, the central orifices placing the carburetter into
communication with the chamber, and the end ports being in communica-
tion with an exhaust pipe converging to the first cone of the propulseur.
Inside the cylinder is a piston which moves freely from one end to the
other. It has concave faces and sleeves with ports corresponding with
those in the cylinder. The arrangement constitutes a simple type of two-
cycle engine working with high compression. It is started by injecting
under pressure the gas mixture, which is ignited by one of the sparking
plugs. The speed of the piston is sufficient to compress the gas to the
point of auto-ignition and the engine continues to run without the com-
pressor and the sparking plugs. The piston sleeves are arranged to open
the exhaust ports at such a point as to ensure the burnt gases entering
the exhaust pipe at the highest velocity. The average pressure in the ex-
haust pipe is equal to the average pressure of the cycle. As, moreover, the
ndo
-
-
-
TIIT PUTIN
IMPROVED FORM OF THE MELOT PROPULSEUR TROMPE
explosion takes place under the most favorable conditions, with a com-
pression to the point of auto-ignition, it is claimed that the average
pressure is higher than in an ordinary four-cycle engine.
The rest of the apparatus has undergone little change. The exhaust gases
pass from a tuyère through a succession of four injectors, each being larger
than the preceding one and therefore drawing through a larger volume of
air, which becomes considerable when the burnt gases and air pass finally
through the large fourth injector. The reaction exerted by this mass of
gas and air is declared to give to the apparatus a satisfactorily high effi-
ciency. To provide for the diminishing density of the air at high altitudes
it is proposed to employ a light compressor. Tests carried out with the
apparatus are said to have shown that the total weight is less than 1 kilo.
per horsepower. So far only laboratory tests have been carried out with the
Mélot Propulseur Trompe, and we are precluded from giving a fuller
description of the apparatus pending the completion of tests which are now
being undertaken by the Service Technique de l'Aéronautique.
The Whaley Constant Pressure Qil Engine
The Nautical Gazette, 29 August, 1925.—The Sun Shipbuilding and Dry
Dock Company of Chester, Pennsylvania, has completed the building of the
new Whaley oil engine, which was invented by Wililam B. Smith Whaley


  p. 2204 (#1160)                      

2204
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and designed by Charles A. Muller of the Whaley Engine Patents, Inc.
This engine was privately shown to stockholders and interested engineers,
at which time it was operated on air only for the shop tests.
Ninth of a series built during the past several years for the purpose
of perfecting a new power cycle, this Whaley engine is described as a
single-acting four-cylinder two-cycle machine designed to develop 750 h.p.
It is a vertical reversing engine, conventional in design though following the
best steam engine practice. It is distinguished from all other heavy oil
engines in this country and abroad by the fact that the cylinder clearance,
at the time of the fuel injection, is opened by a piston valve to com-
munication with a static receiver having many times the capacity of the
cylinder clearance. This presents a condition exactly the opposite to
that in all present internal combustion engines, where the basis of opera-
tion is on a trapped charge. In the Whaley engine, the piston valve to the
static receiver is open as long as the fuel is being injected.
The Whaley engine has the usual form of port scavenging supplemented
by high-pressure scavenging and supercharging through the top of the
cylinders. The last two operations are carried out with air at a pressure
of about forty-five pounds per square inch. The air pumps for the super-
scavenging and supercharging operation are contained in the lower part
of the power cylinders. There is a supplemental scavenging air-pump
formed in the upper part of the frame in which operates a piston placed
on top of the crosshead. Two cylinders are cast in block with a valve
chest between. The air from the pumps just described is used either in
direct line or is transferred through the ports in the valve chest to the
opposite cylinder.
The air is controlled by piston valves, one working inside the other
and both being actuated by links similar to those used on locomotives and
reversing marine steam engines. By linking up, the opening of the piston
valves is made to synchronize to the period of fuel injection in such a way
that, for practical purposes, combustion takes place during the entire time
that the valve is open. The practical effect in the operation of the
engine will be that fuel will be supplied to the point of cut-off of the piston
valve, which will be open for the power necessity of the engine. The
result diagram will, therefore, be that of the steam engine so far as the
admission and point of cut-off are concerned. The main purpose of the
clearance reservoir is to maintain the maximum working pressure desired,
which, in the case of the present engine, is 350 pounds per square inch. As
this is the normal compression-pressure of each working cylinder, it is
also the normal pressure for the receiver or reservoir.
Under normal running conditions, no variation in pressure is expected
no matter what the conditions of loading and fuel injection may be. In
floating the receiver on the compression space, there will be but little
transfer of air, heat or pressure through the valves. The receiver serves as
an asorber in case of any rise in pressure in the cylinder through any
cause whatever. By an ingenious arrangement of the valves, the com-
pression-space port is made to serve successively for the introduction of
the superscavenging, and supercharging and to establish communication
with the reservoir or receiver during the combustion period.
A novel arrangement of fuel pumps and fuel admission valves is used.
The fuel pump is placed on top of the valve chest and is driven directly
from the valve stem. The pumps deliver the charge of oil for each
stroke directly into each individual fuel valve, there being no piping what-
ever employed. The pressures will be between 4,000 and 8,000 pounds per
square inch. The action of the pumps synchronizes with the action of the
valves, both being operated from the same valve-stem, thereby assuring
the maintenance of relation between fuel injection and duration of the
valve opening to cut-off. Because of this construction, there practically
will be no rise in pressure in the cylinders or in the system beyond that
due to compression.


  p. 2205 (#1161)                      

1925)
2205
Professional Notes
The fundamental action of the Whaley engine is entirely different from
that of any of the present oil or Diesel engines. All other present-day
engines operate with a trapped charge of air which is confined in closed
compression space into which the fuel is injected, and there is always a
rise in pressure after combustion takes place. In the Whaley engine, even
early timing of the fuel admission will cause no appreciable pressure-rise
above the capacity of the pressure valves into the receiver.
Maintaining the maximum pressure to a definite figure allows the carry-
out of a program for the design of relatively light weight oil engines.
It is expected that the Whaley engine will weigh less than 100 pounds per
horsepower, a figure which represents a substantial improvement over
current practice. Also, due to the maximum pressure principle, the Whaley
engines, for all sizes of power, can be built at approximately the same
weight per horsepower as is the case with the steam engines. This means
that the weight of less than 100 pounds per horsepower will apply to
Whaley engines of all sizes. This feature will make the development of the
Whaley engine much more valuable as an economic factor, the larger the
units are built, especially so as with the present Diesel and heavy oil engines
weights increase progressively as the power to be delivered increases.
The Whaley engine at the Sun Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company's
plant is now undergoing its shop tests and it is expected that the trials
will be completed in time to present all technical details of the engine
and the results of performance before the winter meetings of the national
engineering societies.
Those who have inspected the engine have stated that it closely resembles
a vertical steam engine of sturdy design, but having four high-pressure
cylinders. They have remarked the absence of cams, rollers and gearing
associated with internal combustion engines and have complimented the
inventor and designer on the production of a new internal combustion engine
as simple in construction as a well built steam engine and one that can
apparently be operated by anyone versed in steam engine practice.
The Whaley Engine Patents Co., Inc., own the patents for the Western
Hemisphere. The International Whaley Engine Corporation own the
patent rights for the Eastern Hemisphere. The American Locomotive Com-
pany own the exclusive license for the use of the Whaley engine on rails
for the Western Hemisphere. The Sun Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Com-
pany, Chester, Pennsylvania, has a contract for building these engines for
marine and stationary use in the United States. The engineering firm of
Parish and Tewksbury, Inc., New York, has had executive charge of this
development since February, 1924.
The Metering of Fluids
Engineering, 18 September, 1925.-One of the collateral advantages as-
sociated with the use of electricity for lighting or power is the ease and
accuracy with which it can be metered. The station engineer can easily
determine with practically laboratory precision the output of his genera-
tors, but it is far less easy to fix with corresponding rigor the steam rate
of his turbines. In the discussion on boiler trials held last winter at the
Institution of Civil Engineers, most of the speakers held to the view that
the only reliable method of determining the figure in question lay in the
use of calibrated tanks to receive the condensate from the turbines. As
we suggested at the time in commenting on the debate, this distrust of
meters was unduly pessimistic, though it cannot, of course, be denied, that
the engineer who purchases the first meter that offers and installs it at the
first convenient spot, is simply asking for trouble.
In opposition to the general view, J. L. Hodgson maintained that steam
and water meters were not merely convenient, but that properly designed
and intelligently located they might be fairly classed among instruments
of precision. In a paper entitled “The Orifice as a Basis of Flow Measure-
ment,” contributed to the “Proceedings of the Institute of Civil Engineers,"


  p. 2206 (#1162)                      

2206
Vov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and now published, Mr. Hodgson gives particulars of the long and pains-
taking investigation into the discharge through orifices on which he based
his claims. The research extended over a period of sixteen years, and in
it was thoroughly examined, the effects on orifice flow of different ratios
of pipe diameter to orifice diameter, of the rate of flow, and of the physical
properties of the fluids. Accurate tests were made with orifices fixed on
mains ranging from 38 in. up to 44 in. in diameter, and in the case of elastic
fluids with pressure ratios ranging from nearly unity up to the critical
value. The results have been plotted as curves, the abscissæ in some cases
being Reynolds number, and in others the pressure ratio, or the ratio of pipe
diameter to orifice diameter. The complete set provides coefficients for cal-
culating discharges which cover all practical cases. In the plots made with
Reynolds number as abscissæ it is noticeable how observations made with
air fall on the same curves as results obtained with various mixtures of
water and glycerine.
Mr. Hodgson is a strong advocate of the simple square edged hole in
a fairly thick plate, as opposed to nozzles and sharp edged orifices. The
simple square edged hole can easily be reproduced with very great precision,
which is not the case with its rivals. The use of a relatively thick plate
is recommended because it has been found that when, as in some makes
of steam meter the orifice plate is only 1/32 in. thick for an 8-in. pipe, it is
very liable to buckle in service. Mr. Hodgson holds that even for a 3-in.
pipe the orifice plate should not be less than 1/16 in. to 18 in. in thickness.
On pulsating flows all orifice centers are liable to give an inaccurate read-
ing. In the case of liquids the pulsations can be damped out by the use
of air vessels or break pressure tanks, but with gases pressure waves may
travel up and down the pressure pipe and cause spurious readings. This
difficulty does not arise with steam because the pressure pipe fills with water
which damps out the pressure waves. For air metering Mr. Hodgson rec-
ommends either that the pressure be reduced to that of the atmosphere
before the fluid reaches the meter, or that sufficient receiver capacity and
throttling be introduced between the source of the pulsations and the
meter.
No matter how carefully an "orifice" meter has been designed and
calibrated, its value may be entirely discounted if it be fixed in the neigh-
borhood of a valve, or a bend or other discontinuity in the pipe line
When a fluid passes round a bend it leaves it in a very disturbed state,
and the character of the flow in the straight pipe beyond the bend is
abnormal for some considerable distance. Now, the pressure recorded by
a gauge fixed to a pipe through which fluid is moving in turbulent flow
can never be the true static head. This follows because in turbulent flow
a particle of the fluid is at one moment close to the wall, and at the next
is near the center of the pipe. Radial momentum has, therefore, been
destroyed and generated at the wall. Hence, the gauge reading must be
correspondingly greater than the true static head. In most cases the error
involved is negligible as the correction is small. Where, however, small
differences of head are to be measured, the pressure represented by the
destruction and generation of radial momentum may become of importance.
In the case of a fluid in normal flow through a straight pipe, the head due
to this momentum effect will be constant along the whole length of the
conduit, and a differential gauge will give a true value for the difference
in static head. If, however, the flow be more turbulent at one part of the
pipe than at a succeeding part, the correction for the radial-momentum
effect will no longer cancel out, and the gauge will give inaccurate read-
ings. It is the effect above described which is responsible for coefficients
of discharge in excess of unity, which have at times been recorded with
extemporized Venturi meters operated at very low rates of discharge. It
is thus important in the case of all meters of the orifice type that there shall
be a fair run of straight pipe in front of the meter.


  p. 2207 (#1163)                      

1925]
Professional Notes
2207
MERCHANT MARINE
Commissioner Haney and Admiral Palmer
The Nautical Gazette, 5 September, 1925.—The differences between the
Shipping Board and Fleet Corporation have developed into an open defiance
of President Coolidge's wishes by Commissioner Bert E. Haney, the
Pacific Coast member of the board. From the beginning of his interest
in shipping matters President Coolidge has insisted that the Fleet Corpora-
tion be given sole authority in the operation of the government's ships
and that the board content itself with acting in a regulatory capacity, and
he made recommendations accordingly in his address to Congress last fall.
How the members of the board at first objected, then partially met the
President's wishes, and later withdrew the delegation of authority only to
confer it again a few weeks ago is now a matter of history. It now
develops, however, that in all the discussions Commissioner Haney con-
sistently opposed the vesting of such authority in Admiral Palmer and even
went so far as to oppose the re-appointment of Admiral Palmer. This
attitude is in direct opposition to President Coolidge's wishes that the
Fleet Corporation be given control over the government's ships and ser-
vices, but it now appears that Commissioner Haney has endeavored to
bring about Admiral Palmer's removal. This was too flagrant a defiance
of the presidential wishes to pass unnoticed and accordingly President
Coolidge sent a telegram on Thursday of last week requesting Commis-
sioner Haney's resignation from the board. Commissioner Haney has
refused to resign, and it remains to be seen what President Coolidge's next
move will be.
The situation has some unusual features, and at least one of its effects
will be the forcing of the shipping issue sharply before the next Congress.
Commissioner Haney cannot hope to retain his seat on the board by defying
the President's request, for the President has the matter in his own hands.
Commissioner Haney is serving under a recess appointment and if he
persists in his refusal to resign President Coolidge can submit some other
name to Congress for confirmation and Commissioner Haney will be
automatically supplanted. The real issue, however, is found in the policy
involved. President Coolidge bases his request for the resignation on the
ground that Commissioner Haney has gone contrary to an understanding
that he had with the President that he support Admiral Palmer. Com-
missioner Haney, on the other hand, contends that he had no such under-
standing with the President, that the President knew of his opposition to
Admiral Palmer, and that he is responsible, not to the Executive, but only to
Congress. Sifted down, the issue really is whether the government's fleet
shall be controlled by one man or by the Shipping Board, and this is the
phase of the matter which will be presented to Congress. Undoubtedly,
Commissioner Haney will find ample backing in Congress for his policy
and a sharp fight will develop. This, however, will not alter the fact that
Commissioner Haney's days on the board are numbered.
Just why Commissioner Haney should have taken a dislike to Admiral
Palmer is not quite clear, despite the profferred explanations. In his letter
to the President, the commissioner says first that he considered Admiral
Palmer incompetent from temperament and lack of experience to carry
out the provisions of the Merchant Marine Act of 1920; second, Admiral
Palmer seemed determined not to confer with the board upon any of the
questions which came within its province; and, third, Admiral Palmer
seemed disposed to proceed along lines independent of the Board's action.
These are feeble reasons for Commissioner Haney's opposition to Admiral
Palmer. In the first place, it is with poor grace that Commissioner
Haney can charge Admiral Palmer with incompetence, for, by no stretch
of the imagination, can the commissioner be regarded as a shipping expert.
Moreover, Admiral Palmer has clearly demonstrated his ability to run the
government's ships, for he has reduced the operating losses to a point


  p. 2208 (#1164)                      

2208
(Nov.
C. S. Vaval Institute Proceedings
lower than they have ever been before, placed the services on a mors
business-like basis, and earned the approval of private shipowners for hs
capable management of the government's shipping interests. The second
and third complaints can be dismissed by the knowledge that, in acting
independently of the board, Admiral Palmer was carrying out the wishes
of President Coolidge and, later acting under the authority vested in bar
by the board. He has taken no important action nor made any drastic
change in policy without the consent of the board to which all his report
mendations have been sent, and the fact that the board has rejected many ci
his recommendations proves that he has not usurped any of the boards
power. It is obvious that Commissioner Haney has not had the majority
of the board behind him in his attitude, for if he had it would have becs
easy to bring about the removal of Admiral Palmer. When he was ap
pointed to the presidency of the Fleet Corporation, Admiral Palmer was
compelled to hand over to the board his resignation for acceptance at any
time. That resignation still rests with the board. Had Commissioner Haney
been supported by the other commissioners it would have been a simple
matter for them to accept President Palmer's resignation. This has not been
done; Admiral Palmer is still in office; all of which proves that con-
missioner Haney could not gain the sympathy of a majority of the com-
missioners. It is to be hoped that the impending fight will clarify the situa-
tion and put an end to the continual interference of the board with the
activities of the Fleet Corporation.
Water-borne Commerce Through United States Ports in 1924
The Nautical Gazette, 26 September, 1925.-A warehouse one mile square
and thirty-eight stories high would be filled by the water borne commerce
handled at deep water ports of the United States during the year 1924, and
a train, loaded with the contents of that warehouse, traveling at a rate of
thirty miles an hour would require more than three months to pass a
given point. These facts, developed by analysis of a survey of the water
borne traffic of the United States in 1924, prepared by the Bureau of
Research, United States Shipping Board, aid in comprehension of the mag-
nitude of our water-borne commerce.
The survey referred to contains details of the volume of cargo tonnage
handled by the principal ports of the United States, as well as our non-
contiguous possessions, in foreign, intercoastal and coastwise trades, the
total movement aggregating more than 259,500,000 tons. In this connec-
tion it is noted that the freight tonnage carried by all the railroads of the
United States during 1924 was less than five times the water borne total.
The actual volume of tonnage handled at United States ports, inbound
and outbound combined, exceeded 421,400,000 tons, more than 10 per cent
of this total passing through the port of New York. Duluth, Minnesota,
ranks second with a total cargo tonnage movement 39,850,000 tons. Los
Angeles third with 20,000,000 tons, Buffalo fourth with 17,650,000 tons,
and Philadelphia fifth with 13,800,000 tons.
The following table contains a résumé of the operations of some of the
principal ports showing the number of cargo tons of water-borne
shipments handled through each during the year 1924
Noncon-
Total Foreign Intercoastal * Coastwise tiguous
Commerce Traffic Traffic Traffic Traffic
Tons Tons Tons Tons Tons
New York, N. Y... 43,478,421 21,944,018 5,598,441 15,348,731 587,231
Duluth, Minn. ..... 39,852,321 756,857
39,095,464
Los Angeles, Calif. 20,088,980 3,732,411 6,005,851 10,147,777 202.941
Buffalo, N. Y. .... 17,651,686 3,797,541
13,854,145
Philadelphia, Pa... 13,836,779 5,404,143 1,188,403 7,154,300
89.833


  p. 2209 (#1165)                      

1925)
2209
Professional Notes
Norfolk, Va. ...... 11,539,735 2,836,222 126 202 8,484,272 93,039
Boston, Mass...... 11,296,769 2,343,451 458,972 8,426,041 68,305
New Orleans, La... 10,513,401 8,160,473 246,887 2,003,680 102,361
Toledo, Ohio ..... 10,082,783 1,166,332
8,916,451
Cleveland, Ohio ... 9,558,739 1,345,851
8,212,888
Baltimore, Md. .... 9,344,075 5,424,805 1,180,989 2,546,438 191,843
San Francisco, Calif. 9,254,715 2,727,096 1,603,647 3,726,201 1,197,771
Conneaut, Ohio .... 8,770,722 160,272
8,610,450
Ashtabula, Ohio ... 8,523,610 544,113
7,979,497
Port Arthur, Tex, . 7,594,748 2,310,263 6,229 5,256,395
21,861
Seattle, Wash. ..... 7,378,773 1,144,790 544,226 5,183,075 506,682
Milwaukee, Wis... 5,653,421 101,692
5,551,729
Ashland, Wis. .... 5,521,328 195,372
5,325,956
Lorain, Ohio ....... 5,452,238 429,662
5,022,576
Galveston, Tex. .... 5,264,135 3,222,289 52,598 1,971,728 17,520
Sandusky, Ohio ..... 4,239,217 633,145
3,606,072
Newport News, Va. 4,233,334 1,309,530 7,680 2,870,320 45,804
Houston, Tex. ...... 4,086,386 1,212,605 16,269 2,840,815
16,697
Baton Rouge, La... 3,803,849 1,290,253 54,400 2,459,196
Tacoma, Wash. ... 3,798,112 925,008 324,139 2,401,382 147,583
Portland, Ore..... 3,788,707 1,380,302 500,611 1,891,732 16,062
Providence, R. I. .. 3,658,690 556,906 66,675 3,035,109
Beaumont, Tex, ... 3,439,469 728,129
2,684,717 26,623
Texas City, Tex. .. 3,419,852 902,406 9,303 2,508,143
Jacksonville, Fla... 3,072,192 561,978 55,188 2,448,741 6,285
* Coastwise figures furnished by the Board of Engineers for Rivers and
War Department.
MISCELLANEOUS
Warships of the Future
The Engineer, 11 September, 1925.—It is not a little significant that in so
many accounts of the recent launch of the Nelson this vessel, with her
consort, the Rodney, should have been referred to as probably the last
battleships that would ever be built. On what grounds the conclusion is
based we do not know, but a belief appears to be widely held that between
the present date and 1931-in which year the treaty empowers us to lay
down two more battleships-other naval weapons may so develop in power
as to render the great ship entirely obsolete. A second, and more con-
vincing argument against the survival of the battleship has been advanced.
Even the wealthiest nation may hesitate to spend seven or eight millions
on a single ship of war, when for the same outlay four or five cruisers
could be built, especially as it seems clear that cruising ships of the power-
ful type which the Washington Treaty has promoted are destined to bear
the brunt of the fighting in a future naval campaign. From 1936 onward,
the British Empire will possess only fifteen capital ships, the United States
the same number, and Japan no more than nine. When so few are available
these ships will almost inevitably be treated as assets too precious to be
risked save in the last extremity. It is certain that they will not be
hazarded so long as there are units of less value to be mustered for the
fray. In other words, the large cruiser bids fair to replace the capital
ship, at least in the earlier phases of a war, as the dominating factor, the
type which is called upon to intervene whenever the issue between lighter
forces hangs in the balance, as a rôle which has hitherto been traditional
with the battleship.
Without presuming to offer judgment on this question, which is, after
all, too speculative to lend itself to dogmatic assertion, we would merely
point out that during the seven years which have already elapsed since the
peace there has been no such advance in the development of aerial or
submarine weapons as to warrant the inference that six years hence they


  p. 2210 (#1166)                      

2210
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
will have gained a positive ascendancy over the battleship. On the con-
trary, we venture to maintain that progress in these directions has been
largely offset by corresponding progress in counter tactics, with the result
that the battleship of today is relatively no more vulnerable to these weapons
than it was in 1918, when they failed signally to prevent the great ship
from demonstrating its supremacy. We are inclined to think that if the
battleship is doomed, its demise will be brought about by influences un-
connected with strategy or tactics. Is not the construction of so many
cruisers of large displacement and powerful armament a tacit admission
that in naval fighting the gun, in the long run, is most decisive? The menace
of torpedo and mine can be in great measure overcome by bulges and sub-
division; in fact, if high speed were not a factor of importance ships could
now be constructed in such a manner as to be virtually proof against
underwater assault. The problem of air attack is, perhaps, more formidable,
but so long as aircraft operating from shipboard are unable to carry bombs
exceeding 300 lb. in weight-as is believed to be the case at present—it is
scarcely an urgent one. Notwithstanding the improvement of rival weapons,
of which so much is heard by the public, gunfire still remains the deadliest
and least resistible form of attack. Nothing short of massive armor
avails against the shattering blows delivered by the big gun, and in vessels
below capital rank the weight of such armor is prohibitive. To minimize
the power of the gun, while magnifying that of the torpedo, the mine, or
the bomb, only serves to confuse the issue in regard to naval design and
shipbuilding policy in general. But irrespective of treaty restrictions, the
cost of a ship mounting the heaviest ordnance and carrying stout armor
is nowadays so prodigious that there is a natural tendency to seek some
cheaper substitute. Hence, the evolution of the so-called "treaty" cruiser,
which is designed to mount the heaviest guns compatible with a displace-
ment of 10,000 tons. Convincing evidence of the respect in which the gun
is universally held by naval opinion may be found in the fact that all
cruisers of this type now building or projected are to have as many 8-in.
guns as possible. They have been designed, not as torpedo ships, mine
layers, or aircraft carriers, but primarily and essentially as gun platforms.
Assuming that the admiralties of the world know their business, the inference
is unmistakable: nothing has yet been found to take the place of the gun
as the last word in naval combat. Next month, it appears, the first of our
new County cruisers is to take the water at Portsmouth. Little is known
about her, except that she will be up to the treaty limits in size and arma-
ment. For every foreign vessel of equivalent type laid down so far, a main
battery of eight 8-in. guns is provided. Apparently, therefore, this is the
largest number of such guns that can be carried without an undue sacrifice
of other qualities. Writing of cruisers in the last issue of Brassey's Annual,
Sir George Thurston submits the design of a 10,000-ton ship with nine 8-in.
guns and a speed of 34 knots. The guns, in triple turrets, are all grouped
in the forward part of the ship, the advantages of this arrangement being
set forth with the author's customary lucidity. But upon the drawbacks,
which impress us as serious, he dwells rather lightly. We question whether
naval officers would care to take into action a cruiser which had no stern
fire from its main armament. Again, the grouping of all the guns for-
ward, though tending to simplify fire control, would increase the risk of
having the entire main armament disabled by a few lucky hits. It is
obvious that a 10,000-ton cruiser, built for very high speed and powerful
armament, can be given only the scantiest armor protection, and, indeed,
Sir George proposes a thickness of only i-in. or 2-in. plating on the bar-
bettes and decks, with no side armor at all. The vitals of the ship would
thus lie open to shell of almost any caliber, while it is quite conceivable
that a single raking hit from an 8-in. projectile would put all three bar-
bettes out of action. For these reasons we would prefer an armament of
eight guns, disposed in four turrets at bow and stern. An even wider
dispersion of the armament would be desirable if weight permitted. Since


  p. 2211 (#1167)                      

1925]
2211
Professional Notes
a cruiser of the treaty type is to be virtually bare of armor, volume of fire
will be her sole means of defense, once she is engaged with an adversary
of her own class. It is therefore of the last importance that every device
should be employed to preserve her guns from premature disablement.
Strong armor being precluded, this can only be effected by spacing the gun
positions as far apart as possible. One direct hit on a turret will probably
wreck the flimsy structure and put its pair of guns out of action. This is
all but inevitable, but the real contingency to be guarded against is that a
single hit may cripple two of the turrets if they are too close together.
From this point of view something may be said in favor of the Raleigh
class, in which each of the seven 7.5-in. guns is mounted singly, albeit
behind an open shield. But by no effort of ingenuity can a cruiser of the
treaty type be endowed with a capacity for resistance equal to that of the
old armored cruiser. As Sir George Thurston puts it: "The interior of such
a cruiser is so fully occupied by boilers, machinery, and magazines that it
is not humanly possible to provide by bulkheads, watertight compartments,
or other methods of underwater protection, immunity from torpedo or mine
attack. Therefore .... it must be recognized that the explosion of a
large mine, or a torpedo with a powerful warhead, would, in the majority
of cases, utterly wreck and destroy the vessel."
The smaller class of cruisers, designated as Type B, of which the
Admiralty proposes to build seven, are apparently to be reduced copies of
the County ships. As they are to displace only 8,000 tons, a lighter arma-
ment must be accepted. Six 7.5-in. or 8-in. guns would appear to be
indicated. Japan is already completing four ships of 7100 tons and 33 knots,
which are to carry six 8-in. guns. Judged by the British standard, these
vessels are over-gunned, although, as we have pointed out before, the rule
which for many years has seemingly governed cruiser design in this country
-that no ship below 8000 tons should mount a gun heavier than 6-in.-is
without technical justification. We do not, however, concur in the view that
because all the latest foreign ships are designed for 8-in. guns, the majority
of our cruisers, being armed with 6-in. weapons, have been thereby rendered
obsolete. The fact is that out of the twenty-five cruisers which Japan will
eventually have in service, only eight are armed with heavy guns. The
remaining seventeen have a uniform armament of 5.5-in. guns, a mark
inferior in power to our 6-in. piece. All of the ten completed cruisers of the
United States Navy carry 6-in. guns, as do most of the cruising ships in
other navies, and this state of affairs will endure for some years to come.
It is in the important qualities of speed and seaworthiness that our exist-
ing cruisers are deficient. So far as armament is concerned, they compare
quite well with foreign ships.
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
“Description of the Goodyear Pilgrim," Aviation, August 31, 1925.
“The Way of the Wind." Journal of the Franklin Institute, September,
1925.
"Maritime Law and Economic Pressure.” The Journal of the Royal
United Service Institution, August.
“Airship Work for the Navy." The Journal of the Royal United Ser-
rice Institution, August.
"Flight Tests of the New Curtis Racer.” Aviation, September 28, 1925.
"The Franklin Institute." Army Ordnance, September October.
"Anti-aircraft Ordnance.” Army Ordnance, September-October.
"Bombing.” “U. S. Air Services,” October.
“Power Plants for U. S. Navy Aircraft.” Mechanical Engineering, Octo-
ber.
"A Review of Steam Turbine Development.” Mechanical Engineering,
October.


  p. 2212 (#1168)                      

NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
FROM SEPTEMBER 3 TO OCTOBER 3
PREPARED BY
PROFESSOR ALLAX W'ESTCOTT, C. S. VAVAL ACADEMY
DEBT FUNDING NEGOTIATIONS
FRENCH DEBT Mission IN WASHINGTON.—The French debt mission to
the United States, headed by Finance Minister Caillaux, with four sena-
tors, four deputies, and two others, arrived in New York on September 3
and proceeded on the same day to Washington, where conferences were be-
gun with Secretary of the Treasury Mellon and other members of the
American Debt Commission.
On the total debt of about $4,000,000,000, the French commission made
an initial offer of payments to begin at about $25,000,000 a year and increase
to from $80,000,000 to $90,000,000 within twenty years, the payments to
extend over sixty-two years and total a sum somewhat in excess of the
principal. The American proposals called for payments totaling about
$10,000,000,000 in the sixty-two-year period. The final French proposal,
made on October 1, was for payments of $40,000,000 for five years,
$60,000,000 for seven years, and $100,000,000 for fifty-six years, a total of
$6,220,000,000. This offer was rejected by the American Commission, who
pointed out that its present value, at the rate of interest of Liberty Bonds.
a five-year delay, during which France should pay annual installments of
$40,000,000, which would be regarded as full current interest. This offer
the French Commission will present to the French Government. It must
be approved by the French Cabinet as well as by the U. S. Congress before
going into effect.
OTHER DEBT SETTLEMENTS.—In August it was announced that Count
Volpi, Italian Finance Minister, would head a new Italian debt mission to
America. Rumania and Czechoslovakia also gave notice of their decision
to send commissions.
According to information given out by the American State Department
in September, the little Baltic nation of Latvia has funded her debt of
$5,775,000 on terms satisfactory to the United States Government. In
announcing the settlement, Secretary Mellon pointed out that Latvia
was on a sound economic basis, and that her ports would prosper as entre-
pots between Russia and the outside world.


  p. 2213 (#1169)                      

1925]
2213
Notes on International Affairs
LEAGUE OF NATIONS
WORK OF LEAGUE ASSEMBLY.—The sixth annual session of the League
of Nations Assembly met at Geneva on September 7. Senator Raoul
Dandurand of Canada was elected president. In his speech as president
pro tem, Premier Painlevé of France attempted to revive the Geneva
Protocol of last year, and also recommended that the League Council call
a disarmament conference "as soon as satisfactory conditions from the
point of view of security are established.” In a subsequent speech the
British Foreign Minister, Austen Chamberlain, reiterated Great Britain's
objections to the Geneva Protocol or any similar sweeping plan of com-
pulsory arbitration, favoring instead more gradual progress and regional
agreements. In this position, opposed to France and the smaller states in
the Assembly, Great Britain was supported by Italy and Japan.
The Assembly voted to end on January 1 League supervision of Austrian
finances, while retaining control of the resources used as guarantees for
the loan to Austria raised under the auspices of the League. Resolutions
were adopted providing that the Council make a preparatory study for a
conference on disarmament, to be convoked when progress in security nego-
tiations warranted, and also that the Council consider the creation of a
special commission to prepare for a conference on the economic difficulties
in the way of international peace and progress.
Mosul DISPUTE BEFORE Council.—Meetings of the League Council
were held at Geneva concurrently with the Assembly. Prior to the meet-
ing, a special commission appointed by the council handed in its report
regarding the dispute between Turkey and Great Britain (for its mandate
35 Tabriz
TURKEY
Urmia
KURDISTAN j w L.

BAdana
Mosul
YAleppo
MEDITERRANEAN
ERSIA
SEA
SYRMA KINGDOM OF
(French Mandate)
IRAQ
T ESOPOTAMIA A
Tripoli
((British Wandgte)!
bDamascus
'ARABIA
Bagdacac.o.co
Mosul and Its Oil-FIELDS
Showing boundaries as proposed by League Commission
Beirut
of Iraq) over the territory around Mosul. The report was advisory rather
than decisive, and recommended that, although Turkey had legal claims
to the disputed territory, it should remain a part of Iraq for the next
twenty-five years, provided the British mandate were extended for that
period.


  p. 2214 (#1170)                      

2214
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Great Britain before the council offered to continue its mandate over
Iraq provided the council approved. Turkey, however, insisted upon a
plebiscite in the disputed territory and refused otherwise to accept a de-
cision of the council as final. Great Britain declared Turkey false to her
pledges, and in the middle of September protested that Turkey was deport-
ing Christians from territory on the Iraq side of the provisional frontier
established at Brussels last year. In this confusion of claims, the council
called on the Hague Court for an opinion as to the council's power to adjust
the dispute, and also decided to send a commission to investigate the de-
portation of Christians.
The British Government's offer to continue its protectorate of Iraq, at
the risk of friction or even war with Turkey, met with much opposition at
home, on the ground not only of the danger but the unprofitableness of
the undertaking.
SECURITY PACT NEGOTIATIONS
SECURITY PARLEY ON OCTOBER 5.–Following the conference of experts
in London in early September, the Allied Foreign Ministers met at Geneva
and joined in a note to Germany proposing a meeting of foreign ministers
at the little Swiss town of Locarno, on October 5. This invitation Ger-
many accepted.
Commenting on the proposed security pact, which by these developments
appeared in a fair way toward actual accomplishment, E. L. James in the
New York Times of September 29 pointed out the possible significance to
Russia of such a rapprochement between Germany and France. His state-
ment, following, refers to the visit of M. Tchitcherin, Russian Foreign
Minister, to Warsaw, which was followed by a visit to Berlin at the close
of September. Russia it was believed would make large concessions not
only to Germany but to Poland and other east European states to prevent
the creation by the Security Pact of an anti-Russian bloc headed by France
and Germany.
The treaty between the Allies and Germany amounts, in effect, to Ger-
many and France agreeing to arbitrate all differences, and England, and
perhaps Italy, guaranteeing the arrangement. That is only on the face
of it. The biggest political effect of such an agreement would be to bring
Germany back into the society of the allied nations, and this inevitably either
drags her away from Russia or at least makes any move by the Reich to
link up closely with the Soviets much less likely. It brings Germany into
the League, which is fought by Moscow even more bitterly than by Wash-
ington.
Therein lies the big effect of the arrangement on contemporaneous Euro-
pean politics.
In this connection the French are watching closely the trip to Warsaw
and Berlin of M. Tchitcherin, the Russian Foreign Minister. Today he will
be engaged in conversations with officials and political leaders of Poland,
and this seems important in view of the progress Poland and Russia have
made in improvement of their relations the past year.
What has the Soviet Minister got to say about the new conference,
which in any event tends to isolate Russia in Europe even more than
before? And what pressure may M. Tchitcherin try to bring on Germany?
What may he have to say about the promises in the Treaty of Rapallo?


  p. 2215 (#1171)                      

1925]
2215
Notes on International Affairs
All in all, there are evidences that European alignments are undergoing
important modifications, and while there seems no reason to cast any doubt
on the probability of France and Germany making the Rhine treaty, yet
taking German opposition along with other indications one can wonder
what will become of the French plan to give Poland and Warsaw guarantees
of a nature to maintain French tutelage over those countries.
FRANCE AND THE RIFF
FRANCO-SPANISH OFFENSIVE.—Early in September it was reported that
the long planned concerted offensive of French and Spanish against the
Riffians was under way. Spanish forces landed at Alhucemas Bay on Sep-
tember 9 and began an advance toward Ajdir, the Riff capital. Two weeks
later the French started a movement toward Ajdir, forty miles north. On
October 1, Spanish advance forces reported Ajdir in flames, and occupied
the town the next day.
On September 28, Marshall Lyaty, for fifteen years French representa-
tive in Morocco, retired as Resident General. It was reported that the in-
tention of the French Government was to leave Marshal Petain in full
control in Morocco until the conclusion of military operations, when a
civilian resident general would be appointed.
FAR EAST
NOTES TO CHINA ON TARIFF AND EXTRATERRITORIALITY.—On September
4 the nine powers which took part in the Washington Conference replied
in identic notes to China's request of June 24 for modification of treaty
agreements relating to tariff and extraterritoriality. The notes insisted
that China show her ability to protect foreign rights now safeguarded by
the treaties, and give concrete evidence of ability to prevent destruction of
foreign property and suppress anti-foreign agitation. The notes, however,
expressed the willingness of the powers to send delegates to a tariff con-
ference, to open October 26, and also to appoint commissions to investigate
the question of relinquishing extraterritorial rights. The latter commis-
sions will begin sessions on December 18. The decision of the powers to
give immediate attention to Chinese problems is in line with the policy
advocated by the United States Government.
Regarding tariff reduction, the New York World, quoted in the Literary
Digest of September 12, writes as follows:
"Tariff revision is urgent, for upon it depends the vigor of the central
government. Since 1842 China has been restricted to a 5 per cent tariff.
The schedule has several times been revised; the rate, never. Since these
customs receipts have been mortgaged for indemnities and loans, the adminis-
tration is in foreign hands. China, in brief, lacks even the shadow of
fiscal independence; and one reason why the Peking Government is impotent
is its financial starvation. A higher tariff will strengthen the central au-
thorities, help liquidate the debt and benefit certain industries. Hand in
hand with it should go abolition of the li-kin, or provincial imposts. These
hinder all trade and give the military governors the chief revenues with
which they defy Peking and the forces of law and order.
"If there were no other reason for cooperative Western action it would
lie in the unabated chaos of Chinese affairs. The authority of the central
government has been almost destroyed, and military governors rule the
provinces to suit themselves. The Peking treasury is notoriously bank-


  p. 2216 (#1172)                      

2216
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
rupt. Enterprise throughout much of China is stifled, and capital has
drained to the treaty ports as the only safe place of investment. River
conservation has been neglected, with the result of dangerous floods; the
weak rail system, only some 6,000 miles, is debt-burdened and deteriorating.
Banditry has filled whole provinces with a terrorism like that of the medi-
eval condottieri. The opium evil thrives unchecked."
A CONFLICT OF CULTURES.—In an article in October Current History
Professor Charles Hodges of New York University interprets the present
unrest in China as essentially the "challenge of an Oriental civilization to
Westernization. Manifesting itself on one side in the movement among
the Chinese toward nationalism, Westernization has displayed itself more
clearly in an invasion of trade and industrial development which has revo-
lutionized Chinese life. China now has several hundred newspapers with
a yearly distribution of 75,000,000 copies, and 7,000 miles of railroad.
Western machinery has invaded the most conservative of a people's
habits; it has established the beginnings of capitalistic enterprise in the
daily bread of 400,000,000 Asiatics.
Hence, the ordinary wear and tear of the industrial revolution in China
has been bitterly accentuated by the conflict of civilizations behind the
rise of factories and machine power. It is natural that Chinese nationalism
should assail the growth of alien economic domination when it is sur-
rounded with a hedge of treaty provisions tying the hands of China's
sovereignty; when this foreign business arrogates to itself privileges it
enjoys on no such scale elsewhere in the world; when for every gain to
China it raises two problems that it neither aids China's hapless govern-
ment in solving nor itself meets in its operations on Chinese soil. Naturally
trouble centers about Shanghai. Here the most complete breakdown of
Chinese society has been accomplished by Westernization in the business
world. Clustered around this New York of China, like satellites around a
planet, are half a dozen smaller cities such as Wusih and Soochow, like-
wise transforming themselves and their humanity. A similar development
centers about Tien-tsin, the metropolis of North China, whose murky horizon
is beginning to blot out the significance of a political shell like Peking in
the rise of Chinese "money joss" or millionaires of business. Then 700
miles up the Yangtze, Hankow stands out as another economic storm center,
the Chicago and Pittsburgh of tomorrow's China. These contain the main
forces of this material Westernization; but wherever rail or water com-
munication offers the means an industry here and another there mark
the extension of industrial outposts into the heart of Chinese life.
All this, of course, is inevitable. The capitalistic pattern of human
organization, with its material benefits and liabilities, is a predominant
factor in world life that no people can escape.
Let us put it this way: Thirty years ago a family of five could live in
the coast city of Foochow for $10 silver a month; today it costs them
$30 to exist. Half that number of years ago in Changsha, a central
Chinese city, eggs were sold at two for a copper; now they are two for
nine cents. Wages, in their usual laggardly way, have followed the trend
of prices. In the meantime, the circle of wants about a Chinese family
has widened. Wherein, ask the Chinese pessimists, is the gain to China
in all this upsetting of the old order, speeding up of life, the breaking
down of the family system, the very keystone of Chinese social stability?
Herein lies the real force of the present situation. Indeed, its reality
is testified to by the virtual evacuation of the interior of East Asia by the
foreigner-industrial manager, business man and missionary. Now from
within, the situation in this year of 1925 is not different from that of 1900.
In a fundamental sense, the causes of the anti-foreign Boxer troubles and


  p. 2217 (#1173)                      

1925]
2217
Notes on International Affairs
the present unrest of China's new nationalism are the same—the failure
of the West to meet the situation its presence has evoked.
Twenty-five years ago this precipitated the assault on the works of
Christianity. The cycle was clearly defined: first it was directed against
the Catholics, whose insistence on what came close to an assertion of
political interests in China's domestic affairs provoked the popular native
hatred; then it was turned against all Christian activity; and finally the
explosion hit all foreigners. Today the cycle is reversed. Young China
is challenging the material interests of the West as the root of the
present evil. It began with the Japanese cotton mills, spread to the British,
involved other nationalities, and eventually tied up all economic activity.
Finally, the outcome of a bitter local labor struggle has been the turning
of the Chinese against the spiritual side of Westernization.
Therefore Western interests in the Far East will rise and fall about
Westernization—both in its spiritual and material aspects. To the Chinese
mind the two are intertwined hopelessly in the invasions of the white man's
world life into what was yesterday the Middle Kingdom. Sitting in our easy
chairs here in the West 100 years after the industrial revolution, we can
be philosophical over the costs of progress and the pains of industrializa-
tion. The Chinese millions, however, have no such perspective of comfort
achieved. They are asking the West to bestir itself about the fruit of its
own handiwork.


  p. 2218 (#1174)                      

BOOK REVIEWS
QUR NAVAL HERITAGE. By Fitzhugh Green, U.S.N.
F.A.G.S. M.Sc. Royal 8vo, 400 pages illustrated, $4.00. Pub-
lished by the Century Company: New York and London.
REVIEWED BY CAPtain Yates STIRLING, JR., U. S. Navy
The reading of this book, Our Naval Heritage, will be both a pleasure
and an education. It stamps the author as a careful student of history, a
writer of talent, and an expert portrayer of human nature. The book was
written so delightfully as to win sympathetic attention from its readers. Its
style is unrestrained and direct, and what the author has to say flows
logically and lucidly from his pen.
In this volume of four hundred pages of excellent print, Lieutenant Com-
mander Green gives us an inspiring word picture of the American Navy,
truly a "succinct and vivid recital of our country's past afloat, and of her
newly won world leadership at sea." It is not a mere record of achieve-
ments, but a vivid, live, human portrayal of the spirit of the sea and of our
Navy which has from small beginnings grown to considerable size, despite
the handicap that the American people as a whole, in the past more par-
ticularly, have little understood what it is all about and have given it but
small encouragement. The book gives us historical proof that the Navy
has maintained its high morale during times when if it had had less faith
in itself it would have withered and died.
The author shows that the American Navy is, as it were, an off-shoot
from the parent, the British Navy. The laws and customs of that more
ancient service were the foundation adopted by the infant sea power after
the American nation had freed itself from the yoke of the British monarchy.
Lieutenant Commander Green in his introduction speaks confidentially
to the pacifists: "It is well not to let ourselves be stampeded by our loath-
ing for the frightfulness of war. Doubtless, the most fervent pacifists in
the world today, despite their silence in the market place, are those who
came closest to the horrors of the World War. The difference between
those openly opposed to war and those who invent war's dreadful engines
is usually but in point of view. One party is idealistic; the other ana-
lytical. To condition peace on the silencing of drums is in many ways no
more logical than to promise peace on a structure of power.” This appeal
is well timed, and it is hoped will be heeded by those for whom it is in-
tended. May they read it (the book] to their benefit and to ours.
The United States, situated as it is, in the very center of two great oceans,
the Atlantic and Pacific, with the rich markets of Europe, Africa, Asia,
Australasia, and South America reached only by sea, must uphold the prin-
ciple of the freedom of the seas, for our ever-growing production needs


  p. 2219 (#1175)                      

1925)
2219
Book Reviews
these outlets. But, this freedom of the seas can be obtained by us, if his-
tory is a guide, only through the existence of a navy strong enough to give
us our sea rights against those who would for gain refuse them to us.
Lieutenant Commander Green has named his creation most appropriately,
Our Naval Heritage. When we become engrossed in this tale of the sea
unfolded before us, we begin to realize how far back in antiquity the roots
of the naval calling extend. The sailorman of today can almost hear the
voices of spirit forebears, now forever still across the centuries, speaking
to him in the universal language of the sea and warning him to keep alive
those sacred heritages for which so many have laid down their lives. The
book gives us only a fleeting picture of the early discoverers-of Columbus
and other intrepid navigators—mostly from Spain and Portugal. Those
nations, in the Fifteenth and Sixteenth Centuries were the leaders of the
maritime world. Their story is not a drab narrative of achievement, but,
as if by a bold stroke of an artist's brush, we see the true character of this
handful of men who dared to set out upon a voyage into the unknown,
where dwelt, so ran tradition at that time, antediluvial monsters and revolt-
ing perils from which no man could expect to return. The powerful urge
that caused these intrepid spirits to win a continent, we know was the same
as is dominant in the human race today; the lust for gold; the lure of the
treasures of the Orient, which land they hoped to reach by a shorter, more
direct route and ahead of their fellow men.
There has always existed a wide gulf in the lives led by the landlubber
and the sailor. This has come from the fact of a language of the sea which
no one who has not sailed upon its bosom can understand. On the seas,
tradition ever has been a moving force, welding the seafaring fraternity
into a people apart from all the rest of mankind.
Discipline on one of our great dreadnaughts of today is maintained just
as rigidly as of old, yet with vaster kindliness, and the ancient traditions
of rank, ceremony, and prestige, frequently and perhaps jealously derided
by our civilian acquaintances, are yet enforced. How vaguely the land-
lubber knows of the perils of the sea and the need of iron discipline to
win a victory on its bosom, in peace against its perils and in war against
the nation's enemies !
Lieutenant Commander Green tells us of this vital requirement of dis-
cipline at sea by quoting a letter from the pen of the immortal John Paul
Jones, who thus describes the power of a ship captain : "His authority
when off shore being necessary, absolute . . . . force must be used sometimes
for the ends of discipline. . ... Whilst the ships sent forth by Congress
may and must fight for the principles of human rights and republican free-
dom, the ships themselves must be ruled and commanded at sea under a
system of absolute despotism.” There have been many attempts by the
landlubber to break down this "absolute despotism” and seeds of discord
among the crews of warships often have been sown. In some foreign navies,
this breaking down of traditional discipline has led to mutiny and turned a
fighting force into a worthless junk pile of valuable material, incapable of
battles on the sea.


  p. 2220 (#1176)                      

2220
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The book tersely describes the exploits of the rugged mariners of the
Elizabethan period and after, when navies were merely swashbuckling
marauders, near pirates, yet from whom have come all those customs, usages,
and chivalries which the sea has jealously guarded and held as a standard
of conduct for those who live upon it. Of the chivalric traditions of the
sea, the one "women and children first" has ever been followed and seldom
broken. It is a tradition that the landlubber without military training in
great catastrophies is unable to follow. Without discipline and a recog-
nized leader, it is inevitable that we frequently read of the mad panic of
men on shore trampling over their women and children in an effort to
escape injury and death.
The book outlines the evolution of the warship as it emerged from out
the groups of merchant ships which clustered together for protection against
freebooters and pirates, gradually acquiring weapons more deadly and pro-
tecting itself from the effect of such weapons. In portraying the hardiness
of the seafaring race, the author says: “No chronicle of American marine
can stand forth in its true colors without at least a sketch in background of
the marvelous feats on which our seafaring ideals are founded. The tang
of danger, the spirit of adventure and of hardships of some weird voyage
still cling about them.” Some of these feats are from our own history, but
on the theory that the sea has no nationality he gives feats performed by
sailors of all climes.
Woven delightfully through his chapters "How Ships Were Built and
Sailed,” and “Where They Went and Why,” are told the beginnings of
man's victories over the sea, how he won first a grudging and dangerous
transport upon it, and finally a complete and everlasting victory over it.
Admiral Mahan has told us that a merchant marine is the cause and
justification of a navy, and the author proves it to us most conclusively
from our own history, for not until we were driven to protect our rapidly
growing merchant marine did we give thought to having a warship. The
creation of a navy is thus seen to be based upon the desire of protecting
our external trade. It might be said also that the existence of a merchant
marine to protect focuses the eyes of a nation upon the advantage of war.
ships. It would be more idealistic to believe that the cause and justification
of a navy is to secure respect to our flag on the seas. Putting it thus,
we purify the intent, taking it out of the realm of profit and loss and making
of it a point of honor.
Washington wrote: "To be prepared for war is one of the most effective
means of preserving peace. . ... To secure respect for a neutral flag re-
quires a naval force ready to vindicate it from insult and aggression. This
may even prevent the necessity of going to war by discouraging belligerent
powers from committing such violations of rights of the neutral party as
may first or last leave no option.”
The story tells us of the hardships encountered by men of iron sailing the
treacherous seas in flimsy ships of wood and the struggle of the infant
American Navy to keep itself afloat or even alive.
The author expresses the first fifty years of our country's sea-faring
life in tabular form thus :


  p. 2221 (#1177)                      

1925)
2221
Book Reviews
1775 to 1794—Mostly chaos and privateering.
1794 to 1812—Wars with France and Tripoli, bringing about the estab-
lishment of the real American Navy.
1812 to 1832—Final escape from Britain's clutches and emergence from
threats of piracy.
Speaking of conditions during our revolution, he says: “The total num-
ber of combatant vessels operating under the Continental Congress is put
at forty-two. Operating singly and in groups, this scant force had an
astonishing number of skirmishes with the world-famed British Navy.
Practically all were annihilated by 1783 when total disarmament at sea was
put into effect and our newest naval vessel presented to the King of France
who had befriended us. By 1785, we did not have a single man of war.
This state of affairs continued until 1794, when Congress began our Navy
with a special appropriation for six large frigates.” One of these frigates,
the Constitution, or “Old Ironsides,” is still in existence as an historical
relic at the Navy Yard at Boston, Massachusetts.
When we gaze upon our proud fleet of today, little do we reckon of those
dark years when the flickering candle flame, the spirit of the American
Navy, came near being snuffed out by politicians who could see no value in
such a force.
Our war with England in 1812 on the seas was not always as successful
as our histories tell us, but the frigate Constitution's achievements were
something for which the nation can always be proud.
The Navy solved the questions of piracy and slave trade, and greatly
helped to build the nation. The story reads like a romance, and the reader
is carried along the crest of a smooth-flowing tide through the development
from wood to iron and iron to steel warship construction and the develop-
ment of and the growing formidableness of naval weapons.
Apparently, but little if anything has been omitted to give us insight into
the soul of the Navy. His inspiring accounts of the deeds of our naval
heroes of years gone, whose manly attributes of self-sacrifice and devotion
to country won them the plaudits of their nation, even those who never rose
to hero fame, show that they could always be depended upon to do their
level best with whatever material an economic government would give them.
In times of piping peace and lean naval appropriations, the navy turned its
versatile hand to science, exploration, and acts of humanity, and many of
the nation's achievements in the mechanical arts are due to the Navy's help.
The Spanish War re-awakened the people to look to their Navy. The
naval race between England and Germany was on from this time while
our Navy held a position in third place. Then came the great war and
then Jutland.
The chapter on “What Happened at Jutland" is instructive. The author
blames British naval policy dictated by those ashore and not Admiral
Jellicoe for the escape of the German high sea fleet. He says: "England
failed at Jutland, not Jellicoe. Will some day America likewise fail,” and
further on he adds: "His (Jellicoe) immediate reason for not doing so
(pursue the German fleet) was the torpedo threat of the charging German
cruisers and destroyers. Putting it in another way, eleven destroyers drove


  p. 2222 (#1178)                      

2222
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
twenty-seven English first-class men-of-war temporarily out of action.
This is of peculiar interest when one examines the frequent campaigns that
have been waged against the building of these frail craft."
He draws from Jutland a lesson for us in these words: “Jutland was
indecisive in the sense that neither force conquered. With the immense
size of modern fleets this outcome is the more probable one in any engage-
ment of the future. Therefore, we may conclude from Jutland that what
we are to expect from our Navy is more than mere combat. The navy
must stand for an indefinable, impalpable something besides merely throw-
ing projectiles at an enemy. It must keep the country strategically secure,
and strategical security is a priceless asset in peace as well as in war."
• The Navy should have a guiding hand if not a vote in the development
of our peace strategy, preventing statesmen from bartering away the na-
tion's strategic security. Successful war on the sea is primarily dependent
upon secure strategical positions from which our naval forces may operate.
Peace strategy should provide these positions.
Had Jellicoe "damned the torpedoes” as did Farragut, what would have
been the outcome of Jutland and the World War?
The American Navy, when the United States declared war on Germany
in 1917, lacked the types of vessels needed to combat the most pressing
menace, that of the submarine. However, in the end its achievements were
in magnitude great enough to materially aid in deciding the victory. The
book tells the story of the North Sea mine barrage, the railroad battery,
and the oversea transportation services for both men and material, conceived
and accomplished' prior to the Armistice which were notable naval achieve-
ments. Our battle feet in its entirety was not needed but the navy was
represented in the grand fleet by a division of battleships and every de-
stroyer that could be made available was sent to the war zone about Great
Britain and France.
The book discusses the effects of the Limitation of Naval Armaments
Treaty upon the United States. It was, as the writer aptly puts it, an im-
mense naval and economic sacrifice which the United States was willing to
make for the sake of furthering universal peace.
After the World War the fleet goes to the Pacific Coast in order to
develop the strategy of the coming ocean. The book tells us of the good
effects this change has produced.
In the chapter on “The Place of a Naval Air Force," the writer gives
us a concise account of naval airplane development. He believes that war
at sea will still be decided by the gun for he says in part: "The battleship
is no doubt doomed; that is, the battleship in its present form. She has
been doomed for about one hundred twenty-five years, or ever since the
submarine was invented. The ram and torpedo further assured her doom.
The airplane simply drives another nail in her coffin. It looks, however,
as if the battleship type would survive a few years more at least, for had
any of the target vessels tried out by England or the United States in
recent years been able to maneuver against the attacking aircraft, to use
guns against them, to send combat planes up as a protection, to effect
emergency repairs, to resort to blisters and special bottoms and protective


  p. 2223 (#1179)                      

1925)
2223
Book Reviews
gratings, and to spread smoke screens, it is likely that a gun duel between
major ships would have settled the day just as it always has in the past.”
The book carries the reader down to the present moment and after we
have turned the last page, we cannot but feel a deeper inspiration and an
unwavering faith that the men of our nation who have served us on the
seas have left behind them a sacred heritage-a hostage in the keeping of
those of today, and when the present smoke of battle clears on Capitol Hill
and in the press, we shall see that those who have been administering our
Navy still ring true to these immortal traditions of devotion to country and
to their beloved Navy.
ANNAPOLIS—Its Colonial and Naval Story. Walter B. Nor-
ris, U. S. Naval Academy. 16 full page illustrations, 336 pages,
8vo. Thomas Y. Crowell Company: New York. $3.00.
REVIEWED BY CAPTAIN Ralph Earle, U.S.N., Ret.
During my youth, as well as during that of thousands of the boys of
today, Annapolis was a magical word. It meant the threshold to the dis-
closing of the great mystery of the sea, of the life thereon, and symbolized
the gateway through which young Americans must pass in order to embark
upon the romantic and honorable life and the profession of a naval officer.
Soon after entering the greatest engineering college in the world, the U. S.
Naval Academy, the young Americans as midshipmen appreciate in a small
measure what an appropriate spot Annapolis is in which to absorb the spirit
and traditions of the sea and the Navy, for that town itself speaks through
its buildings, streets, alleys, and waters, of the spirit of the Navy as well
as that of colonial and revolutionary times.
This book, Annapolis, by Walter B. Norris, one of the able civilian pro-
fessors of English at America's famous Naval Academy, will be read with
the greatest joy and satisfaction by everyone in our country who has the
least pride in his nation, its settlers, its patriots, or its Navy, the record of
which has ever been one of uninterrupted success and of accomplishment
to the honor and prosperity of our nation.
The book relates in easy narrative style the stories of the men who built
the great brick residences of Annapolis, and who fought for their ideals
from the Battle of the Severn in 1655, on down through the days of the
Royal, the Proprietary, the elected governors, and of the Revolution, to the
present day, such men as the Ogles, Ridouts, Chases, Pacas, Hammonds,
Harwoods, Carrolls, Lloyds, Dorseys, Dulaneys, Jennings, Brices, Scotts,
Stewarts, and Bordleys appearing in its pages. The fine tulip poplar on the
campus at St. John's College acquires new interest as one sees how under
its branches the Susquehannocks in 1652 signed the treaty that kept colonial
Maryland almost wholly free from Indian troubles. McDowell Hall, it
appears, was intended by Governor Bladen for a governor's mansion in
1744, but the legislature thinking him extravagant failed to supply sufficient
funds with which to complete the work, and so for years, until it was turned
over to the college, the structure was known as Bladen's folly. One gets


  p. 2224 (#1180)                      

2224
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
intimate glimpses and side lights upon the lives of revered patriots, such
as Washington, Hamilton, and the three Maryland signers of the Declara-
tion of Independence; these and many others all are here in very human
and every-day phases. The facts presented are what every visitor to Annap-
olis, not to mention all who are interested in colonial history or in the Navy
of today and yesterday, wants to know, and which cannot be found in any
other one book. The names of the streets, houses, and creeks take on a
new and charming meaning after a perusal of this volume.
In a very attractive manner Professor Norris traces the history of
Annapolis, showing its political, commercial, and social life, the relations of
the governors to the crown and people, the wealth yielded by tobacco grow.
ing, the races, the dinners, the dances, and the dress and fashions of the
times. One sees Puritans asserting themselves in a Catholic colony, next
the Annapolitans, struggling for freedom, burning the Peggy Stewart with
its hated cargo of tea, supporting the Revolution, and later entertaining
our French compatriots; and then how the spirit of the air and surroundings
was saved from oblivion by the establishment there of the Naval Academy
which brought a naval atmosphere to the old city, an atmosphere that really
restored old social forms because the Navy brought emphasis on formality
with a generally aristocratic tone.
As the author well says, the book presents a true picture of "American
achievement in war and peace, in commerce, education, politics, and the more
charming phases of social life."
The illustrations are of exceptionally high merit, being largely from
etchings by Eugene P. Metour, drawings by Vernon Howe Bailey, and
photographs of the Naval Academy.
During the World War many reserve officers received a three months'
training at Annapolis where the atmosphere of the old but grand city helped
instill in them the spirit of the traditions of the makers of our nation as
well as of the naval service itself. To these officers, also, this book will
prove especially interesting and valuable as in it they will find much that
they wished to know but which their short course at the Naval Academy
prevented.
Altogether, the book is well worth while, both for reading and for ref-
erence, and deserves to be widely read.
MAKERS OF NAVAL TRADITION. By Carroll Storrs Alden
and Ralph Earle. Ginn and Company: Boston. $1.25 net.
REVIEWED BY CAPTAIN J. J. Raby, U.S.N.
Some wiseacre has aptly said that "of the making of books there is no
end." That this well-worn adage is literally true must be quite obvious to
us all, for thousands of volumes seem to roll in rapid succession from the
press almost daily. But how many of these books are scarcely worth the
paper on which they are printed, much less the effort required to read
them? And how few stand the test of time and prove their worth?
The foregoing remarks, however, are not applicable to the little volume
under review. Indeed, Makers of Naval Tradition, written by Professor
Alden, head of the Department of English at the U. S. Naval Academy,


  p. 2225 (#1181)                      

1925)
2225
Book Reviews
and Captain Earle, U. S. Navy, is destined to occupy an important place
among the historical works of our country. We believe this because it has
to do with men who have left their names indelibly written on the pages of
history, and because it stresses that element in human life which has been
one of the most important factors in shaping the course of our beloved land.
The purposes of the authors in writing this interesting and helpful vol-
ume are clearly stated in the preface: namely, thoroughly to acquaint all
midshipmen with the makers of our naval traditions, and to point out the
debt that they really owe the heroic characters who have preceded them in
the Navy. Professor Alden and Captain Earle have, in various capacities,
been for many years vitally interested in the education of midshipmen, and
are well qualified to present the subjects treated in an authoritative and
pleasing manner.
Now in reading this book the laudable purposes of the authors may be at
once recognized, and there is not the slightest doubt that our potential
young officers should be perfectly familiar with these naval tradition makers.
Indeed, they can gather much that will be of supreme worth to them in
after years from a sympathetic study of the lives of these great naval heroes.
But why limit this valuable study to so few students? If the historical
material recorded in this volume is of vital importance in the training of
our midshipmen, would it not be equally beneficial for the entire youth of
our country? In fact, we have been so favorably impressed with the sub-
ject matter of this interesting volume, the racy style in which it is written,
the historical accuracy with which the facts are recorded, and the tremen-
dous appeal to the heroic side of life that we are persuaded to believe that
it should be used in our private and public schools. Certainly, no course of
study in history could be more interesting, none more conducive to the de-
velopment of heroic efforts on the part of our youth, and none more potent
in molding character in the right direction. We are justly proud of our
naval heroes; the youth of our land should be made perfectly familiar with
them, and no other book is so admirably fitted for this purpose as Makers
of Naval Tradition.
Then, again, the book is written not only in good, clear, vivid, poignant
English, but running through it all is that indescribable spirit that has been
a mighty power in shaping the onward course of our great nation. Indeed,
what could be more inspiring than the thrilling biographies of Jones, Deca-
tur, MacDonough, Perry, Farragut, Porter, Dewey, and Sampson? In
this little volume one may find not only the biographies of these naval
heroes, but an interesting and illuminating chapter on the part our Navy
played in the World War.
Makers of Naval Tradition should be available to every American boy.


  p. 2226 (#1182)                      

2226
[Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
LAST DAYS OF MAST AND SAIL. By Sir Alan Moore, Bt.
Illustrated by R. Morton Nance. Oxford University Press,
American Branch.
REVIEWED BY REAR ADMIRAL A. M. KNIGHT, U. S. Navy, RET.
This is one of a fairly long series of volumes published within the last
quarter century whose aim it is to preserve the features and the atmosphere
of an era, that of the sailing ship, which must regrettably be recognized as
a thing of the past: regrettably because with the disappearance of sails
has disappeared a whole world of romance and adventure and a whole race
of men, not bolder, perhaps, than the seafaring man of today, nor hardier,
but different in numberless ways—more strongly marked as a type, more
picturesque and more essentially, in every characteristic, a product of the sea.
The author, although not a seafaring man by profession-he is in fact a
well-known surgeon-has served in the British Navy and has evidently
been a lover of ships and boats throughout his life. He claims for the
present work that “it is an account of nearly every kind of craft seen be-
tween the Orkneys and Aden, during the late war, and of a few types seen
before 1914."
A much broader claim than this would have been justified by the work
itself, for, although it is essentially a record of observation rather than of
research, the author has not hesitated to go into the history of the craft
he is describing whenever the story of their evolution from earlier types
appears to him significant. The result is an interesting description of prac-
tically every type of sailing craft that could have been seen in European
waters not alone during the World War, but at any time within the last
half century.
The description is not exhaustive and is not intended to be so, for the
author bases his classification of types upon sail-plan alone, touching lightly,
where he touches at all, upon features connected with the hull or with the
purposes for which the various types were designed. It is not the vessel as
a whole with which he deals, complete from keel to truck, but the rig as
fixed by masts and sails. This limitation is brought out clearly by the chap-
ter headings, which are as follows:
Sails and Rig
Square Sails
Lateen Sails
Spritsails
Gaffsails
Lugsails
Within the limits fixed by this somewhat narrow point of view the treat-
ment could hardly be more satisfactory. The style is simple and direct
and the enthusiasm with which the author enters into description of the
minutest details of his subject is so infectious that, as a rule, it compels the
interest, if not the enthusiasm, of the reader. This is not always true. At
times the description is a little more minute than the importance of the sub-
ject justifies, and even the professional reader, with every desire to be


  p. 2227 (#1183)                      

1925)
2227
Book Reviews
informed, is likely to find his attention flagging. The author's interest in
what he calls "comparative nautical anatomy" has evidently led him to jot
down for his own enjoyment every slightest deviation from standard prac-
tice that he has observed, and it is easy to understand how difficult he finds
it to believe that not every one of these treasured notes is worthy of a
place in this record of the last days of a rapidly vanishing art.
Thus it comes about that we have here details as trilling as the lead of
vangs on a small Turkish craft encountered in the harbor of Salonika and
nearly five pages given to the rigging of this little forty-five-foot vessel, in
spite of the fact-or because of it—that no reader of this volume will ever
be likely to meet such a craft and, what is more important, that the features
so elaborately described have no apparent relation to any line of develop-
ment leading up to or growing out of them.
There would be no ground for complaining of this over-elaboration in
the treatment of details, however unimportant, if the space so utilized had
not apparently crowded out certain features of greater interest. No de-
scription is given of studding-sails, for example. Yet they persisted at
least a century after the disappearance of the spritsail as carried under the
bowsprit, a feature which is covered by full description and illustrated
with a page of cuts. They played, too, a more important part in seaman-
ship and in history, and are among the most striking features of many
historical engravings. This is an omission which may well be corrected in
the next edition.
The schooner is treated at some length in the chapter on gaffsails, where
the statement is made that the rig originated in Holland and was in use in
England in the Seventeenth Century. It is difficult to disprove a statement
of the kind but there is a mass of testimony, English as well as American,
to support the tradition that the first genuine schooner was built at Glouces-
ter, Massachusetts, in 1713, by Captain Andrew Robinson.
The defects-if such they are which have been pointed out are of
trifling significance upon the whole and detract but little from the value
and the charm of the work under review. Both value and charm are enor-
mously enhanced by the cuts, two hundred twenty-two in number, by which
the text is illustrated. To say that these are by R. Morton Nance is to
say all that need be said, or could be said, of their excellence.
To any library, public or private, in which the literature of the sea has
a place, this work is indispensable, and to all readers of such literature it
is cordially recommended.
It would be too much, perhaps, to say that the era of the sailing ship has
now been adequately covered from the descriptive side. But the descrip-
tions that we have, supplemented by the many splendid views that con-
temporary art has made available, suffice to fill the eye with a fairly
satisfactory conception of the sailing ship as it was known to past genera-
tions of seafaring men. A few of these are still left, with memories not
only of the ships, but of the men who manned them and of the spirit which
gave to the lives of these men an epic quality more characteristic of the age
than were the ships themselves.


  p. 2228 (#1184)                      

2228
(Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
It remains for some one of that fast-vanishing group to fix upon the
printed page a revelation of this spirit as a companion picture to the one
here given of the material side of The Days of Mast and Sail. Flashes
of this spirit we find here and there in poetry and story. But, in no single
volume is any effort made to fill in the outline which Thomas Fleming Day
has sketched, of “The Sailor of the Sail."
“Lord of the Bunt and Gasket
And Master of the Yard
For whom no land was distant
To whom no sea was barred."


  p. 2229 (#1185)                      

SECRETARY'S NOTES
Membership New members joining since last report:
Timmons, C. C., Lieut. (SC), U.S.N. Murphy, J. N., Midn., U.S.N.
Jordan, J. N., Comdr. (SC), U.S.N. Schwarz, A. D., Midn., U.S.N.
Cochran, w. P., Ens., U.S.N.
Russell, Herbert, Sir.
Hansen, H. J., Lieut., U.S.N.
Martin, C. O., Ensign, U.S.N.R.F.
Trimble, C. E., Ensign, U.S.N.R.F. Buehler, A. R., Lieut., U.S.N.
Lane, R. H., Brig. Gen., U.S.M.C.
The Institute desires articles of interest to all branches
Articles of the service, including the reserve force. Non-
members as well as members may submit articles, and
authors receive due compensation for articles published. Com-
pact, well digested articles are more likely to be accepted for
early publication. In accepting articles for publication, the In-
stitute reserves the right to have such articles revised or rearranged,
where necessary, in order to bring them up to the required stand-
ard of articles published in the PROCEEDINGS—the cost, if any, to
be deducted from the compensation due the author.
Contributors are requested to observe the following special in-
structions in preparing articles for the PROCEEDINGS:
(a) In writing names of ships put only the initial letters in
capitals and underscore the names. The underscoring sig-
nifies to the printer that the word is to be in italics. The
same applies to names of publications. Foreign words not
anglicized should also be italicized.
(b) In preparing tables and computations employing fractions,
sub-numbers, etc., do by hand that part which cannot be
made perfectly clear by the typewriter.
(c) In typing the script use double space between lines.
(d) When a quotation is included in an article the editor should
be assured by appropriate notation that the writer has care-
fully verified the quotation as presented.
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions INGS is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.


  p. 2230 (#1186)                      

2230
Nov.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.
In the past, many errors have resulted from the
Address of habit of changing an officer's address as soon
Members as his transfer orders are published in the papers.
No change will be made in the future except upon
receipt of notification by the member concerned. Reliance upon
the former method may, in extreme cases, mean a delay of almost
four months. To insure the prompt delivery of the PROCEEDINGS
and other communications from the U. S. Naval Institute, it is
essential that members and subscribers notify the Secretary-
Treasurer without delay of every change of address. No responsi-
bility can be accepted for failure to receive the PROCEEDINGS,
where members fail to comply with this rule. Changes of address
should reach the Institute by the 20th of the month, to be effective
for the issue of the PROCEEDINGS of the following month.
The Institute desires to obtain a copy of
Jane's
Jane's "Fighting Ships, 1924," the edition
“Fighting Ships" of which is exhausted; and requests that
(1924)
anyone wishing to dispose of a copy com-
municate with the Naval Institute, stating
price desired and condition of book.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
Captain, U. S. Navy, Secretary-Treasurer.